Authors
Chuck Dowling
Number of Reviews
195

Title
Review for Romy and Michele's High School Reunion (1997)
Romy and Michele's High School Reunion (1997) *1/2 out of ***** - Cast: Mira
Sorvina, Lisa Kudrow, Janeane Garofalo. Written by: Robin Schiff. Directed
by: David Mirkin. Running Time: 91 minutes.
First time feature film director David Mirkin has some great credits on his
resume. He has been a creative influence on some of the most intelligently
funny shows on television, notably "The Simpsons" and "Get A Life".
Unfortunately, he's trapped here with a bad script, and very few
opportunities to display his creative talents.
"Romy and Michele's High School Reunion" is a lot like "Clueless", and I
couldn't stand "Clueless" either. Kudrow and Sorvino play a couple of
airheaded losers who journey from Los Angeles to Tuscon, Arizona for their
ten-year high school reunion. Realizing that they are pretty pathetic and
have nothing to brag about in order to upstage the snotty preps who picked
on them in school, they first set out to better their lives. Five minutes
later, they realize that to better themselves is just too hard, so they
concoct an intricate (for them anyway) story about how they invented Post-It
Notes.
Also attending their reunion is Janeane Garofalo, who plays a frumpy, bitter
woman. I was shocked at this choice in casting! Angry and sarcastic? Spunky
Janeane? No, it can't be true. The only reason for her character to be here
is so that she can point out to Romy and Michele that no matter how bad they
thought they had it in high school, others had it worse. Really? Wow, who
knew?
This film, as with "Clueless", shows us such superficial characters that I
could care less about anything that happens to them. Also, the screen play
is incredibly simple. "Act One--flashbacks. Act Two--prep for the reunion.
Act Three--the reunion." Then, it's message towards the end of "Stay true to
who you really are inside" is so heavy-handed and out of nowhere. Also,
there's a dream sequence that lasts for what must be 20 minutes, which was
20 minutes too long. And, at the end of the reunion, Romy and Michele
participate in a dance that is so absurd that I think my jaw actually
dropped in disbelief.
But those reasons aren't as important as the film's main fault. The problem
is that, as far as comedies go, it's just not funny. There were maybe three
or four things I laughed at (intentionally, anyway) which probably amounted
to 45 seconds of screen time. 45 seconds out of 91 minutes is not a good
ratio. The film's best gag is only about five seconds long and occurs as a
flashback, when Romy and Michele wonder about a boy from drama class.
Basically, the film just boils down to two empty-headed, unfunny women who
wear tight, revealing clothing who are doing and saying things which
couldn't interest me in the slightest. And unfortunately, four bulging
breasts do not a good movie make. [R]
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related
links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Body of Evidence (1993)
Body of Evidence (1993) NO STARS out of ***** - Cast: Madonna, Willem Dafoe,
Joe Mantegna, Anne Archer, Frank Langella. Directed by: Uli Edel. Running
Time: 99 minutes.
First of all, let me explain again that I do not care for films which rely
heavily on sexual scenes. It's not that I'm a prude or anything, far from it
actually. Sex in movies is boring. It has nothing to do with the film
itself. The plot's moving along, then sex happens. You wait for them to
finish up, and then the story can continue.
Even putting that bias aside, erotic thrillers are always poorly written,
with unsympathetic characters. It's difficult to like a film when even the
"good" characters are just as sleazy as the bad guys. "Body of Evidence" is
a perfect example of this type of retarded filmmaking, and easily joins the
list of the worst movies I've ever seen.
"Body of Evidence" stars Madonna, who has just about perfected the art of
making bad films. She plays Rebecca Carlson, a severely disturbed dominatrix
who will sleep with anyone to ensure she gets what she wants (she added some
singing and remade this film as "Evita", you might recall). She is accused
of murdering her elderly, extremely wealthy lover. The plot twist here is
that she's on trial for killing him with sex. You see, the old man had a
heart condition and their sex session were quite intense.
Enter the worst lawyer on the planet, Frank Dulaney (Willem Dafoe). Frank is
a good family man with an attractive wife and a young son. After Frank has
gathered up what he considers enough evidence to defend Rebecca, the trial
begins. After the first day of testimony, Frank and Rebecca have dinner
together and then he drives her home. Instantly the two are having sex (he
must really love that family of his). And this isn't your average sex
encounter either. It involves scolding hot candle wax dripping onto his
flesh, and he's actually aroused by it. A few days later after court, Frank
and Rebecca have sex in the parking garage of the courthouse (!) on a pile
of broken glass (!!).
Eventually, Frank's wife gets word of what is happening between Frank and
Rebecca and throws him out of the house. Frank reacts to this by immediately
going over to Rebecca's house, handcuffing her to a tree, and raping her.
This is our hero ladies and gentlemen!
All that's left after the ridiculous sex scenes are the courtroom scenes,
and they are equally ridiculous. First, Madonna must have had a clause in
her contract which states that if she acts poorly, everyone else must be
worse in order to attempt to make her look good. Everyone gives bad
performances. Then you've got a judge who finishes unknown euphemisms which
are begun by the lawyers in their arguments. Also, you've got the dumbest
courtroom audience ever assembled. Every word of testimony shocks them and
they must discuss everything amongst themselves. After so many outbursts,
the judge clears the court. The next day, the crowd is allowed to return.
They didn't learn their lesson though, as they keep causing a ruckus until
they get thrown out AGAIN.
The final scenes (if you can even make it to the final scenes) are SO inane
that I can't even begin to describe them. But the very last shot is the most
disturbing, when Frank's wife welcomes him back WITH OPEN ARMS! Come on! I'm
just thankful that there was no "Love Theme from Body of Evidence" by
Madonna, or any songs by Madonna for that matter. [R]
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related
links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Shoot to Kill (1988)
Shoot To Kill (1988) **** out of ***** - Cast: Sidney Poitier, Tom Berenger,
Kirstie Alley, Clancy Brown, Richard Masur, Andrew Robinson.  Written By:
Harv Zimmel, Michael Burton, and Daniel Petrie Jr.  Directed By: Roger
Spottiswoode. Running Time: 110 minutes.
"Shoot To Kill" is one of the most underrated action films of the 1980's. So
good in fact, that Sidney Poitier ended a ten-year absence from film to play
the lead role.
As the film begins, we see a man seemingly breaking into a jewelry store.
When the police arrive, along with FBI agent Warren Stantin (Poitier), we
find out that the man is the owner of the store and is stealing diamonds to
give to a man who has taken his family hostage. The police go to their
house, and the kidnapper makes his demands. He escapes with the man's wife
as a hostage and heads for the docks, where he has a boat waiting. He allows
Agent Stantin to accompany him in order to take the wife home once he's made
his escape. However, to prove a point, the kidnapper kills the wife and
heads off with the stolen diamonds.
The criminal, trying to flee to Canada, disguises himself and joins a group
of men out for a wilderness hike, led by Sarah (Kirstie Alley). The audience
has not seen the man's face to this point, so we have no idea which of the
five men in Sarah's group is the bad guy.
Stantin enlists the aid of Jonathan Knox (Berenger) to help him survive the
rugged terrain and to capture the criminal. To fuel Knox's desire to go,
Sarah just so happens to be his girlfriend. Knox would much rather go alone
than to have Stantin burden him. He knows that the very urban FBI agent
won't survive a day out in the woods. But Stantin doesn't give him much
choice. He feels responsible for the woman's death and is determined to get
his man.
Now there are a couple of problems with the film. For one, why would Stantin
be the only lawman in pursuit? I would think they would have teams of men
and choppers and dogs and all of that. Second, the scoring of the film is
awful. Third, the last 10 minutes or so really seem to contradict everything
that happened in the rest of the film. They end up chasing the criminal in
the city, complete with the obligitory car chase scene. Why would you end
this story in the city when these characters have been going through hell on
earth out in the wilderness? Let them shoot it out in the snow.
However, there's a lot going for "Shoot To Kill" to overlook those flaws and
to still recommend it. The screenplay is very well paced. Instead of wasting
20 minutes introducing us to the main characters, as about 98% of films do,
the plot starts right away and we get to know the characters as the story
progresses. It has a good little mystery involving the group of men and who
may be the killer. It has some very well staged and tense action scenes,
particularly the one involving a man-made crossing over a dangerous canyon.
It has the provenly successful "buddy picture" relationship of Knox and
Stantin. It also uses the tried and true "fish out of water" scenario as
Stantin learns all about the rough outdoors in winter. Granted those last
two are WAY overused nowadays, but when they are done well, as they are
here, it's not so bad. Poitier gives a good performance as the edgy FBI
agent, and he and Berenger have some good scenes together. "Shoot To Kill"
is a fun film, and very entertaining.
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office
reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for Vegas Vacation (1997)
Vegas Vacation (1997) *** out of ***** - Cast: Chevy Chase, Beverly
D'Angelo, Randy Quaid, Wayne Newton, Wallace Shawn, Sid Caesar. Written By:
Elisa Bell. Directed By: Stephen Kessler. Running time: 92 minutes.
The 90's have been a rough decade for Chevy Chase. There was that awful
talk show of his, along with a string of box office failures: "Nothing But
Trouble" and "Man of the House" just to name two. Chevy desperately needed
a hit with this latest film. He may not have one, but he certainly doesn't
have another failure either.
I had low expectations for "Vegas Vacation". Aside from all of the failures
from the last few years, there were things specifically about this film I
was worried about. For one, the theatrical previews for it are awful. They
really made this thing look potentially bad, considering the trend to put
all of a comedy's best jokes into a trailer in order to get the public to
the theater. Another reason was the lack of involvement from series writer
John Hughes, even though he's seemingly gone insane, remaking cartoons and
remaking Home Alone eight different ways.
Chase is back as accident-prone Clark Griswold, and Beverly D'Angelo, who
just keeps getting better looking as the years go on, returns as his wife
Ellen. Their kids Audrey and Rusty are along for the vacation as well, and
are of course, played by different actors. A subtle joke is even made early
on about these multiple casting choices. This time out, Clark has received
a big bonus at work and he takes that family on vacation to Las Vegas.
Obviously, nothing goes right for Clark.  He immediatly starts to lose all
their money in the casino.  Ellen gets involved with Wayne Newton (playing
himself, naturally).  Rusty manages a fake ID in order to gamble, and
Audrey becomes a dancer. To make matters worse, Cousin Eddie (Randy Quaid)
shows up to keep Clark company.
By now there are certain things we expect when we see a "Vacation" movie.
Most notably we are expecting Chevy Chase to fall down and get into some
weird physical misadventures. Well, the years are starting to catch up to
Chevy, and there's really no physical comedy in the film. And the one
extended scene which does attempt just that, a scene a Hoover Dam, fails
miserably. So really all that's left is dialogue. Is it funny? Most of it
is. There are some great lines, and Randy Quaid just about steals the film
as idiot white trash Cousin Eddie.
They do play "Holiday Road", the series anthem which was absent from
"Christmas Vacation".  However, it's used during the scene which Christie
Brinkley reprises her role from the original "Vacation", in another scene
which fails miserably. The rest of the songs used are good and well-placed.
Most are what you would expect for gambling montages: Dean Martin, Frank
Sinatra, etc.
The biggest laughs come about 60-70 minutes into things when Clark, after
losing all the family's money, attempts to win it back using Eddie's money
at a third rate casino. Games in the casino consist of stuff like "War",
"Paper Scissors Rock", and "Pick a Number 1-10". If the whole thing could
have been THAT funny...
"Vegas Vacation" is at the bottom of the list of the four films in the
series, yet it's still an entertaining time at the movies. It just didn't
seem like they were trying very hard as they were filming it. With just a
little extra effort it could have really hit the jackpot. Maybe this film
will create a little momentum for Chevy and then his next film could be
great. One can only hope.
--Chuck Dowling  
--Chuck's Movie Reviews -- http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/

Title
Review for Beloved (1998)
Cast: Oprah Winfrey, Danny Glover, Thandie Newton, Kimberly Elise, Irma
P. Hall, Jason Robards
Written by: Akosua Busia, Richard LaGravenese and Adam Brooks
Based on the novel by: Toni Morrison
Directed by: Jonathan Demme
Running Time: 172 minutes
Date Reviewed: June 30, 1999
Without getting into the whole "Are movies art or entertainment?"
argument, I will say that movies at their basic level are in fact a
VISUAL experience.  The point of going to a movie is to SEE a story
being told.  You as a moviegoer are invited to WATCH the screen in
order to take away whatever it is you wish to take with you from the
film, whether that be artistic merit or pure entertainment.  Well,
about 55 minutes into my viewing of Beloved, I realized that the film
was making me look AWAY from the screen much more often than it was
asking me to look directly at it.  Something tells me that can't be
right.
In those first 55 minutes of Beloved, the story being told is the one
of Sethe (Oprah Winfrey), a former slave who's house in Ohio is
haunted by the spirit of her deceased daughter.  She is also haunted
(understandably mind you) by the horrific memories of her past.  Soon,
an old friend (Danny Glover) re-enters her life, and possibly will
help her to confront her demons... both spiritual and emotional.
Beloved opens with children screaming and a dog being thrown around a
room, seemingly by a spirit in the house.  The dog crashes into a
wall, badly injured with it's eye bulging out of it's head.  Sethe
scoops up the crippled animal and places him on on a table, where she
proceeds to place it's eye back into it's socket.  Over the next 55
minutes we will see similar disgusting images like Oprah urinating,
people vomiting, a young woman seemingly possessed who staggers around
snarling and just being generally repugnant, a very graphic rape, and
so much more.
Now I've been making a point in the review to stress that everything
I'm talking about happens in the film's first 55 minutes.  The reason
for that is because after 55 minutes of extremely unpleasant images, I
realized that life is too short.  I asked myself, "Do I really need to
sit through the remaining two hours of this film?"  I don't get paid
to review films... I'm doing it because I enjoy it.  Beloved was not
bringing me any enjoyment whatsoever.  I'd rather be watching The Big
Lebowski or Glory or The Odd Couple or many other movies that bring me
a great deal of pleasure.  Hell, I could even go OUTSIDE and get some
fresh air, maybe frolic around in a meadow filled with
sunflowers... ANYTHING at all would be better than watching another
second of Beloved.  Yes I understand it was a brutal time period in
our country's history and yes, I understand that not everything in
this world is sunshine and lollipops, but I really just wanted to do
something else.  I'd had enough.  And who knows, maybe the film gets
better in it's next two hours (this write-up is based solely on those
first 55 minutes, mind you).  Like I said though, I have no desire to
ever find out.
Beloved is available on DVD from Touchtone Home Video.  It contains
the film in it's original widescreen aspect ratio of 1.85:1, a
production featurette, and the original theatrical trailer.  The
quality of the DVD is adequate enough, so you can see and hear all of
the revolting images and sounds with crystal clarity.  Enjoy.  [R]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email:chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted
without permission.

Title
Review for Batman Forever (1995)
     I went with a group of friends to see the new Batman movie, and
when we left, I was scared.  I was scared to mention to my friends that
the movie I just witnessed was horrible.  Finally in the car, I said,
"Would anyone be truly offended if I say that was an awful movie?"
They felt relieved.  All four of us hated it.  Ok, you probably want to
know why.  I liked Batman Returns.  Everyone else in the world didn't,
but it remains my favorite of the three.  BATMAN FOREVER was just
ridiculously stupid.  From frame one, I realized that movie was truly
awful.  Lets get the good point out first, this is an extremely well
made film.  The stunts, the special effects, and just the overall look
of the film were all top-notch.  That's it for the good.
     First, in the first two films, Batman was not an idiot.  How many
times in this movie did Batman get caught in some situation and only
luck saved him?  So, if the bank guard in the vault at the beginning
didn't wear a hearing aid, Batman would be dead?  Come on.
     Second, Batman doesn't need to be cracking jokes.  When Michael
Keaton played the character, the humor came out of Bruce Wayne.  Batman
was the dark one.  It reversed in this one.
     Third, THE BATMOBILE DOES NOT NEED TO BE DRIVING UP WALLS!  I
wanted to leave at this point.
     Fourth, there was no satisfactory explanation for Two-Face's
origin.  Some guy at a trial somehow manages to get A VAT OF ACID to
the stand and throws it in Harvey Dent's face (by the way, Billy Dee
Williams must be mad as hell) while Batman looks on.  Yes, Batman, not
Bruce Wayne attended this trial, comfortably seated in the front row.
     Fifth, did anyone else find it stupid when Robin had a fight WITH
HIS LAUNDRY??? Was this supposed to be a cool moment?  Once again, I
wanted to walk out.
     Sixth, did the Riddler's riddles have anything to do with
anything?  So eventually they decoded to spell The Riddler's name.
Oooooo.  Big help for Batman and company.
     Seventh, the cliches.  When Grayson got into that street fight, I
said to myself, "Watch, these 200 punks are going to attack him one at
a time." They did.  And why would Robin want to save Two-Face?  "Yeah,
I'm going to beat you to a bloody pulp and throw you off this cliff,
but when you start to fall, I'll save you."  Come on.
     There are MANY other things that I had a problem with in this
film, but they will probably be considered as nit-picking, so I'll end
my review by saying that I hope this Batman doesn't last forever.

Title
Review for Virgin Suicides, The (1999)
Cast: James Woods, Kathleen Turner, Kirsten Dunst, Josh Harnett, Hannah
Hall, Chelse Swain, A.J. Cook, Leslie Hayman, Michael Pare, Danny
DeVito, Scott Glenn, Giovanni Ribisi 
Based on a novel by: Jeffrey Eugenides 
Written and Directed by: Sofia Coppola 
Running Time: 91 minutes 
Suicide is pointless, everyone should know that.  So what's this movie
like?  You guessed it... pointless. 
The Virgin Suicides focuses on the lives of the five Lisbon sisters,
from the perspective of the teenage boys who are fascinated by them. 
When the youngest Lisbon sister commits suicide, it sets in motion a
series of events that will change the lives of many people forever. 
That's what the press materials for the film probably say.  Now here's
what I say: The Virgin Suicides is a huge waste of time.  Boring, arty,
pretentious junk that is about as entertaining as... well as committing
suicide.  The movie lost me early on, immediately following the scene
where the younger daughter jumps to her death from her bedroom window. 
The girl's father (James Woods) holds her lifeless body in his arms as
their horrified family looks on.  Then, as the scene ends, the lawn
sprinklers come on.  Is that a joke?  Is that supposed to be amusing in
some way?  From then on, the movie failed to draw me back in. 
Performances are the only saving grace of The Virgin Suicides.  Woods
plays the only character who would actually interest me when he came
onscreen, but the performance of Kirsten Dunst as the next youngest
daughter Lux is worth mentioning as well.  Dunst has the potential to be
a big star, if she chooses her projects well.  And while this film is
awful, she manages to come away from it virtually unscathed.  There are
also a few cameos in the film here and there, which only frustrate the
audience as they leave you wanting more.  As a result, they all seem
rather pointless (although there's a brief role given to Michael Pare
from Eddie and the Cruisers which turns out to be his best role since...
well since Eddie and the Cruisers). 
Perhaps The Virgin Suicides would have worked had the story not been
told from the point of view of people who had very little access to the
main characters.  We never get any significant insight into the girls
and why they might be feeling what they're feeling.  All we really know
is that Mrs. Lisbon (Kathleen Turner) is strict and keeps them on a
short leash.  What mother doesn't?  It's certainly no reason to commit
suicide. 
With The Godfather Part III, Sofia Coppola proved that she had no
business being in front of the camera.  With The Virgin Suicides, she
proves she has no business behind it either.  Having family connections
doesn't entitle you to be allowed to make movies.  So attention film
directors... stop letting your daughters pout their way into the
industry.  Just because they share your DNA doesn't mean they share your
talent.  [R]
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
AOL Instant Messenger: FilmJax
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Species (1995)
Cast: Ben Kingsley, Michael Madsen, Marg Helgenberger, Forest Whitaker,
Alfred Molina, Natasha Henstridge
Written by: Dennis Feldman
Directed by: Roger Donaldson
Running Time: 108 minutes
Species was one of the films I was most looking forward to in the
summer of 1995. The summer of 1995 turned out to be very
disappointing.
Species is one of the most intriguing, yet poorly written sci-fi idea
movies I've ever seen. An advanced alien race contacts Earth. In their
first message they send us the formula for a new fuel that will solve
many of our energy problems. This lets us know that their intentions
are friendly. In the second message, they send the code for a new
strand of DNA that will allow us to cross-breed our two species.
Now, my first question would be, why would we want that? Our pesky
scientists apparently do want this, and proceed to make a hybrid of
the two different species. After deciding to terminate the project
based on the alien's nature to want to destroy things, the alien (who
is a young girl at this point) decides that it doesn't want to die so
it promptly escapes (unseen and untouched from a maximum security
compound, mind you). It soon cocoons and evolves into Natasha
Henstridge. Now being in the form of a beautiful young woman, it's
hormones go crazy and it has the primal instinct to mate. Problem is,
it's offspring will evolve quickly, producing more offspring and soon
overtaking the human race.
Who would you send on a mission to destroy an alien that, if
unstopped, could lead to the destruction of everyone on earth?  The
army? The air force? No no, you send a government hitman (Madsen), two
scientists (Helgenberger, Molina), and a "psychic" (Forest
Whitaker). Now Madsen is useful, except for the fact that he uses a
handgun to battle the alien (and while his performance is
entertaining, never once does he seem to take anything seriously). The
other three characters are absolutely worthless. Molina has absolutely
NO reason to be there, except to identify the cocoon early in the
film. The rest of the time he just tries to get chicks. Helgenberger
is just there to provide a love interest for Madsen, and
Whitaker... well he plays one of the worst characters of them
all. We're told he's a psychic, but he's the lamest psychic I've ever
seen. For example, when they discover the cocoon and a bloody mess of
goo, he tells them that he feels that something bad happened. Really?
Later, they've tracked Henstridge's car which has run out of gas. He
examines the car, then informs everyone that "she walked". Really?!
You think so?!?! This happens repeatedly.
Also, just as a little aside here, Species starts out with just about
the most dull, drab, and ridiculously boring credit sequence I've ever
seen. Boy, nothing gets me in the mood for a sci-fi action flick more
than five minutes of slow boring credits with absolutely nothing going
on behind them.
Most folks who enjoyed Species admit that it's retarded, but they just
like the fact that Natasha Henstridge is running around naked for the
entire film. And sure, that's good stuff. But you can have an
attractive naked girl running around and still have a good script to
back it up. And unfortunately, all Species has is the naked girl. [R]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL: http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email: chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1995-1998 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be
reprinted without permission.

Title
Review for Empire Records (1995)
Empire Records (1995) ** out of ***** - Cast: Anthony LaPaglia, Maxwell
Caulfield, Debi Mazar, Rory Cochrane, Liv Tyler, Renee Zellweger, Robin
Tunney, Ethan Randall. Written by: Carol Heikkinen. Directed by: Allan
Moyle. Running Time: 88 minutes.
"Empire Records" is a frustrating film. It brings to mind a question I often
wonder: What's worse? A bad film or a film which shows potential but yet
can't avoid going in really bad directions?
The film starts great. A record store employee, Lucas (Rory Cochrane), while
closing one night discovers that their store is about to become a part of
the dreaded Music City franchise. He sets out to save the store. And as an
indirect result of that premise, for the next 20-30 minutes, "Empire
Records" is a lot of fun.
Something goes wrong though with the film, and there's not really a specific
moment where it turns to garbage to place the blame. You see, this record
store is run by a dimwitted group of generation X-ers (so dimwitted in fact
that it boggles the mind how they can even do normal daily activities, let
alone run a business). Each one has his or her own major problems, all of
which are presented and solved in afterschool special style during the
film's 24 hour time frame. For example, there's Renee Zellweger's character.
She likes to sleep with any man available. We find out that the only reason
she does this is because she really wants to sing in a rock band (?). Then
there's Liv Tyler. She's going off to college yet she's dealing with an
addiction to speed, an overbearing father, and a desire to throw herself to
an aging rock star (Caulfield) who's visiting the record store that day.
When the film finally comes to an end, Ethan Randall's goofball character
comes off as the most normal one of the bunch. If and when you see the film
you'll realize how absurd that is.
Another aggravating feature of the film is it's needless music montage
scenes. In order to justify the film's soundtrack, too many times during the
film the characters just dance around to music for no real reason. They
certainly don't advance the weak story at all.
Anthony LaPaglia comes off best as the store's manager, a nice father figure
to the kids who work for him. But the character needed to react more to the
bizarreness going on around him than he actually does. At times I'd be
thinking "Who is running this store?" as every character would be in the
back room goofing off. He needed to be asking that question as well.
"Empire Records" could have been "Clerks" with a budget, but instead it
comes off as just another movie about a group of whiny teens. But the first
20-30 minutes are great, and worth watching. [PG-13]
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for U-571 (2000)
Cast: Matthew McConaughey, Bill Paxton, Harvey Keitel, Jon Bon Jovi,
Jake Weber, David Keith, Jack Noseworthy 
Written by: Jonathan Mostow, Sam Montgomery and David Ayer 
Directed by: Jonathan Mostow 
Running Time: 118 minutes 
The "submarine" genre of movies seems to be one of the most intriguing
and compelling types of storytelling there is.  Think about it... these
films are completely based in reality, yet only a handful of people have
ever been on one, making them fascinating to the general public.  They
aren't like movies that take place on a plane or a train, as anybody can
get on one of those.  And they aren't like movies that happen in outer
space either, because no one's done any of that stuff yet.  When a new
one comes out, you don't hear anyone say "ugh, another submarine movie"
like people tend to say "ugh, another boxing movie".  Look at modern
movies that involve submarines: Das Boot, The Abyss, The Hunt for Red
October, Crimson Tide... all are well regarded as top-notch
entertainment. 
Gladly joining that bunch is U-571, which stars Matthew McConaughey as
the executive officer of a U.S. Naval submarine during World War II. We
learn he has been denied a recommendation for his own command by his
superior (Bill Paxton).  McConaughey's crew then receives orders that
they will be boarding a disabled German submarine to steal the Enigma, a
German communications encoding device that has stumped Allied
Intelligence.  The mission goes horribly wrong however, and as a result,
McConaughey and only a handful of his crew (as well as a captured
German) become trapped aboard the U-571 in enemy waters. 
The first great thing about U-571 is the film's opening sequence.  The
German crew of U-571 are under attack, which sets the events of the rest
of the film into motion.  It's tense, exciting and fascinating.  And I
applaud the filmmakers for not copping out and instead keeping the
entire sequence in German with English subtitles.  Most movies with a
scene this long would have panicked and had the German crew speaking
English right away. 
Once the plot gets moving, U-571 gives us action sequence after action
sequence, making the audience wonder "Ok, now how do they get out of
this?".  The stakes keep raising (much like in Executive Decision, an
excellent action-thriller), and even though the audience knows how the
film will end, it's a lot of fun getting there. 
I only have two minor complaints about the entire film.  The first comes
from the scenes which follow the opening sequence.  While their purpose
is to introduce us to the characters and to get the story going (which
they do), I feel as though it could have been done much quicker, and
less conventionally.  I mean, did we really have to see the ship's crew
at a wedding?  Because of that, you now know exactly what's going to
happen to the groom! 
My other gripe would be during the film's finale.  There's an explosion
which ends the film that is one of the weakest looking CGI effects since
the President's plane crashed into the ocean at the end of Air Force
One.  I cannot stress this enough... until a CGI effect can be made to
look like a model effect, stick with using models. 
Yes, U-571 is historically incorrect and there are surely some specifics
in the plot that people who have been onboard a submarine will tell you
"that couldn't happen", but the overall point of this film is
entertainment.  It succeeds fantastically.  [PG-13]
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Batman & Robin (1997)
Batman and Robin (1997) 1/2 out of ***** - Cast: Arnold Schwarzenegger,
George Clooney, Chris O'Donnell, Uma Thurman, Alicia Silverstone, Elle
Macpherson, John Glover, Michael Gough, Pat Hingle, Jeep Swenson, Jesse
Ventura, Vendela, Vivica A. Fox, Coolio. Written by: Akiva Goldsman.
Directed by: Joel Schumacher. Running Time: 130 minutes.
Ed Wood is alive and working under the name Joel Schumacher! Run for your
lives! "Batman and Robin" is the fourth film in a movie series which, in a
span of only eight years, has managed to go from good to outstanding to bad
to stomach churning retartedness.
As the "film" begins, Batman and Robin are summoned to battle a new villain,
Mr. Freeze, who has broken into a museum and is attempting to steal a big
diamond to power his freeze machine (oh so THAT'S what diamonds are good
for). The opening scene manages to rival the opening scene of 1996's "Romeo
and Juliet" as the most ridiculous movie sequence ever put to film. Anyway,
soon they have to battle other villains as well, Poison Ivy (Thurman) and
Bane (Swenson).
George Clooney steps into the Batsuit this time and it's now official,
Batman has no personality whatsoever. It's not Clooney's fault, he's just
going by the script and by Schumacher's (shudder) direction. Batman is known
as the Dark Knight, meaning that Batman is supposed to have a dark, brooding
personality. Joel Schumacher (vomit) has managed to change all that over the
course of two films, as Batman is now a cartoon. He always has a lame pun to
spout out or an afterschool special message to deliver.
Speaking of puns, that's all Mr. Freeze has to say. He hardly has one line
of dialogue which doesn't involve a pun using any of the words: cool, cold,
ice, freeze or chill. After the first two, you're sick of it. But, alas, it
continues.
As with "Batman Forever", there are way too many characters. One villain is
all that's needed, not three. Bane is the worst of the three, which is
surprising because of what little I know of the comic books, Bane was a
major force. Here he's just a masked goon, grunting like Frankenstein's
monster. And he's also amazingly easy to defeat, as his weakness are these
big tubes coming out of his head. Pull one out, and he's dead. If he walks
into a coat rack, he's a goner. Poison Ivy is way too talky, and most of the
time she's babbling to herself, which is even more irritating.
Gotham City now represents a city which must exist on some other planet
other than Earth. The laws of gravity seem to have little effect in this
world. Also, it seems that no one really lives in Gotham, except for street
criminals, which makes me wonder why in a city protected by Batman would
there be the highest crime rate ever in the history of civilization?
Batman's not protecting anyone, as there's mass terror constantly going on
in the streets. Perhaps it's Joel Schumacher's (gag) views of capital
punishment at play here, because in both "Batman Forever" and here, long
speeches are given about how it would be wrong to kill the main villain
after he's been captured. Instead, to punish them for their crime of
attempted mass homicide, villains in Joel Schumacher's (puke) vision of
Gotham City get locked up in an asylum, which everyone knows they will break
out of in no time to kill more people.
To go into further detail about all the ridiculous aspects of this movie
would take a review longer than the written screenplay itself. So I'll just
mention the worst of the bunch. Now, when Alicia Silverstone becomes
Batgirl, she shows up late in the film to help Batman and Robin defeat
Poison Ivy. Now, keep in mind that Silverstone has been living in Wayne
Manor and chatting with Bruce Wayne and Dick Grayson for the entire film.
Also keep in mind that her Batgirl "disguise" wouldn't fool an infant.
Anyway, she arrives, cleans house, and then chats with Batman and Robin...
who DO NOT RECOGNIZE HER! She actually has to tell them who she is.
But the moment which made me groan the loudest comes at some sort of charity
auction where old men are bidding on scantily dressed women on stage. Poison
Ivy arrives and puts the audience under some sort of spell. Batman and
Robin, who are actually at a party dressed as Batman and Robin, are also
captivated by her spell. Soon the audience starts to bid on her, and Batman
and Robin join in on the bidding. Batman increases the bid to something like
seven million dollars, and then whips out, I kid you not, a Batman credit
card, complete with the Batman logo on it as well as "BATMAN" typed out on
it. This is absolutely the dumbest thing I have ever seen. Think about this
for a moment won't you? What bank honors this card? Did they call Batman to
offer him this special card? Only Batman can use this card, so do you think
Batman does his own shopping? Perhaps goes to Ace Hardware to pick up some
more Batapults and charges them to the Batcard? At that moment it became
true, the Batman movie series, which once prided itself from being 180
degrees different in tone and style from the campy 60s TV show, is now just
as good as the WORST episodes of that TV series.
I do give the film credit for two things. One is the casting of Arnold
Schwarzenegger as a villain, but I only give credit to the concept, not the
actual performance. Also, as with "Batman Forever", the film looks great. It
looks like every penny of the budget was spent on the look of the film. The
set design, costumes, and special effects are all top-notch.
I'm all for a silly summer movie. Sometimes I like shutting down most of my
brain and just enjoying a fun movie. But to consider "Batman and Robin" to
be fun, you'd have to completely tear your brain out of your head and throw
it away, never to be used again. Please someone stop Joel Schumacher before
he vomits into a film cannister again and tries to pass it off as a movie.
[PG-13]
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related
links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Escort, The (1997) (V)
The Escort (1997) NO STARS out of ***** - Running Time: 90 minutes.
Yet another direct-to-video, stupid erotic thriller. Get this plot though:
15 or so years ago, one girl tries to kiss another girl, making the other
girl feel "uncomfortable". As a result, the girl who attempted the kiss
commits suicide. Flash forward to now. The dead girl's sister has become a
high-priced call girl and one day sees an ad in the newspaper for a room for
rent. As it turns out, the room is being rented out by that very same girl
who didn't want to be kissed 15 years earlier. This sets the hooker's
sinister plans of revenge into action, a plan she's been working on for 15
years.
Now the sister becoming a whore, how does that fit into the ultimate plan of
revenge? It's never a factor into anything (well, except to add pointless
sexual scenes to the already stretched thin plot). And what would she have
done if there was never an ad in the paper, or if she missed reading the
paper that day? Are we supposed to believe that her whole plan was to become
a slut, read the paper every day for 15 years, answer every ad pertaining to
a room for rent, and just hope that one day her target happens to place an
ad, so her elaborate scheme can finally begin? Come on! [R]
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Road Trip (2000)
Cast: Breckin Meyer, Seann William Scott, Amy Smart, Tom Green, Paulo
Costanzo, DJ Qualls, Rachel Blanchard, Anthony Rapp, Fred Ward, Andy
Dick, Ethan Suplee, Horatio Sanz, Mary Lynn Rajskub 
Written by: Todd Phillips and Scot Armstrong 
Directed by: Todd Phillips 
Running Time: 91 minutes 
Screening Theater: Starnet Pablo 9 Theaters - Jacksonville Beach, FL 
For whatever reason, the genre of the raunchy sex comedy disappeared in
the late 80s.  It was revitalized in the mid-90s thanks mainly to the
efforts of the Farrelly brothers and their films Dumb and Dumber,
Kingpin, and most importantly There's Something About Mary.  Last year,
American Pie solidified the new success of the genre.  Now comes Road
Trip, and its impending success should keep the genre going well into
the future (for better or for worse).  It's certainly better than
American Pie in every way imaginable. 
Not only is Road Trip the current "bearer of the torch" for the raunchy
sex comedy genre, but it's also the breakout movie for MTV personality
Tom Green.  I'm not a fan of Green's antics on his show, but here he
proves he can be funny when he's under the restraints of a script.  I'm
usually against any kind of creative restrainment, but in Green's case
it's a good idea.  It prevents him from making screeching noises for 90
minutes straight... as he's known to do. 
Green plays Barry, the film's storyteller.  He relates the events of the
film involving him and a group of his friends to a tour group he's
leading at Ithica University.  The story that Barry tells us is this...
Josh Porter (Breckin Meyer) cheats on his lifelong girlfriend (who
attends a college halfway across the country from Josh) when he believes
that she has done the same, and he accidentally mails her a video tape
of the incident.  When he learns that his assumptions were incorrect, he
(and three of his friends, for no real reason except to give the movie
more characters) set out to intercept the package before his girlfriend
receives it. 
Now I know it's hard to argue logic with movies like this, but I do
wonder why Green seems much smarter as he's telling the story than he is
IN the story.  If you were telling a story, wouldn't you make yourself
look good?  He does take some liberties, giving a few details "his
way"... but you'd think he'd make himself look better than he comes off. 
Logic argument #2: Meyer gleefully cheats on his girlfriend because he
believes she's done the same.  When he finds out that the sex tape has
been mailed to her, he freaks out.  Now he shouldn't really care at this
point because his whole point of cheating on her was to get back at
her.  When he finds out that she was actually at her grandfather's
funeral and that she hadn't cheated on him, THAT'S when he should have
started to be upset.  It would have been funnier to have him not care
about the tape being mailed and THEN find out he was wrong. 
An unfortunate aspect of Road Trip is its rampant similarity to another
recent comedy, the little seen 1998 film Overnight Delivery starring
Paul Rudd and Reese Witherspoon.  In Overnight Delivery, Rudd and his
longtime sweetheart (Christine Taylor) attend separate colleges.  When
Rudd's character thinks that his girlfriend has cheated on him, he and
stripper Witherspoon take risqué pictures of themselves and mail them to
her, only to find out after the package was mailed that his assumptions
were wrong.  The two sent out on a cross country trek to recover the
pictures before the girlfriend gets them.  Sound similar?  
Both the situations in Overnight Delivery and Road Trip are also
initiated by the bitchy roommates of each girlfriend, and both have the
same resolution.  Now I'm not saying that Road Trip stole its story from
Overnight Delivery just because Overnight Delivery came out first,
because who knows what was written first?  Yes, the two stories are
incredibly similar, more so than they should be actually.  But it was a
major distraction to see a movie I had basically already seen before
(and much better actually). 
Most of the "big" jokes in Road Trip miss big time (the goofballs in the
screening roared at almost everything in the film though, even the
scenes that were in the film's trailer).  And speaking of trailers, add
Road Trip to the list of trailers that features scenes that aren't in
the movie itself (and I'm not referring to the scenes with Tom Green
that were shot specifically for the trailer). 
Anyway, the smaller moments worked very well, and clearly sailed right
over the heads of the aforementioned goofballs.  Lots of witty dialogue
and just the sheer energy of the cast make this movie worthwhile.  A
small, hilarious role by Andy Dick ("NewsRadio") is almost worth the
price of admission alone. 
The success of Road Trip will undoubtedly encourage even more entries in
the genre.  And as long as they include the same types of entertaining
little moments for me mixed in with the raunchiness to please the
masses, everyone should be happy. 
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
AOL Instant Messenger: FilmJax
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Art House (1998)
Cast: Dan O'Donahue, Chris Hardwick, Amy Weber, Adam Carolla, Michael A.
Goorjian, Luigi Amodeo, Cheryl Pollak 
Written by: Leigh Slawner and Dan O'Donahue 
Directed by: Leigh Slawner 
Running Time: 88 minutes 
True independent films rarely seem to work because they're always
completely disjointed and so darn serious about whatever their subject
is.  Art House comes along as a very pleasant surprise when I was just
expecting another sloppy mess of depressing ideas. 
Dan O'Donahue stars (he also co-wrote the script) as Ray McMichael, a
writer-director whose previous effort called Beach House (he wanted to
make the best film in the worst genre) was unable to find a
distributor.  He's written a new script called Art House, which he gives
to his hipster friend Weston (Chris Hardwick) to do a rewrite.  During
all this, Ray tries to find love, is forced to room with a porno actor
(Luigi Amodeo), and hangs out with an new acting superstar (Michael A.
Goorjian from SLC Punk!)... the usual life of someone in an independent
film of course. 
Art House is smartly written and the performances are engaging.  While
the film contains all the randomness and familiar situations of most
indie films (characters hang out in a cyber cafe, talk about the
Hollywood system being evil, have pointless conversations about The
Cartoon Network, etc.), it's tied together cohesively enough to be not
only entertaining but also very funny.  At one point, in response to the
popularity of swing music, Ray tells his ex-girlfriend that it'll only
be six months until a new bandwagon is jumped on and the film "Breakin'
3:Cosmic Jubilee" is made.  It's a great line, and it even has a pay off
joke later in the movie.  Even the obligitory indie film cameo from porn
star Ron Jeremy is well done. 
Dan O'Donahue's character is refreshingly original... he's a ordinary
guy with a good head on his shoulders.  Several times in the film his
character is faced with a choice, and while the majority of movies would
have him making the wrong one, Art House does it right.  Donahue and
Michael A. Goorjain (who gives a good performance as an big shot actor
who knows he's actually talentless) should be faces to watch for in the
future.  Even Chris Hardwick and Adam Carolla (both from MTV, among
other things) do fine jobs. 
To make this film even more intriguing, I discovered during my research
that Leigh Slawner and Dan O'Donahue actually MADE the movie Beach House
back in 1995.  So if what I read was correct and not just a clever
internet marketing ploy, the film receiving constant mention in Art
House actually exists... it's a genuine full-length movie and was indeed
unable to find a distributor.  That's got to be a first.  Very clever
guys... I applaud you.  And now I really want to see Beach House, which
must be the Citizen Kane of beach party movies. 
Art House is available on VHS as a part of Hollywood Video's "First
Rites" program.  Hollywood Video is now distributing low budget indie
films exclusively to its rental stores.  The video includes an
entertaining introduction from the director as he wanders the aisles of
a local Hollywood Video trying to get people to rent his film. 
So the next time you're at Hollywood Video and you're convinced you've
seen everything on the new release wall but aren't sure if you'll like
that independent film you've passed by six times now... take my word for
it.  If you like low-key, smart, and entertaining comedies then pick up
that copy of Art House.  [R]
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Big Trouble in Little China (1986)
Cast: Kurt Russell, Kim Cattrall, Dennis Dun, James Hong, Victor Wong,
Kate Burton, Donald Li, Jerry Hardin 
Written by: Gary Goldman and David Z. Weinstein 
Adapted by: W.D. Richter 
Directed by: John Carpenter 
Running Time: 99 minutes 
"I'd go with you but..." 
"I know, there's a problem with your face." 
 --- Typical (and hilarious) dialogue exchange between lawyer Gracie Law
(Kim Cattrall) and trucker Jack Burton, in the action-comedy Big Trouble
in Little China. 
Martial arts, fantasy, action, comedy, romance, drama, science fiction,
horror... all these genres finally come together in one movie.  John
Carpenter's Big Trouble in Little China is that movie, and it sits along
side Halloween and The Thing as one of his best films. 
Truck driver Jack Burton (Kurt Russell, playing the role with just a
touch of John Wayne) rolls into Chinatown and wins a sizable cash sum
while gambling with his friend Wang (Dennis Dun).  Wang has some
business to attend to before he can pay Jack, so Jack tags along to
ensure he gets his winnings.  Jack and Wang wind up in the middle of
mystical war between good and evil, with a 2000 year old demon sorcerer
named Lo Pan (James Hong) leading the charge for evil. 
I remember discovering this little gem of a movie at the discount
theater in my town, right before school started up for the fall.  After
seeing it, I went back countless times... making sure both friends and
family came along as well.  What a great time at the movies this was. 
Carpenter says that what he likes most about this film is how somewhere
along the way, the hero becomes the sidekick, the sidekick becomes the
hero, and the two are never aware of the switch.  This is absolutely the
film's main appeal... contrary to what studio execs might have thought
at the time (they requested Carpenter add the scene which begins the
film to make Burton seem more like a hero).  It's a blast to see these
two character-types reversed.  It works wonders for what might have
otherwise been a simple Indiana Jones clone. 
It's interesting to note Kurt Russell's performance here.  While he's no
Robert DeNiro, Russell is a very fine actor in his own right.  Just take
for example the five times Russell has teamed up with Carpenter: Escape
from New York and Escape from L.A., Elvis, The Thing, and Big Trouble in
Little China.  While all but one of those films is an action film,
Russell's performance completely differs in each one.  Of the five, Jack
Burton might just be my favorite. 
As a sidenote, the mid-80s really excelled in some great looking
lightning and other electrical effects.  Movies like this one, Weird
Science and My Science Project all featured this really well done type
of effect (using nothing more than simple animation basically) that just
can't be properly duplicated by today's CGI workstations. 
Big Trouble in Little China is available on DVD in an excellent special
edition package from Fox Home Entertainment.  This two-disc set features
a number of quality extras that should satisfy even the die hard fans of
this film.  The first disc features the film in its original widescreen
theatrical aspect ratio of 2.35:1, anamorphically enhanced.  The film's
transfer looks incredibly good, and the audio is equally impressive. 
The menu screens are nifty here as well, recreating the main set from
the end of the film and having the menu selections interact with it. 
The main extra feature on this first disc is a full length commentary
track with director John Carpenter and star Kurt Russell. 
If you're familiar with the commentary tracks on The Thing and for
Escape From New York (laserdisc only at this time, unfortunately), then
you're in for another treat with this one.  Best nugget of info I
learned here is that the original script was for a western (!) until
writer/director W.D. Richter (The Adventures of Buckaroo Banzai) adapted
it to a modern day setting.  Had this film been made as a western, I
believe it would have successfully melded every single genre of
filmmaking. 
Watching and commenting on the film is essentially abandoned about
halfway through, so while its not exactly screen specific, listening to
these two men reminisce is simply delightful.  Russell gets in a couple
of anonymous shots at his (then) upcoming disaster 3000 Miles To
Graceland, and poses an interesting theory late in the track about the
current state of movies today and how many young directors have no
vision.  It's strange though that Carpenter agrees with Russell's
assessment, since this was Carpenter's last "great" film to date. 
Carpenter also spends a lot of time mentioning Kurt Russell's film
Captain Ron. 
Disc two features a number of additional extras.  First up is a rather
large collection of deleted scenes, alternate takes, and an extended
ending, all presented in what might be the best way I can think of to
present such material.  Each selection is first given a text screen,
explaining the deleted material and why it was cut.  Then, many times
you're given the option of watching either the workprint or the video
master version, which gives you a choice of quality and a choice between
seeing just the deleted footage by itself, or as it would have been fit
into a particular scene.  Great stuff here. 
A video interview with special effects guru Richard Edlund is also on
the second disc, and it makes great use of both the still gallery
feature and the multiple angle feature.  I rarely find still galleries
worthwhile, but the minds behind this disc found a way to do it right. 
Edlund is filmed in a sort of "TV news" manner where he's on one side of
the screen, leaving empty space on the other side for graphics.  It's in
this space that you'll see a montage of special effects stills, mostly
relevant to what Edlund is talking about at that given moment.  Then, by
using the angle feature on your DVD player, you can select to see the
still montage full frame, while the audio of the interview plays
underneath.  Great, great stuff.
Also on the second disc is an absolutely goofy and typically 1980s music
video for the film's theme song "Big Trouble in Little China" (which
plays over the film's end credits).  The song is performed by "The Coupe
de Villes", a group consisting of John Carpenter, Nick Castle
(Halloween's Michael Myers) and Tommy Lee Wallace (director of Halloween
III: Season of the Witch).  My only question: Did this actually receive
airtime somewhere?  I can't imagine that it would have, as it really
helps to define the word "uncool".  In any case, it's a rare extra
feature related to the film and its fun to own. 
Rounding out the extras on the second disc are three trailers for the
film (one of which is in Spanish), six TV spots (including one for Pay
Per View), biographies for the cast and crew, a still gallery, and two
magazine articles from the time of the film's release.  The articles are
the only part of this release that even comes close to being considered
a negative, but only because the text is a little too small to read (on
most televisions anyway).  Hidden on the second disc (although not hard
to find) are additional trailers for Aliens and The Fly in a gallery
called "Summer 1986", and screenshots from the Commodore 64 computer
game version of the film. 
Fox had high hopes for Big Trouble in Little China (it was their July
4th weekend release in 1986) and apparently due to a poor advertising
campaign, the film wasn't as successful as it should have been.  So it
was surprising that they've given this film a super-deluxe DVD package. 
If you've never seen the film before, definitely give these discs a
spin.  It's a great set for a fun flick... and is one of the best DVD
releases of 2001. PG-13
-- 
Chuck Dowling, Editor in Chief - The Jacksonville Film Journal
Specializing in reviews of DVDs, cult favorites and the indie scene.
http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/
Proud Member of the Online Film Critics Society - http://www.ofcs.org/

Title
Review for Blair Witch Project, The (1999)
Cast: Heather Donahue, Michael C. Williams, Joshua Leonard
Written and Directed by: Daniel Myrick and Eduardo Sanchez
Running Time: 87 minutes
Date Reviewed: July 30, 1999
In October of 1994, three student filmmakers disappeared in the woods
near Burkittsville,
Maryland, while shooting a documentary.  One year later, their footage
was found.  Thus
begins The Blair Witch Project, one of the best (yet extremely
frustrating) thriller/horror
movies to be released in a long, long time.
As this ultra low budget movie begins we follow the doomed film crew
consisting of Heather the director (Heather Donahue), Josh the
cameraman (Joshua Leonard), and Mike the sound guy (Michael
C. Williams) getting ready to begin their documentary.  They set out
to the town of Burkittsville, Maryland and begin to interview the
locals about an urban legend of sorts...  the story of the Blair
Witch.  Various soundbites are gathered, and then on day two the crew
sets off into the woods.  They are never seen again.  The audience
however, vaguely gets to see what happened to them over the next few
days, thanks to Heather's inexplicable urge to film every terrifying
moment of their ordeal.
All of the critical praise this film is getting might just work
against it with the casual moviegoer.  In countless ads and reviews
the word "scary" is used over and over again.  "It's scary as hell."
"The scariest movie ever."  Saying the film is scary is only going to
frustrate the casual moviegoer who is expecting Poltergeist or The
Haunting.  There are no special effects, no scary music, and no
monsters.  Don't get me wrong though, it is CREEPY as hell (especially
the film's final 30 seconds or so).
However slight, there is actually a difference between scary and
creepy.  A scary movie would be something that makes you jump or even
scream out loud, either by genuine terror or through those cheesy
music cues when a cat jumps out of nowhere.  A creepy movie like The
Blair Witch Project sets the stage for something scary to happen...
but ultimately never delivers.  Nothing ever makes you jump and
nothing ever makes you scream, even though the stage is fully set for
that to happen at any given moment.
Now let me give credit where credit it due.  When The Blair Witch
Project tries to be creepy it succeeds masterfully.  As the crew
settles down each night to sleep, that's when things start to get
creepy.  Basically, whenever the sun goes down, get ready to almost be
scared.  That's mainly what kept frustrating me though.  Sometimes the
night would go by too quickly.  If Heather is going to insist on
continuing to film these now nightmarish conditions they are being
exposed to, you would think that there would be more of these night
scenes.  Instead, there's more of the "human drama" which takes place
during the daytime.
The three principle cast members are all new to the film world, and
all are very good here.  I'm sure the casting was based simply on
budgetary constraints, but the film just wouldn't have been as
effective with any familiar faces.  As a result of the casting, you
feel like you're watching a real documentary.
In today's day and age of whiz bang CGI effects and no-brainer Kevin
Williamson crud, I'm all for the "less is more" approach for the
horror genre.  The Blair Witch Project takes that a step further,
opting for the "nothing is even less than less is more, so we'll give
you nothing" approach.  The filmmakers lull you into a false sense of
security with the first half of the film, which is basically just a
humorous story about low budget documentarians.  Then the creepiness
sets in which is very effective, but as I said it ultimately never
pays off.  We know just as much about what happens to these people
when the movie begins as we do when the final credits roll.  In a way
that bothers me, but the movie is entertaining and original enough to
make me overlook it's non-payoff.
Artisan Entertainment (the distributor of the film) has set up an
EXTENSIVE and very cool web site for The Blair Witch Project.  Check
it out.  Also, there's a special hour long documentary airing on The
Sci-Fi Channel called Curse of the Blair Witch that actually manages
to blur the lines between reality and the fantasy of this movie even
further.  [R]
Chuck Dowling -- chuckd21@leading.net
The Jacksonville Film Journal
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted
without permission.

Title
Review for Big Momma's House (2000)
Cast: Martin Lawrence, Nia Long, Paul Giamatti, Jascha Washington,
Terrence Dashon Howard, Anthony Anderson, Ella Mitchell 
Written by: Darryl Quarles and Don Rhymer 
Directed by: Raja Gosnell 
Running Time: 98 minutes 
Screening Theater: Starnet Pablo 9 Theaters - Jacksonville Beach, FL 
What happens when you put Martin Lawrence in a fat suit in real life? 
You get Martin Lawrence in a coma (the comedian thought he was getting
fat, so he put on numerous layers of heavy clothing and went jogging in
100 degree heat, ending up in a coma).  So what happens when you put
Martin Lawrence in a fat suit in the movies?  You get an audience in a
coma. 
In Big Momma's House, Lawrence plays a FBI agent who's a master of
disguises.  When a naughty, naughty man escapes from jail and seeks out
his former girlfriend (the very sexy Nia Long... the only thing worth
looking at in this movie), she flees to Georgia to stay with her rather
large Southern aunt "Big Momma" (Ella Mitchell).  The FBI follows her in
order to recover the large sum of money stolen in the bank robbery that
sent the naughty man to jail.  However, Big Momma is called away on an
emergency.  Sensing that they could lose their only chance to capture
the criminal, Lawrence goes undercover as Big Momma.  And let the comedy
begin! 
Big Momma's House is the definition of a "gimmick" movie if there ever
was one.  The plot can basically be summed up as "Martin Lawrence
dresses up as a fat woman"... and even that description is too wordy. 
You can just see this script plotted out on a chalkboard with MARTIN
LAWRENCE/FAT WOMAN in the middle of the board with a big circle around
it, and all sorts of clichéd, "humorous" situations pointing to it.  Fat
woman plays basketball!  Fat woman takes a dump!  Fat woman kung fu! 
Well they left one off the board... movie critic slips into coma! 
Paul Giamatti (Private Parts, The Negotiator) plays Lawrence's partner
and as much as I enjoy his work, even he can't inject life into this
lifeless comedy.  Hell, the greatest performers on the planet couldn't
make this material work... it's just that awful. 
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
AOL Instant Messenger: FilmJax
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Bad Manners (1997)
Solid performances and some well plotted story elements make this filmed
version of a stage play worthwhile.  Wes and Nancy (David Strathairn and
Bonnie Bedelia) are a long married but "romantically challenged" couple
whose lives are interrupted by the appearance of Nancy's old flame Matt
(Saul Rubinek) and his young, outspoken girlfriend Kim (Caroleen
Feeney).   
Matt and Kim stay with Wes and Nancy while Matt delivers a musicology
lecture at Harvard.  Matt believes that he has found God's influence in
a piece of computer generated music, and Wes obsesses that Kim has
stolen 50 dollars from his wallet.  What follows is an unpredictable
series of events that rivals David Mamet's Oleanna in the whole "no
matter which side you take... you're wrong" area.  You won't see events
coming, and even when the film's over you'll still be wondering about
what you saw.  The more I think about this film, the more I like about
it. 
Note: Bad Manners is based on a Steppenwolf Theater play called Ghost in
the Machine.  I'm guessing that the title was changed to Bad Manners to
avoid confusion with the 1993 Karen Allen movie called Ghost in the
Machine that no one ever saw.  Although won't people now confuse it with
the 1984 Karen Black movie called Bad Manners that no one ever saw? 
Bad Manners is available on DVD from Bell Canyon Entertainment.  It
contains the film in its original widescreen theatrical aspect ratio, a
full length audio commentary track featuring director Jonathan Kaufer
and cast member Saul Rubinek, a behind the scenes documentary featuring
interviews with the cast and crew that runs about 20 minutes, and the
usual cast biographies and filmographies. 
Director Jonathan Kaufer has tried an interesting experiment with the
commentary track on the DVD of Bad Manners.  During the track, several
guest stars (Marcia Strassman, Penny Marshall, Carrie Fisher, Peter
Riegert) appear, thinking that the director and Saul Rubinek are
recording a commentary track for their 1982 film Soup For One.  The main
problem with this though is that these gimmicky guest stars tend to
barge in when Kaufer and Rubinek are saying something INTERESTING about
the film's production.  After the pre-scripted "spontaneous"
interruptions are over, the two rarely go back to their previous train
of thought.  Good idea, bad execution. 
The DVD is very nice despite that one complaint though, and it's one of
the few discs that actually made me take note of its menu screens.  The
disc's menus are done in a blue-white "wintery" style mixed with images
from the film and scored by the Tori Amos song "Putting the Damage On"
which appears in the film's closing credits (a song which is impossible
to get out of your head once you hear it).  Even the DVD credits
selection is entertaining.  My hats off to the folks responsible for
this disc.  [R]
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
AOL Instant Messenger: FilmJax
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Castaway Cowboy, The (1974)
Cast: James Garner, Vera Miles, Robert Culp, Eric Shea 
Written by: Don Tait, Richard Bluel and Hugh Benson 
Directed by: Vincent McEveety 
Running Time: 91 minutes 
James Garner's charm goes a long way in this Walt Disney western about
Lincoln Costain (Garner), a Texas cowboy who mysteriously washes up on
the shore of a small Hawaiian island (it's unclear as to how he actually
got there... something nefarious no doubt).  He is rescued and taken in
by widowed potato farmer Henrieatta MacAvoy (Vera Miles) and her son
Booton (Eric Shea).  We soon learn that their potato farm is going
under. 
The crops are being trampled and destroyed by wild cattle you see, and
after Henrieatta sees Garner rescue her son from a charging bull, she
convinces him to stay on the island and help her raise cattle.  Two
problems: the hired hands on the farm are a bunch of silly Hawaiian
natives who would rather goof off than work, and the note to the land is
in the hands of a shady businessman (Robert Culp) who wants to ensure
that the farm never becomes profitable.  So, you think there might be
some silly hijinx with the Hawaiians trying to learn how to become
cowboys?  Any guess as to who ends up with the land by film's end?  Sure
you'll know the answers to these questions before you start the film,
but it's still mildly entertaining nonetheless. 
It is nice to go back and watch some of the old Disney live action films
again... reminding me of a time when Disney films focused on simple fun
and good natured values.  Garner is great as the "cowboy out of water"
(he even breaks into song at one point, with full orchestration!), but
Culp is wasted as one of the nicest, most restrained villains in movie
history.  I wouldn't have even know he was the bad guy had I not read
the back of the case.  Culp never really gets to have fun with his role,
which is a shame because given the chance he could have been
particularly slimy and fun (he does get to wear a cool suit though). 
The Castaway Cowboy also boasts a good score and some nice location
shooting.  The fun, campy moment of the film comes when Costain tracks
down a witch doctor in some caves and the two battle it out. 
Two off-putting things though: nearly every scene is dubbed, and every
once in a while a shot will be edited in using the characters in front
of a blue screen (or rear projection or whatever it was back then), when
there seems to be no reason for it.  For example, two characters will be
talking to a third at a beachside resturaunt... two of them are actually
there, but the third is on a soundstage with footage of the beach
running behind them.  Weird. 
The Castaway Cowboy is available on DVD from Anchor Bay Entertainment. 
The disc contains the film in full-frame only and features no extras
whatsoever.  The print isn't exactly what I would call pristine either
(the phrase "fair at best" comes to mind), as the image is plenty grainy
and filled with artifacts.  It's a shame this film wasn't given better
treatment... it's a fun little western that's good for young and old
alike. 
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
AOL Instant Messenger: FilmJax
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Folks! (1992)
In Folks, Tom Selleck has to travel to Florida to admit his mother into a
hospital for an operation. There he discovers that his father (Ameche) is
rapidly losing his mind. After their trailer burns down, Selleck takes his
parents back home with him. Soon after, he loses his job, his car, his
furniture, his apartment, and his wife and kids leave him. Sounds like an
engaging drama about family and Alzheimer's disease right? Wrong, it's a
comedy. An attempted one anyway.
In the first ten minutes, Folks establishes itself as a wacky physical
comedy. Then we meet Selleck's dad (who we're told has something like Senior
Senility Disorder Complex but don't be fooled, it's just a nice way to say
Alzheimer's) and now for some reason the writer can't decide whether or not
to write a comedy or a drama. We're supposed to feel sad when Ameche puts
his shorts on backwards, but minutes later we're supposed to laugh
hysterically when he drives his car backwards at about 90 miles per hour
almost killing half a dozen people. The whole next hour is just like that.
Then, the film takes a truly bizarre turn when Selleck's mother suggests
that Selleck should kill them in order to get the insurance money. Most
people would find this twist to be repulsive, but me and my sick, twisted
mind enjoyed it. We're talking dark, dark comedy here. If the writer could
had left out the social commentary about the elderly and just stuck to
comedy, Folks would have been one hilarious movie.
Have A Question Or Comment? Email Me At chuckd21@southeast.net
Please visit my movie reviews web site at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
You'll be glad you did.

Title
Review for Quick Change (1990)
Quick Change (1990) ***** out of ***** - Cast: Bill Murray, Geena Davis,
Randy Quaid, Jason Robards, Bob Elliott, Phil Hartman, Tony Shalhoub,
Stanley Tucci, Victor Argo, Philip Bosco, Kurtwood Smith. Written by: Howard
Franklin. Based on the book by: Jay Cronley. Directed by: Howard Franklin
and Bill Murray. Running Time: 89 minutes.
Bill Murray (who also co-produced and co-directed) stars as Grimm, a
disgruntled New York city official who, with the help of his girlfriend
Phyllis (Geena Davis) and his lifelong dim-witted friend Loomis (Randy
Quaid), manage to pull off a brilliant bank robbery. Their only problem is
now, with the police in pursuit, they can't manage to get out of the city.
"Quick Change" is a very funny film, right up there with "Ghostbusters" as
one of Murray's best. The three get into one unexpected situation after
another, each one leaving you thinking "Ok, NOW what are they supposed to
do?" There are plenty of laughs, and the level of comedy stays consistant
throughout. Murray and Quaid are hilarious, and Davis is actually watchable,
unlike the roles she takes now. The supporting cast is also fine, with Tony
Shalhoub (TV's "Wings") a standout as a cab driver who doesn't know a single
word of english.
For some reason the studio abandoned this film, as they released it without
hardly any promotion whatsoever. That makes it one of the best comedies of
all time that no one ever saw. That's a shame, it's fantastic entertainment.
[R]
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Winner, The (1996)
Cast: Rebecca DeMornay, Vincent D'Onofrio, Delroy Lindo, Frank Whaley,
Michael Madsen, Billy Bob Thornton
Written by: Wendy Riss (based on her stage play)
Directed by: Alex Cox
Running Time: 92 minutes
When I see something has been based on a stage play, that's usually a
sign that the movie I'm about to watch will be horribly bad.  Stage
plays very rarely (if ever) translate well to the film screen.  Then I
thought that maybe the top-notch cast in The Winner would make the
film an exception.  I was wrong.
In The Winner, Vincent D'Onofrio plays a seemingly dimwitted gambler
who all of a sudden starts to win every time he plays on Sundays.
Soon, all sorts of low-lifes are trying to swindle him out of his
money.  Sound good?  Well it sure should have been.
The film had some potential, but it was wrecked by the staging of each
and every scene.  Each scene feels like a scene in a play and not one
in a movie.  They feel as though they are all being improvised,
something which may fit right into a play, but just is uncomfortable
to watch on film.  Especially since these are exactly stage actors out
there on the screen (don't get me wrong, it's a great cast... but some
actors just can't do both stage and screen).  And even though it seems
that I've written this many many times lately, but Frank Whaley is
again woefully miscast, this time as a cheap thug.  Is anyone advising
him on his choice of roles?
I guess if I was one of those silly critics like Joel Siegel I'd end
this review with something retarded like "The Winner is a loser".
Wouldn't that be cute?  Well, it might be true, but I'm just not going
to do it.  [R]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL: http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email: chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1995-1998 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be
reprinted without permission.

Title
Review for Heat (1995)
(1995) ** - C:Robert De Niro, Al Pacino, Val Kilmer, Tom Sizemore, Jon
Voight, Ashley Judd, Wes Studi, Mykelti Williamson, Natalie Portman, Jeremy
Piven, Hank Azaria.
Finally, the two greatest actors of our generation, De Niro and Pacino,
appear together in a film (they were both in "Godfather II" but never shared
a scene together). Actually, one could almost argue that they don't share a
scene together in "Heat" either. Their characters have three scenes
together, but the way they are shot, the two never really appear on screen
at the same time, which is a huge disappointment, much like the film itself.
I have a theory about "Heat" and the people who like it. I have seen the
film twice now. The first time I left the theater thinking, "Hmmmm, well
that was pretty good." Here's why. You go into the film with huge
expectations. I mean, De Niro and Pacino! Cops verses bad guys! A heist
movie! How bad can it be? Also, the film is almost three hours long. Well,
there must be a lot of story to tell here. Then, when the film ends, a
triumphant music score plays as you're leaving the theater, making you think
that you've just seen a good movie. So people leave with the impression they
they have just watched a fine motion picture. But, there were many things
that started to bother me the more that I thought about them, so I decided
to give the film a second chance when released on video. And I was right in
my assumptions.
I asked others who had liked "Heat" what exactly it was that they liked
about the film. No one could really answer the question. A friend of mine
told me that the film was all about how people change, which is a ridiculous
statement to me and if you read on you'll understand why.
The rest of this review contains spoilers, so if you haven't seen the film I
suggest you stop reading here.
I have no problem with long movies. As long as a movie is good, it can go on
forever as far as I'm concerned. But "Heat" is unnecessarily long. Countless
subplots are completely unnecessary, and scenes run on forever. For example,
Pacino and his girlfriend have a discussion, and Pacino gets mad and storms
out of the room. The scene should end. But no, he goes to the kitchen, looks
around, stands there and thinks, and then exits. A minute and a half to two
minutes that we don't need to see. And many scenes are like that. Characters
looking at things, reacting to things forever, stuff we just don't need to
see.
There are so many unnecessary subplots here. For the first hour and a half,
every few scenes or so we see this black guy applying for a job, talking to
his girlfriend, etc. What does this have to do with anything? His character
does figure into the big heist at the end, but why is his character worthy
of background info? We don't get any on the characters that we are
interested in. De Niro's a crook, that's all we ever get to know. Tom
Sizemore and Val Kilmer work for him, that's all we know. How do they all
know each other? How long have they been working together? Never explained.
Nah, we don't need to know that, but let's watch this very minor character
cook on a grill at a diner and argue with his boss. Yeah, ok. Then there's
the daughter of Pacino's girlfriend, who towards the end of the film
attempts suicide. Pointless, has nothing to do with anything. No reason we
have to be subjected to that. Her character was only in two other scenes, so
who cares? There are two romantic subplots here and neither of them work
because neither of them are interesting.
Then, there's stuff that just doesn't make any sense. De Niro's character
seems to be very detailed about his work. Everything is planned perfectly
and back-up plans are always ready to go. He knows exactly what he's doing
and where he'll be at all times. Yet for the first heist of the film he's
hired this psychotic to work with his team. And this guy is really nuts.
Obviously he would have some sort of criminal record, something De Niro
would have checked. Also, after the heist the four criminals leave a
resturaunt and proceed to attempt to kill the psycho because he almost
botched the heist, because he's a psycho. So De Niro beats him to the
ground, pulls out his gun and prepares to blow the psycho away as the team
watches. Then a police car drives by, distracting them for about three
seconds. They look down, the psycho is gone. They look around, but in a
period of about ten seconds the psycho has completely vanished without
making a sound. Ridiculous.
"Heat" is by no means anywhere close to being original. There's not one
scene in the film that hasn't been done a million times before. For example,
De Niro and crew are planning the final heist and they know that Pacino and
the other cops are on their trail. So they all discuss if they should
participate or not. When they get to Tom Sizemore, they tell him, "Look,
you've got a wife, a kid, and you have more money than you could ever spend
in a lifetime... don't do this. Walk away now." Sizemore refuses, and they
keep pressuring him, remind him of what he has. So obviously Sizemore is
going to die. It's a ridiculous cliche. And he does. Also, there's a scene
in the film towards the end that if it had stopped there and the credits
would have rolled, I would have been satisfied. It's when De Niro is driving
away with his new girlfriend, smiling because he's finally happy, and when
Pacino and his girlfriend are in the hospital waiting for the daughter to
recover. Pacino tells her that he'll be there for her when she needs him.
This would had been slightly more original because THEN the film would have
been about how people can change. But no, De Niro turns the car around to
take care of some more crime business, and Pacino runs off to catch him. Oh,
so the cop keeps being a cop and the criminal keeps being a criminal. Gee,
I've never seen that before in my life. Groundbreaking.
I place complete blame for this dismal failure on writer/director Michael
Mann. He just had no earthly idea what he ws doing here. He had no control
over Pacino, because every once in a while he would break into his character
from "Scent of a Woman", yelling at times for no reason. He had a nice
trailer put together for the film, and then used different takes in the
actual film itself. But the takes used in the trailer were much better than
the actual takes that were in the film! Val Kilmer's character has maybe
eight lines and spends most of the film wandering around with a weird
expression on his face like his head is empty or something. "Heat" had SO
much potential that the first time you see it, you just can't admit that it
was bad, because you so desperately wanted it to be good. And the truth is
that it's just as bad as everything else, it just has better actors in it.
Please visit my movie reviews web site at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
You'll be glad you did.

Title
Review for Lost in Space (1998)
Cast: Gary Oldman, William Hurt, Matt LeBlanc, Mimi Rogers, Heather
Graham, Lacey Chabert, Jack Johnson, and cameos from some of the stars
of the TV series.
Written by: Akiva Goldsman
Directed by: Stephen Hopkins
Running Time: 130 minutes
Akiva Goldsman, the writer and producer of Lost in Space is the same
person who joined forces with that hideous monster Joel Schumacher to
help obliterate the Batman franchise. Now Goldsman has left Schumacher
behind, looking to destroy some other beloved series. Thankfully, he
picked one that wasn't so established to begin with.
I remember watching the TV series Lost in Space as a kid. It was a
fairly entertaining show as far as cheesy sci-fi goes, but I haven't
seen a frame of it since I was oh, six years old. So the fact that
it's based on something I watched as a kid had no influence on my
opinion whatsoever. It holds no special place in my heart or anything
like that.
The year is 2058. Earth has almost exhausted all of it's natural
resources and now the Robinson family, led by brilliant scientist John
Robinson (William Hurt), venture out into the galaxy to find new
resources for our planet. Now two things: this is only 60 years in the
future? Goldsman's a little too ambitious there if you ask me. We
can't even control a remote-controlled car on Mars for more than two
days. We're supposed to be space travelling to the farthest reaches of
the galaxy with ease in the next 60 years? And also, you want to know
why our natural resources are almost exhausted? Look no farther than
all the spaceship cars and orbiting space stations we've built. So
humans have used up all of our natural resources to build ships to
help us look for more natural resources? Anyway, it seems we're in
some sort of civil war with ourselves over the space exploration
stuff.
A faction of terrorists hope to sabotage the mission by destroying the
Robinson family and their spacecraft. The evil Dr. Smith (Gary Oldman,
in full bad guy mode) sneaks on board to do just that, but is knocked
unconscious before the launch. The ship launches, mayhem ensues, and
to make a long story short... Dr. Smith, the Robinson family, and
their pilot Major Don West (Matt LeBlanc) end up millions of miles
from home. Now they're lost in space, get it?
What's fun about Lost in Space is seeing how many plots from other
(and better) sci-fi movies and TV shows you can spot.  Look, it's the
crash of the Enterprise from Star Trek:Generations! Now it's the Death
Star battle scene from Return of the Jedi! Now it's The Black Hole!
Now it's Star Trek:The Motion Picture!  Now it's... well you get the
idea. Actually most of the second half of the film is nothing but a
redressed version of the second half of Star Trek:Generations. There's
hardly one original concept in the whole picture.
Goldsman has unfortunately brought along his trusty one-liner book,
and it's amazing that he had any left over after "Batman and
Robin". And I can't say this enough... I hate one-liners! What makes
it even worse is that, the characters are using puns and phrases from
NOW, surely by 2058 they'd be considered obsolete. If a teenager today
was saying lines from the 1930s like "She's the cat's meow" or
"23-skidoo" they'd be beaten to a bloody pulp.
Watching "Lost in Space" is a lot like watching the film portions of
some big interactive ride at Epcot or Universal Studios. If I was six
years old again, I'm sure that I'd think the new version of Lost in
Space was great stuff. And six year olds seem to be it's target
audience, what with the silly brother-sister spats and cute little
aliens and all. It's a marketing bonanza, with action figures and
Happy Meals clearly right around the corner.
The performances by the men in the film are good, but the female
characters are all sadly wasted. And the youngest daughter Penny
(Lacey Chabert) makes me uncomfortable because I'm not sure what to
say about her. She could either be six years old or eighteen years
old. The effects are good for the most part, although a couple do look
really phony and therefore unconvincing. The best thing about the
whole film is what we're treated to as the closing credits roll. We
get a techno version of the old TV show's theme. That almost made it
all worthwhile. Almost.  [PG-13]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL: http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email: chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1995-1998 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be
reprinted without permission.

Title
Review for Bedroom Window, The (1987)
Cast: Steve Guttenberg, Elizabeth McGovern, Isabelle Huppert, Paul
Shenar, Carl Lumbly, Wallace Shawn, Frederick Coffin, Brad Greenquist,
Robert Schenkkan, Maury Chaykin 
Written and Directed by: Curtis Hanson 
Running Time: 113 minutes 
Curtis Hanson (L.A. Confidential) wrote and directed this effective
Hitchcockian thriller.  Sylvia (Isabelle Huppert) witnesses a vicious
attempted murder from the bedroom window of her lover Terry (Steve
Guttenberg).  When Terry learns that the attacker murdered someone
minutes later, he knows Sylvia must come forward with what she saw. 
However if she testifies, their secret affair will be out.  So Terry
decides to go to the police in her place, relating the details of what
she saw as she described them to him. 
When Terry goes to court for the matter, the defense attorney (a
suitably slimy Wallace Shawn) tears his testimony to shreds.  The
police, now realizing that they've been lied to, want to know how Terry
could possibly know since intricate details of the case.  Terry then
becomes the lead suspect in the case, with no way out in sight. 
Guttenberg is miscast as the lead here, as he can't quite shake his
Carey Mahoney / Police Academy mindset.  He plays his role with a
constant smirk on his face, seemingly never taking the matters at hand
seriously.  He's not bad here mind you, but he's just not completely
conveying the emotions of someone in the situation his character is in. 
Also miscast is Elizabeth McGovern who plays the girl that was
attacked.  At one point late in the film McGovern is supposed to convey
sexyness, but well... she just... can't.  McGovern just has that
"innocent farm girl who's been protected from all the evils in the
world" look to her, and sexy just doesn't work for her.  Not on this
level anyway. 
I give director Hanson and his crew a lot of credit for not only the
sheer entertainment value of the film, but also for how the film looks. 
The story takes place in Baltimore, but Hanson was able to use locations
there that make the city seem foreign, as if the story was happening in
Italy or Spain.  I've visited Baltimore before and thought it just
looked like a nice metro American city.  Hanson was able to show me
otherwise, and that look adds to the intrigue of the story.  [Note: I do
have to deduct some of those technical kudos however, as in one scene
where Guttenberg is driving somewhere you can clearly see a crew member
in red wandering around behind the car.  Inexcusable.] 
While there are some suspenseful moments in the film, what gave me the
chills as I was watching The Bedroom Window was noting that the two
people I'm watching (Guttenberg and McGovern) have vanished off the face
of the Earth.  Now THAT'S scary. 
The Bedroom Window is available on DVD from Anchor Bay Entertainment. 
The disc contains the film in its original theatrical aspect ratio of
2.35:1 (and is enhanced for 16x9 televisions), and includes the original
theatrical trailer. 
The trailer for this film is interesting to see (as is the DVD insert,
which is a reproduction of the original poster and box art), because the
ad campaign for this film actually says "In the tradition of the master
of suspense".  This wasn't a quote from a critic, this is what the PR
company decided would be the best way to advertise the film.  While I
have no real problem with this... shouldn't Alfred Hitchcock's name have
been mentioned?  The general public going to see this film at the time
wouldn't have had any idea who the "master of suspense" is. 
Featuring a good transfer for a little film from over 13 years ago,
Anchor Bay gets a big hand for continually restoring and releasing the
smaller films out there that might have otherwise been forgotten.  If
you like suspense thrillers, then this is a good disc to add to your
library. [R]
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
AOL Instant Messenger: FilmJax
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Jingle All the Way (1996)
Jingle All the Way (1996) *1/2 out of ***** - C:Arnold Schwarzenegger,
Sinbad, Phil Hartman, Rita Wilson, Robert Conrad, James Belushi.
How is it that Arnold can make such high concept action films and such low
concept comedies? This is a completely absurd film that should insult anyone
over the age of 10. Arnold plays a normal father who, in what is now the
most overused character description in films, works all the time to support
his family therefore not having enough free time to spend with them. After
missing his son's karate class, he promises to get his son the toy he most
wants for Christmas, an action figure called "TurboMan". However, it's now
Christmas Eve, and the toy is impossible to find. So Schwarzenegger travels
from toy store to toy store hunting for the item, getting into one
ridiculous situation after another.
To make matters worse for Arnold, he has a rival in Sinbad, who is also
hunting for the toy. Sinbad somehow manages to show up in the exact same
places as Arnold does at the exact same times. They hit each other and yell
at each other while searching for the toy, and what fun that is.
The previews of the film wisely show no clips from the film's ludicrous
final 30 minutes, where at a parade, Arnold becomes TurboMan. Sinbad becomes
his arch-rival. Now this TurboMan outfit from the parade is complete with a
working jetpack and deadly flying weapons, which immediately makes me ask,
if this costume is just for a parade, well why isn't there an actual
TurboMan? This costume literally turns Arnold into a superhero! Ridiculous.
Basically what we have here is a live action cartoon, which I would say is
appropriate for the whole family if it weren't for a few things. For
example, Robert Conrad plays a motorcycle cop who always seems to turn up
where Arnold does, and he's treated like a buffoon for doing his job. Hey
kids! Cops are idiots! In more than one scene, Sinbad (who plays a mailman)
threatens people with a mailbomb. Ha ha. Then at one point he gives the
package to Conrad which then blows up. But it's like a cartoon bomb, it only
affects Conrad because he was holding it. Ha ha. Hey kids! Mailbombs are
funny! I sincerely hope that none of the bombing victims from Atlanta or
Oklahoma City go with their families to see this film hoping for a good
natured comedy for the kids. As a matter of fact, I hope no one goes to see
this no matter who they are, bombing victim or not.
--
Chuck Dowling
Reply to: chuckd21@southeast.net
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office

Title
Review for Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas (1998)
Cast: Johnny Depp, Benicio Del Toro, Ellen Barkin, Gary Busey, Cameron
Diaz, Flea, Mark Harmon, Christina
Ricci, Katherine Helmond, Michael Jeter, Penn Jillette, Lyle Lovett,
Harry Dean Stanton, Tim Thomerson
Written by: Terry Gilliam, Tony Grisoni, Tod Davies and Alex Cox
Based on the novel by: Hunter S. Thompson
Directed by: Terry Gilliam
Running Time: 128 minutes
Understand that I know absolutely nothing about Hunter S. Thompson or
his work.  Also understand that I have no desire to
research him or his work in order to write this review.  That having
been said, let's begin...
Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas is just a ridiculous mess.  It has it's
good moments, but ultimately infuriates the viewer for
having no point whatsoever.  The film is similar to 1980's Where the
Buffalo Roam where Bill Murray played rebellious writer
Hunter S. Thompson and Peter Boyle was his whacked-out attorney.  Here
it's Johnny Depp as Thompson and Benicio Del
Toro as his whacked-out attorney.  Where the Buffalo Roam skipped right
over the events of this film, and wisely so.  The
events in Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas consist of nothing more that
Depp and Del Toro using drugs, stumbling around,
hallucinating, retreating to a hotel room, doing more drugs, stumbling
around, hallucinating, and so on and so on.
Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas isn't telling us a story, and it isn't
trying to say anything.  It's just one long drug trip.  It's mildly
amusing for a while, and does provide a few chuckles, but it quickly
wears thin.  Depp is good playing yet another odd
character, but Benecio Del Toro again gets on my nerves here.  Whenever
I see him on screen (in movies like The Fan and
The Usual Suspects) I feel like I need subtitles to understand him.  Add
drunken slurs to his normal unintelligible dialogue and I
can't understand one single syllable he utters.
The film just seems to raise questions that would be interesting to see
addresses, but of course the film is more interested in
obscure drug trips than anything coherent.  For example, who is hiring
Thompson to write articles for them?  Why would
anyone tolerate that kind of behavior?  And also, who can live their
life like this?  How can someone consistantly wake up
surrounded and covered in filth, not knowing what has happened for the
last two hours or so, and then want to do it all over
again?  Come to think of it, that sounds a lot like how I felt after
seeing this movie.  Thankfully, I have enough sense to know
that I'd never want that to happen again.  [R]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL: http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email: chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1995-1998 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be
reprinted without permission.

Title
Review for Hill, The (1965)
The Hill (1965) ***1/2 out of ***** - Cast:Sean Connery, Harry Andrews,
Ossie Davis.  Directed by: Sidney Lumet.  Running Time: 122 minutes.
The "hill" refers to a 60 foot high pile of sand and rocks which is used to
discipline soldiers in a British military prison during World War II.
Soldiers are forced to run up and down the hill at full speed in full combat
gear, under a blazing hot Africa sun. 
Sean Connery plays Joe Roberts, imprisoned at the camp for disobeying an
order that surely would of gotten him killed. The story follows him and
his cellmates as they are subjected to brutal punishment for their crimes,
punishment that gets one of them killed. The remaining soldiers in the
cell then have to fight the system in order to bring the guard responsible
for the man's death to justice. But it's not an easy task.
I had two problems with the film. One is that the actor's accents are very
thick and at times difficult to understand. The other is that the film
builds and builds, getting very tense going into the final scene. Then
something odd happens as the words "THE END" appear on screen. The story
wasn't over yet! But no, this is one of those 60's films that doesn't have
an ending, something which I cannot stand. But, the cast gives great
performances, specifically Andrews as the Sergeant Major in charge of the
camp. There is some excellent camera work here too, especially the opening
shot.
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related
links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Fan, The (1996)
(1996) **** - C:Robert De Niro, Wesley Snipes, Ellen Barkin, John
Leguizamo, Benicio del Toro, Chris Mulkey.
I have the feeling that this film will not do well. However, "The Fan" has
many things going for it to draw in the crowds. It has the greatest actor
working today, Robert De Niro. It has Wesley Snipes, who can be a box office
draw. It's a suspense film, in the tradition of "Cape Fear". And it's about
baseball, which appeals to sports fans. It might open strong, but afterwards
bad word of mouth is sure to spread quickly.
De Niro plays Gil Renard, a knife salesman and baseball fan who is just
slightly starting to lose touch with reality. The film starts near
baseball's opening day and Gil's hometown team, the San Francisco Giants,
have high hopes for their newly acquired hitting sensation Bobby Rayburn
(Snipes). Gil, unfortunately, also has huge expectations for the new player.
We find out that Gil is slipping at his salesman job, and unless he lands a
big account, he is going to be fired. The only chance he has to secure the
account would mean that he would miss the opportunity for him and his son to
see the opening game of the season. He tries to do both however, and neither
situation works out.
The events which occur at the ballpark enrage Gil's ex-wife, who gets a
restraining order preventing Gil from seeing his son. Also, as a result of
him missing his sales appointment, he loses his job. These two events push a
man who was already on the edge of sanity, completely over the line. So Gil
grasps hold of the only thing he has left: baseball. And more specifically,
Bobby Rayburn.
Bobby, on the other hand, is having problems of his own. A mild injury he
received in the opening game is hampering his game play and he enters a
slump. To make matters worse, the Giants' player that he replaced (del Toro)
is starting to play very well, making Rayburn look even worse. As a result,
the fans immediately turn on Rayburn. Everyone that is except for Gil. In
his new, demented state of mind he will do whatever it takes to insure that
his favorite player Rayburn has every opportunity to lead his team to
victory.
Overall, I think that in terms of story and screenplay, the film is not well
crafted. First, the previews are wildly misleading. The previews make you
think that the movie is about psycho De Niro stalking Snipes for the whole
film, when actually that's only the last 30 minutes or so. Second, there
really isn't that much going on in the film. I mean, the opening game of the
season eats up about 20-25 minutes of the movie, and the events of the game
really aren't that crucial. Also, there's absolutely no character to like
here. You've got psycho De Niro on one side, and cold, unsympathetic Snipes
on the other. So you've got a conflict between two characters that no one
will care if either of them comes out on top. Normally, all of these things
add up to a bad movie by my standards. But there is one specific thing about
the film which I enjoyed tremendously. So much, in fact, that it was enough
to give the film such a high rating.
De Niro gives such a fun performance that I was entertained to the point
that I could overlook all of the negative things about the film. His
performance calls to mind, naturally, other roles he's played in the past,
probably most specifically Rupert Pupkin from Scorsese's "The King of
Comedy". De Niro is given a great deal to do in the film and he make the
most out of every scene he's in. One particular scene in which he chases
after a foul ball is one of the funniest moments I've seen on film in a long
time. But, only because it's Robert De Niro. I don't think any other actor
could have made me enjoy this character like De Niro did. Sure he's just
playing a variation on countless other roles he's done in the past. But it's
what he does best and it's enough for me. There are a couple of other good
things about the film. Tony Scott's direction is excellent, as always. The
soundtrack which consists of many Rolling Stones songs and score music from
Hans Zimmer helps to move the film along nicely. Also, there's a great
"surprise" during the final scene which I really enjoyed. So overall, most
people probably will dislike the film, but De Niro made it worth my time.
Have A Question Or Comment? Email Me At chuckd21@southeast.net
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,500 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office
reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for By the Sword (1991)
(1991) ** - C:Eric Roberts, F. Murray Abraham, Mia Sara.
Finally, a movie about the exciting sport of fencing! Fencing? Swordfighting
without any of the danger? Oh boy.
Eric Roberts stars as a fencing instructor, a former olympic fencing
champion who retired from competition undefeated. His class that he
instructs in the film includes all the standard type characters for this
kind of film: the cocky guy, the sensitive guy, the girl who wants to prove
she's more than a girl, etc. These characters just end up as scenery,
however, as the main plot revolves around the school's janitor (Abraham).
In the film's opening scenes, Abraham comes to Roberts and asks if there are
any teaching positions open. Roberts quickly tests his skills, laughs, and
offers him a position as a janitor. Abraham, humiliated, takes the job.
Later, we learn that Roberts' father was also a great champion fencer, and
was killed in a duel over a woman many years earlier. Moments after, we
learn that Abraham has just been released from jail after serving a sentence
for murder. Hmmm, I wonder if there's a connection there? I wonder...
The film really goes nowhere for a while, and then leads up to the
inevitable "revelation" and climatic sword fight. The duel itself is well
staged, but the purpose of it seems a bit ridiculous. With some minor script
changes, however, the sword fight could have had much more relevance.
Roberts, who appears to be doing his own fencing, does a good job with his
character.
Have A Question Or Comment? Email Me At chuckd21@southeast.net
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,500 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office
reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for 10 to Midnight (1983)
(1983) **1/2 - C:Charles Bronson, Andrew Stevens, Wilford Brimley.
Charles Bronson is a cop who likes to do things his own way. Yes, I know
that basically describes every movie Bronson has ever made. "Ten to
Midnight" surprisingly though, has some originality to it.
The film is your basic "Cops-chasing-a-serial-killer" story, but halfway
through it takes an interesting turn. The cops catch the bad guy on a lesser
charge of stalking, and even though everyone knows that he's the killer, no
one can prove it. So Bronson plants evidence in the killer's apartment while
he's in jail. This doesn't work and eventually Bronson gets caught. As a
result, the killer is set free. Then Bronson decides to turn the tables and
he starts stalking the killer!
That aside, there are just too many things about the film which prevent it
from getting a good rating. It's cheaply made. The scenes which depict the
murders are done without any style and instead are just a gratuitious as any
slasher film. And the title apparently has no meaning whatsoever. I guess a
studio head thought it sounded good. Still, a decent attempt.
Have A Question Or Comment? Email Me At chuckd21@southeast.net
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,500 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office
reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for Carlito's Way (1993)
(1993) ****1/2 - C:Al Pacino, Sean Penn, Penelope Ann Miller, Luis Guzman,
John Leguizamo, Viggo Mortensen, Adrian Pasdar, Paul Mazursky.
Director Brian De Palma and star Al Pacino team up for the first time since
1983's "Scarface" to tell us another gangster story. Pacino plays Carlito
Brigante, a Puerto Rican street gangster who is released from jail after
serving five years of a thirty year prison term on a technicality discovered
by his sleazy, cocaine addicted lawyer friend (played excellently by Sean
Penn). Once out, he soon realizes that the streets have drastically changed.
Offers keep coming to Carlito for him to return to his criminal activities,
but he doesn't want anything to do with crime anymore. All he wants is to
earn enough money to buy into a small business owned by a former cellmate of
his down in the Bahamas. He finds that it's not so easy, however, as his
past and his strict sense of loyalty to his friends keep getting him closer
to a one way ticket straight back to jail. Pacino's role will immediately
call to mind his performance in "The Godfather Part III" as Don Corleone,
who kept trying to turn the family business legitimate, but his name and his
code of honor kept him involved the crime world.
Carlito takes a legitimate job as the manager of a local night club, hoping
to quickly earn the money he needs. It's there, ironically, where his
biggest troubles begin. Benny Blanco (Leguizamo), a small time punk who
thinks he going to be the next big boss of the city, is a loyal customer of
the club and Carlito wants nothing to do with him. This rubs Benny the wrong
way and after a couple confrontations, Carlito has his men rough Benny up
and throw him out. Benny then sets out to kill Carlito.
To make situations worse, Carlito reunites with his lover (Miller) whom he
left before heading off to jail and they rekindle their relationship. She
however wants him to leave town with her as soon as possible and cannot
understand his loyalties to the people Carlito is involved with.
"Carlito's Way" is a compelling film to watch and there's hardly a dull
moment. The acting is top-notch from everyone in the cast, especially Pacino
and Penn. It's a great looking film as well, and it has a good selection of
70s songs reflective of the time period in which the story takes place.
Patrick Doyle's score music is also effective exactly when it needs to be.
The only flaw of the film is the very first scene. De Palma has Carlito tell
the story in the overused film gimmick of flashbacks, so we see the final
scene of the film first. This ruins any possibility of suspense during the
film's final moments because we already know how everything is going to end.
"Carlito's Way" was filmed in the widescreen aspect of 2.35:1, and De Palma
takes full advantage of the enormous amount of screen space that he has to
fill. I recommend that if you do watch the film to try and watch it in its
original letterboxed format.
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,500 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office
reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for Twelve Monkeys (1995)
(1995) ****1/2 - C:Bruce Willis, Madeline Stowe, Brad Pitt, Christopher
Plummer, David Morse, Frank Gorshin.
A very entertaining science fiction story about a man from the future
(Willis) who is sent into the past to gather information about a virus which
virtually wipes out the world's population. The plague forces the survivors
to live underground while animals take control of the earth's surface. Now
those people have developed the ability of time travel and aren't trying to
prevent the virus from starting, but simply to find information about it's
beginnings to develop a cure for themselves.
What makes the film so good is that it's completely different from 99% of
the films Hollywood churns out of its cookie cutter factory. Most films are
linear, and you know exactly where the film is going and what will happen
when it gets there. But not "12 Monkeys". This film is all over the place,
bouncing from World War I to 1990 to 1996 to the future, and not necessarily
in that order. BUT, not in a way that's confusing. As long as you give the
film your full attention, it will make sense.
I also liked the fact that their time travel system was far from perfect.
Willis is sent to a couple of incorrect time periods before finally reaching
his objecive, and even those mistakes figure into the plot. Now as far as
the theory of time travel goes, about what if you can change the past by
blinking because you weren't supposed to be there to blink in the grand
scheme of things, etc. etc. I don't even want to jump into that type of
discussion. But my main argument in defense of time travel films is that
time travel has never been accomplished, so no one can argue about how it's
supposed to work. So until time travel is made possible (which is doubtful,
especially in my lifetime), sci-fi films can use it almost anyway they wish
and they'll get no argument from me.
I was immensely entertained by "12 Monkeys". It kept me guessing, it was
original, and that's good enough for me. Brad Pitt received a well deserved
Oscar nomination and won a Golden Globe award for his performance as the
deranged son of a scientist, who may or may not be responsible for the
spread of the virus.
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,500 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office
reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for Late Great Planet Earth, The (1979)
Cast: Orson Welles, Hal Lindsey
Based on the book by: Hal Lindsey and C.C. Carlson
Written and Directed by: Robert Amram and Rolf Forsberg
Running Time: 86 minutes
Date Reviewed: July 28, 1999
One-sided "doom and gloom" documentary about the possible annihilation
of the human race as foretold by the Bible.  Orson Welles narrates and
appears in the film in which he, along with best-selling author Hal
Lindsey, discusses various prophecies from the Bible and relates them
to recent (well for 1976 anyway) events.
The film is dated badly, as many things that are supposed to happen in
the "future" never do.  For example, the planets of the solar system
were supposed to line up in the year 1982 and cause chaos here on
Earth.  We're still here.  The arms race between the Soviets and
America was supposed to kick-off the apocalypse.  We're still here.
Some of the more ludicrous moments come when it's alluded to that
people like Jimmy Carter and Henry Kissinger may actually be the
antichrist (!).  Also, there's ten minutes of stock footage at the end
of the film meant to give us an idea of what the battle for armageddon
might be like.  If it's anything like it's depicted as here then it's
going to be incredibly boring.
The Late Great Planet Earth is available on DVD from VCI Home Video.
It contains the film in standard form (aspect ratio of 1.33:1),
although some moments of stock footage are letterboxed.  Also included
are brief bios on Orson Welles and Hal Lindsey, as well as a trailer
for another recent VCI Home Video release, Chariots of the Gods.
Audio is mono Dolby Digital, and the video is fair to good for a film
like this.  I believe this is the first appearance of this film on any
home video format so any condition at all is fine with me.  Certainly
I never expected a remastered print.
Curiously, the menu screens on this DVD look nothing like the menu
screens pictured on the back of the case.  But they're menu
screens... so who really cares?  [PG]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email:chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted
without permission.

Title
Review for Beverly Hills Ninja (1997)
Beverly Hills Ninja (1997) ** out of ***** - Cast:Chris Farley, Nicollette
Sheridan, Chris Rock. Writers:Mark Feldberg and Mitch Klebanoff. Director:
Dennis Dugan.
Director Dugan's previous film "Happy Gilmore" was basically a one-joke film,
but with bite to it thanks to Adam Sandler and the on-the-edge character
that he played. "Beverly Hills Ninja" is also a one-joke film, but the joke
is presented in the first minute of the film and then is beaten to death for
another 90 minutes.
Chris Farley ("Tommy Boy") again plays a big klutz, thankfully he knows his
range and won't try to stretch beyond his abilities. This time out he's an
orphan who was discovered by a group of ninjas who take him into their care
and raise him according to their ways. They believe him to be "The Great
White Ninja", an ancient legend of the ninja. One day, all the ninjas go out
on a mission and leave him behind, because he's so inept. While causing mass
destruction just hanging around at his home, a damsel in distress (Sheridan)
comes to hire a ninja. (Boy, this really seems ridiculous as I write it, and
you know they didn't pitch any of the actual story to the studio. I'm sure
all they said was "It's Chris Farley as a clumsy ninja! Huh? How about that?
100 million easy!").
Well, Sheridan's appearance causes Farley to follow her to Beverly Hills,
California (Get it? Beverly Hills Ninja? It's funny!). Once there, it's
another "fish-out-of-water" story of sorts, as Farley gets to discover all
the wonders of America (basically just hotels and strip clubs). He meets up
with a bellboy (Rock, in an annoying performance) and they search for
whatever it is that is supposed to be going on at this point. All I can tell
you is that Chris Farley gets hurt a lot, and that's supposed to be funny.
"Beverly Hills Ninja" (along with last year's "Black Sheep") proves why
"Tommy Boy" worked as a comedy. "Tommy Boy" was funny because Farley is doing
his schtick, but someone is there to make fun of it. That's what's funny,
making fun of the idiot. Here, Farley does his schtick, and that's it.
Farley's antics, by themselves, are just not funny. His character is nothing
but yet another rip-off of Peter Sellers' Inspector Clouseau character, but
without one ounce of intelligence.
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office
reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for Frequency (2000)
Cast: Dennis Quaid, James Caviezel, Shawn Doyle, Elizabeth Mitchell,
Andre Braugher, Noah Emmerich 
Written by: Toby Emmerich 
Directed by: Gregory Hoblit 
Running Time: 117 minutes 
When you go to the movies as much as I do, you unfortunately end up
seeing certain movie trailers one too many times.  Such was the case
with Frequency.  Every time I went to a screening, there was the
Frequency preview.  It looked awful.  It looked cheesy, sappy and
ridiculous.  It looked like a flop.  Well, whoever put that trailer
together should be fired, because in terms of pure entertainment,
Frequency is one of the best of the year thus far. 
Frequency boasts a compelling story line.  An occurrence of freakish
solar activity allows police detective John Sullivan (James Caviezel) to
speak to his fireman father Frank Sullivan (Dennis Quaid) through a ham
radio, despite the fact that Frank has been dead for 30 years.  John is
able to give his father information that prevents his death in a
warehouse fire, but by doing so causes other changes.  Somehow, a serial
killer's reign of terror, which in the original timeline had been
stopped at three murders, extends to ten victims... including John's
mother. 
This is director Gregory Hoblit's third film (the other two being Primal
Fear and Fallen).  With all three, he's managed to attach himself to
great scripts (this one by Toby Emmerich, whose only previous movie
experience was as a music supervisor on numerous New Line films) and add
equally great direction.  Also, he apparently likes to have his films
wrap up with a kick-ass ending. Frequency is no exception, the ending is
unpredictable and incredibly satisfying.  Hoblit is three for three, and
I hope he can keep it up. 
Now everyone can argue logic this and logic that all you want with the
sci-fi elements of Frequency.  But the fact of the matter is that time
travel has never been achieved.  Who's to say how something works and
how it doesn't when it's never happened?  Is it because we've become
accustomed to time travel "laws" from other places like "Star Trek" and
the Back to the Future trilogy and "Quantum Leap"?  Yes, if you sit down
and think about it, certain plot elements in this film probably won't
make any sense.  Most films are like that.  Don't let that dissuade you
from seeing this fantastically entertaining film however. 
When Frequency was over, it made me wish I had seen it with my father so
I could have given him a hug (okay okay, shut up).  When you break it
down past all its sci-fi elements and serial killer antics, Frequency is
simply a movie about a father and his son and the bond that they share. 
It's touching, it's sincere, and it's what ultimately makes this movie
work.  [PG-13]
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
AOL Instant Messenger: FilmJax
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Long Kiss Goodnight, The (1996)
The Long Kiss Goodnight (1996) ** out of ***** - Cast: Geena Davis, Samuel
L. Jackson, David Morse, G.D. Spradlin. Written by: Shane Black. Directed
by: Renny Harlin. Running Time: 120 minutes.
"The Long Kiss Goodnight" is yet another failure from director Renny Harlin,
who's career once showed promise, peaked with "Die Hard 2", and has gone
downhill steadily ever since. He, along with his wife Geena Davis, deliver
another big budget waste of time without a shread of intelligence (see also:
"Cutthroat Island").
Geena Davis is absolutely wrong for the role of a former ruthless government
assassin who was the victim of a hit herself and suffered amnesia as a
result. She now believes that she's a school teacher with a normal life,
complete with a daughter and a boyfriend. The daughter is actually hers, as
she was two months pregnant when she was attacked. This all changes one
night when she hits a deer on the highway (in just about the most realistic
"car hitting a deer" scene I've ever witnessed). After the accident (which
one day it seems she'll be hospitalized for a long time, then she's
basically out the next day) she starts to recall things from her former
life.
She enlists the aid of a shady private detective (Jackson, in a funny
performance) after some of her old personal belongings are found. The two
set out to find out her true identity, but the "bad guys" find out she's
still alive and soon are in pursuit.
Before I address all the ridiculousness of the film, I will point out the
things I did like. Samuel L. Jackson gives another good performance and
should be proud of his work in the film. The action scenes are well-staged
(however completely implausible). And deep down, the story had potential.
However, there is not enough good here to overlook the bad.
It takes Davis' character about an hour to realize who she is, something
which the audience knew before the film even began just by seeing the
preview. I don't like knowing more than the characters in the film and then
have to watch them figure it out. That's why I can't ever watch TVs Columbo.
Then, in the first hour, there's all this "extra dialog", like this was a
Tarantino movie or something. At one point while Jackson and Davis are
driving somewhere, he notices an attractive woman and makes it known that he
finds her attractive. The two of them then have a discussion about men and
why they look at women and etc. etc. There's a lot of that in the first
hour, and it's out of place.
During the final scenes, they use a cliche that's SO overused I can't even
believe its still allowed to be used. After the bad guys capture Davis, who
is now completely her assassin persona, the actually devise some sort of
ridiculous scheme to kill her instead of just putting a bullet in her head.
In true James Bond fashion they lock her in a freezer so she'll eventually
freeze to death. Now on top of that, she actually says to the main bad guy,
"Since I'm going to die anyway, why not tell me the entire plan." And then
he does! And then she naturally escapes! Come ON! And on top of THAT, it
turns out that this whole thing is about the CIA being responsible for all
the terrorist attacks here in the United States since the end of the cold
war, just to get a budget increase! Now I know the government is corrupt,
even downright evil at times, but COME ON! This is ridiculous! News like
this would shut down the government and cause revolts, and in the end its
just simply another news story.
There are other little "picky" details I had a problem with. For example,
its mentioned that Davis' accident happened 8 years ago, in 1992. So, this
is taking place in the year 2000? Is that right? Hmmm. Also, actor David
Morse is AGAIN wasted in a nothing role. When will someone realize this man
is talented and give him a major role? I mean besides Sean Penn? Anyway,
it's just a shame that given the money and supposed talent involved here
that nothing more than a silly little action film came out. [R]
--Chuck Dowling  
--Chuck's Movie Reviews -- http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/

Title
Review for Cannes Man (1996)
Cannes Man (1996) *** out of ***** - Cast: Seymour Cassel, Francesco Quinn.
Written by: Irwin Rappaport, Deric Haddad, Susan Shapiro, and Richard
Martini. Directed by: Richard Martini. Running Time: 90 minutes.
With special appearances by: Lara Flynn Boyle, James Brolin, Jon Cryer, Ann
Cusack, Johnny Depp, Robert Evans, Peter Gallagher, Menacham Golan, Dennis
Hopper, Randal Kleiser, Jim Jarmusch, Lloyd Kaufman, Julian Lennon, John
Malkovich, Chris Penn, Kevin Pollak, Jim Sheridan, Bryan Singer, Benicio Del
Toro, Harvey Weinstein, Frank Whaley, Treat Williams.
An odd, yet interesting concept for a low budget film. A dim-witted ex-video
store clerk becomes a courier for Troma Films and has to take promotional
materials to the infamous Cannes film festival in France. Once there, he
becomes the subject of a bet between two movie producers. One of the
producers is the "legendary" Sy Lerner (Cassel), who bets the other producer
that he can make this kid into the hottest thing at the festival before it's
over. Sy hypes the kid as Frank Rhino, the most talented screenwriter ever
born who's written the most brilliant screenplay ever written. The two then
wander around all over the festival, trying to sell their non-existant
screenplay "Con Man" (get it? Con Man? Cannes Man? It's funny!) and
pursuading stars and directors to attach themselves to the project.
As I said, "Cannes Man" has an ultra low budget, and all it really is is two
guys bothering celebrities at various events in Cannes. It would have been
interesting to watch the making of this film, as stars must have been
approached literally minutes before their "roles" were to be filmed.
Everyone seems to enjoy their little moments however, particularly Johnny
Depp and Jim Jarmusch who contribute the most screen time of all the
"special appearances". And it does have a few laughs sprinkled throughout.
It's an incredibly simple yet fairly entertaining film. [R]
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for McHale's Navy (1997)
McHale's Navy (1997) **1/2 out of ***** - Cast: Tom Arnold, Dean Stockwell,
Tim Curry, Bruce Campbell, Ernest Borgnine, David Alan Grier, French
Stewart, Debra Messing, Tommy Chong. Written By: Peter Crabbe. Directed By:
Brian Spicer. Running Time: 108 minutes.
Darn it all, I like Tom Arnold. While I agree that he's much better as a
supporting character ("True Lies", "Nine Months"), unlike the rest of
America I think he can be a competent lead as well ("Big Bully", "The
Stupids"). He stars as Quinton McHale in "McHale's Navy", and while it's
certainly not great, it's not all the bad either. Most of the time, it's
just frustrating.
"McHale's Navy" is the latest Hollywood remake of classic TV show. McHale is
retired from the navy and spends his days in the Carribbean, trying to
concoct any scheme possible to make money. On the flip side, he also coaches
a little league baseball team. His old crew, your stereotypical bunch of
losers and misfits (honestly, how do people like this even make it INTO the
military?) suddenly find themselves with a new commanding officer
(Stockwell), who is your stereotypical uptight, by-the-book, always looking
to get ahead in any way possible military authority.
Elsewhere in those islands, terrorists (led by a too silly Tim Curry) are
hatching some sort of evil scheme to rule the world. Curry's character is
constantly referred to as the second most deadly terrorist in the world,
making you think that maybe the world's MOST deadly terrorist may show up
soon, but alas, he doesn't. Everything is standard from that point on.
Two things keep this film from being good. First is the basic plot. Why does
this need to be yet another slightly comical world domination story? The
original series lasted for years with plots I'm sure were more like "A
private misplaces McHale's laundry." Just a simple story with some good
laughs would have been just fine. Second is the script. At times the script
was so frustrating that I wanted to just pummel the writer. The movie's
flowing along, light-hearted, breezy, ready for comedy. One or two jokes
blow by, which were amusing, and then we get smacked in the face with some
absolutely absurd sightgag or situation that is so mindnumbingly UNFUNNY
that we forget the mild amusement from seconds before. Notice that both of
these problems are the fault of the writing, not of the actors.
The supporting cast, for the most part, fares well. Stockwell for some
reason seems to be doing an impression of Johnny Carson's Art Fern
character, which may be how the character talked in the TV series, but it
seems out of place here considering the character he plays. Tommy Chong, in
a very brief role, is ok, but I've been hearing him in interviews blasting
former comedy partner Cheech Marin for "selling out". Well what do you call
your role here Mr. Chong? Most puzzling though is Bruce Campbell. Clearly
he's the most talented man in the cast as every scene he's in is just a bit
better than the others. But he's eighth or ninth billing and given
absolutely nothing to do. When will someone realize that Bruce Campbell is a
very interesting actor with a distinctive personality which sets him apart
from just any regular actor? Either Campbell is completely happy with
working only bit parts in small movies, he has the worst agent in the world,
or he's unbelievably difficult to work with.
"McHale's Navy" had potential, but it just took itself too seriously. If it
had just had a simple plot without the silly villain or overbearing
commanding officer, it may have been much better. I still like Tom Arnold,
and this film's lack of success is certainly not his fault. [PG]
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related
links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Scream (1996)
Scream (1996) ** out of ***** - Cast: Neve Campbell, Courtney Cox, Skeet
Ulrich, David Arquette, Drew Barrymore. Written by: Kevin Williamson.
Directed by: Wes Craven. Running Time: 111 minutes.
The popularity of "Scream" puzzles me. When I first saw the trailers for it,
I came away with the notion that it didn't look very intelligent, or
different than any other slasher movie. After seeing the film, I agree with
my initial assessment.
In "Scream", someone wearing a grim reaper-type halloween costume is trying
to kill off Neve Campbell and her little friends who, just like most slasher
movies, think "What? A friend was murdered? Cool!". So who is the killer? Oh
who could it be? Who cares. I particularly enjoyed a scene where, after
Campbell is brutally attacked and almost killed (which then results in the
arrest of her boyfriend and sparks the memories of her mother's rape and
murder a year earlier), she's in the mood to party! Of all the annoying,
superficial characters, only David Arquette as a youthful rookie police
officer shines through as someone interesting.
The opening scene was wildly praised, and I have no idea why. In it, Drew
Barrymore is stalked (via the telephone) by the killer. There's nothing new
in it (maybe the telephone part), and Drew's character acts just as dumb as
any other slasher movie character. The scene is entirely overblown, and as
with just about every slasher film, the scene's music TELLS you when to jump
instead of just letting the story scare you.
The problem, as far as I can see, is the script. Writer Kevin Williamson has
obviously seen lots of horror films, but he confuses writing an intelligent
script containing some clever nods to great horror movies with an average
slasher script in which every character is a horror movie encyclopedia. All
the characters in "Scream" have way too much horror movie knowledge to be
believeable. A few of them, sure. But all? So the script comes across as
"See? I've seen lots of horror films! And I'm telling you I've seen a lot of
horror films! See? All these characters are specifically talking about the
horror movies I've seen!" One character, a geeky video store clerk who takes
his knowledge of horror WAY too seriously, annoyingly telegraphs many of the
events during the final scenes.
Also, there are too many moments where the masked killer is seemingly
supernatural and psychic. The killer can telegraph where a potential victim
might wander off to. Then there are moments where the killer might knock on
a door and then immediately vanish without a sound, even though the victim
is right there to investigate. And every time the killer attacks someone,
the victim inflicts some heavy damage upon the killer. This damage never
seems to hurt though, (ahem) as with EVERY OTHER SLASHER MOVIE.
Have I made it clear that there's no difference between "Scream" and any
other slasher movie? Sure it's infinitely better that just about every
horror release from the past two years, but almost anything is better than
another "Hellraiser" or "Halloween" installment. Wes Craven's direction is
certainly more competant than most slasher films, but in the film he keeps
making references to his own "A Nightmare on Elm Street" which gets terribly
annoying. He even goes as far to have a janitor at the school named Fred
who's dressed exactly like Freddy Krueger. It's not cute. And "Scream 2" is
filming now, with a "Scream 3" to follow it. Say, that's a new concept,
horror sequels! I wonder if all the characters in those will keep commenting
on how badly horror movie sequels "suck". I wonder how many times Craven
will make it known that all the sequels to "Elm Street" were terrible. Care
to place a wager? [R]
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Almost Heroes (1998)
Cast: Chris Farley, Matthew Perry, Eugene Levy, Kevin Dunn, David
Packer, Hamilton Camp, Christian Clemenson, Bokeem Woodbine, Harry
Shearer
Written by: Mark Nutter, Tom Wolfe and Boyd Hale
Directed by: Christopher Guest
Running Time: 90 minutes
I guess when you go into a movie with very low expectations, it's more
satisfying when the film turns out to be not so bad.  That's the case
with Chris Farley's last starring vehicle Almost Heroes.  I expected a
cross between Farley's disasterous Black Sheep and John Candy's final
film, the similarly themed Wagons East.  Thankfully, it turned out to
be pretty funny, along the lines of such low-brow comedies like
Kingpin and Dumb and Dumber.
The plot is a simple one: explorers Edwards and Hunt (Matthew Perry
and Chris Farley) set out on a cross country expedition a few weeks
after Lewis and Clark do, hoping to beat them to the Pacific Ocean.
The plot really doesn't mean anything however, as Almost Heroes is
mainly just a collection of sketches using the same locale.  Each
scene seems self contained, as there will be a set-up for a joke, then
the execution of that scene's main joke, and then we proceed on to the
next sketch.  Previous scenes are rarely acknowledged.
Thankfully, most of the jokes and situations work.  Highlights include
a campfire story with a really bizarre punchline, and Farley's
character searching for an eagle's egg.  These moments and many others
got laughs out of me, and still do whenever I think about them.
Surprisingly though, it's Matthew Perry who's the real star of the
film, as Farley seems more of a supporting character, simply providing
reasons for upper-class Perry to react to his lower-class shenanigans.
Eugene Levy is also good in his role, and I've always considered Levy
to be an underrated comedic talent.
What does bother me is the film's final 10 minutes or so.  The film
just completely falls apart.  Not only does Farley get carried off by
an eagle (he holds onto the eagle's legs as it flies, yeah right) but
it also re-writes history along with making the film's title
meaningless.  According to the end of the film, Edwards and Hunt BEAT
Lewis and Clark to the Pacific Ocean!  What the hell?  Also, there's
no dedication to Farley anywhere in the film's closing credits,
something that I thought would be customary.  [PG13]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL: http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email: chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1995-1998 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be
reprinted without permission.

Title
Review for Metro (1997)
Metro (1997) NO STARS out of ***** - C:Eddie Murphy, Michael Rapaport.
There are some people who think that Eddie Murphy is having a comeback.  Then
there are people like me, who believe Eddie Murphy hasn't made a good movie
since 1988's "Coming To America".  For those of you who believe he's having a
comeback, the comeback is over.
Even though 1997 has barely begun, I seriously doubt there will be a movie
as atrociously bad this year as "Metro".  In all my years of movie-going,
this was the very first time I had ever decided "enough is enough" and
promptly walked out of the theater after one hour.  And I'm surprised that I
even lasted that long.
In "Metro", Eddie Murphy plays a hostage negotiator for the San Francisco
police department.  The plot (which really must have developed during the
second hour because there's nothing going on in the first) involves
something about an overacting villain who is involved in stolen jewelry.
Oooo, a jewel thief, call the hostage negotiator!  Early on, Murphy's buddy
on the force is killed by the overacting villain (ooo, I've never seen that
plot twist before) and Murphy gets to train a new partner (Rapaport plays
the partner, in a plot twist I've never seen before).  Also, Murphy keeps
trying (pathetically) to woo back his ex-girlfriend.  Will he catch the bad
guy?  Will he get his girl back?  I could care less, but I guarantee you that
he does.
There's also a car chase through the mountainous streets of San Francisco
(say, I've never seen that before) which seems to contradict the whole
movie.  Well the first hour anyway.  Murphy's character, who's such a dreary
loser, somehow manages to convince us early on that his primary concern in a
hostage situation is to save innocent lives.  However, when he gives chase to
the overacting villain, at least 100 people must get killed, maimed, or
severely injured.
That calls attention to the tone of this movie.  Do not attend this film if
you are looking for a good time time at the movies.  "Metro" is loud,
unpleasant, dreary, and most of all, completely humorless.  Funnyman Eddie
Murphy decided not to be funny this time.  There is one joke in the first
hour, and its the Redd Foxx joke that's in every preview.  His character is
so drab and unlikable, I just can't figure why he would want to follow-up
the success he had with "The Nutty Professor" with such an unoriginal,
lifeless, brainless, disaster of a movie.  It's not like the man is
untalented, he just keeps picking one bad project after another.  I will
sincerely be shocked if "Metro" becomes a hit.
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office
reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for Screwed (2000)
Cast: Norm MacDonald, Dave Chappelle, Danny DeVito, Daniel Benzali,
Elaine Stritch, Sherman Hemsley, Lochlyn Monro, Sarah Silverman 
Written and Directed by: Scott Alexander and Larry Karaszewski 
Running Time: 81 minutes 
Screwed stars Norm MacDonald as a much put-upon butler whose boss
(Elaine Stritch) treats him like a slave.  When he finally feels as
though he can't take the abuse anymore, he and his dim-witted friend
(Dave Chappelle) launch a scheme to kidnap the woman's dog and hold it
for ransom.  This leads to a bizarre chain of events that leads
authorities to believe that MacDonald himself has been kidnapped, and
that the ransom for his return is $5 million. 
Written and directed by Scott Alexander and Larry Karaszewski, who wrote
the excellent biopics Ed Wood, The People vs. Larry Flynt, and Man on
the Moon.  Their work here however more resembles their scripts for
drivel like the first two Problem Child movies and the remake of That
Darn Cat.  There are some funny moments in Screwed, but the majority of
them come thanks to the performances of the actors and not from the
material itself.  (One odd thing of note about the script is that all
the names of the main characters are all variations of lesser known U.S.
Presidents.) 
The story just isn't as sharp as it should be.  The events in Screwed
only make sense in the film's own reality.  Here in the real world, any
police investigation (no matter how inept) would have the kidnapping
figured out in no time.  Also, there are two plot twists late in the
film that serve no other purpose but to make the audience say
"Ewwww...". 
Norm MacDonald is one of the funniest people on the planet, but he's
just not in the right role here to display his comedic talents. 
MacDonald is at his best when he's being sarcastic, so casting him as a
poor hapless schmuck doesn't let him show his stuff.  Dave Chappelle is
another good comedian misused here.  Chappelle is able to carry limp
films like Half-Baked and steal movies like Blue Streak away from its
star, but like MacDonald he's just not given good material here to work
with.  Daniel Benzali (the bald guy from "Murder One"... to quote
"Saturday Night Live") overacts his role as the lead detective on the
case.  Everything in the film seems to exasperate his character to
cartoonish levels, and it renders his performance just too silly for the
film.  The thing is, had Benzali just played the role as he always plays
roles like this it would have been perfect.  I guess because he was
doing a comedy he felt he had to overdo it.  And I'm not even sure why
Danny DeVito (who makes a lot of "Penguin" noises in the film) thought
this was a good idea. 
The most annoying thing about Screwed isn't how much of a disappointment
it is (although that is a close second)... it's how LOUD the film is. 
The music in the film (generic frantic music that plays at some point in
every single scene) is so exhaustingly obnoxious that it wore me out
just having to hear it.  Also, the film just degenerates into a shouting
match amongst the stars to see who can deliver their lines the loudest. 
Louder jokes aren't funnier jokes. 
Screwed runs 81 minutes long, which leads me to the possible conclusion
of the dreaded "studio tampering".  Potential example of that: Danny
DeVito's character is the vice-president of the "Hawaii Five-O" fan
club.  Why?  It's adds nothing to his character and never really comes
into play in the film.  I doubt Scott Alexander and Larry Karaszewski
would write details for these characters without any rhyme or reason for
them.  Also, Screwed sat on the proverbial shelf for a long time after
completion and went through several title changes. 
Everyone involved with this project has talent.  Somehow though it just
never came together as it should have.  So who ends up getting screwed
here?  The audience. 
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
AOL Instant Messenger: FilmJax
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Vig (1998) (TV)
Cast: Peter Falk, Lauren Holly, Timothy Hutton, Freddie Prinze, Jr.,
Tyne Daly, Colm Meaney
Directed by: Graham Theakston
Running Time: 96 minutes
A depressing and all too familiar tale of gamblers and other assorted
low lifes.  One of Boston's head mobsters decides one day to "trim the
fat" from the organization.  As a result, an aging bookie (Peter Falk)
is slowly forced out of the business by a young punk in the
organization (Freddie Prinze, Jr.).  Meanwhile, there's a running
subplot about a drunken loser (Timothy Hutton) who refuses to work to
support his wife (Lauren Holly) and their children.  Predictably, he
ends up placing a huge bet and losing, further destroying his family.
Money Kings seems like it would be fairly entertaining, but the
situations just keep getting more and more depressing, leading to an
obvious conclusion that really won't affect you one way or another.
The performances are decent (although Prinze is badly miscast), and
there's a fairly good Irish-type score.
Money Kings is available on DVD from Sterling Home Entertainment.  It
contains the film in it's standard format, and includes the usual cast
and crew bios, production notes, and the film's original trailer.  [R]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email:chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted
without permission.

Title
Review for Big Squeeze, The (1996)
The Big Squeeze (1996) **1/2 out of ***** - Cast: Lara Flynn Boyle, Peter
Dobson. Writer and Director: Marcus DeLeon.
Lara Flynn Boyle has always struck me as an odd actress.  Not odd as in she's
weird, but odd in her choices of characters.  In interviews she has always
come across as someone you'd want to hold in your arms and protect her from
everything evil in this world.  But ever since the second (and final) season
of TV's "Twin Peaks", she's mostly played cold, ruthless, and sometimes
downright evil women.  Almost to the point where she'd be typecast in that
type of role.  So when a movie like "The Big Squeeze" comes around, no matter
how her character is presented, you think she has some sort of ulterior
motive.
As the film begins, Benny (Peter Dobson from "The Frighteners") is being
thrown out of a moving train for having five kings in his hand during a
poker game.  He goes to a local bar where Tanya (Boyle) is bartending.  He
tries to pick her up, but finds out she's a married woman.  So he tries
another bartender and the two strike up a relationship.
Tanya's husband is a former minor league baseball player named Henry.  Two
years earlier he injured his knee in an accident and hasn't played the game
since.  Also since the accident, Henry has found God and visits the local
mission every day, mostly to pray for himself to be able to play ball again,
but also to pray for forgiveness after he has sex with his wife. He's an odd
guy.
Tanya took the bartending job because Henry's insurance would not pay for
his injury.  One day she opens his mail and discovers that he did in fact
receive a settlement of over $100,000.  Now she thinks that she's entitled to
half of the money.  And she's right.  Henry, however, believes that money is
evil and will not let her have a dime.  They fight, and she leaves him.
Now the plot happens.  Tanya wants her half of the money, so she asks for
Benny's help.  At the same time, the mission which Henry visits daily
desperately needs over $100,000 to repair earthquake damage.  Benny then
concocts a scheme involving the mission's plight to raise money in order to
swindle Henry.
"The Big Squeeze" is pleasant enough, it just doesn't pay off well in the
end. The tone set early on makes it seem as though some sort of double
cross may occur (aside from the OBVIOUS double cross which we all know is
coming), but nothing else really happens. Dobson gives an interesting
performance, and it looks like he might be a mainstay, along with Ms.
Boyle, in this type of low-budget independent film in the years to come.
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office
reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for Private Matter, A (1992) (TV)
A Private Matter (CABLE-1992) **** out of ***** - Cast: Sissy Spacek, Aiden
Quinn, William H. Macy. Written by: William Nicholson. Directed by: Joan
Micklin Silver. Running Time: 89 minutes.
"A Private Matter" is based on the true story of Sherri Finkbine and the
events in her life during the 1960s. After becoming pregnant (for the fifth
time) she learns that some tranquilizers she had taken have seriously
deformed her unborn child. She and her husband decide, with the help of her
doctor, to have an abortion. But this is the 1960s, and abortion is illegal.
Her doctor has made arrangements to have the procedure performed withing the
law, by claiming that the child is endangering the mother's life. Everything
is about to work out just fine, until Sherri has the uncontrollable urge to
talk about her situation with a local reporter.
This sets off a media frenzy and immediately Sherri is the most hated woman
in the world. She and her husband are fired from their jobs, reporters are
surrounding their home at all times, and most importantly, no one in the
country (and eventually other countries) will perform the abortion. This
causes emotion problems for all involved.
"A Private Matter" is a fascinating story and it's hard to believe that this
only happened 30 years or so ago. It's only flaw is that not once is there
ever a satisfactory confrontation with Sherri and any of her opponents. One
woman passing her on the street telss her to burn in hell, and when Sherri
appropriately yells back, "Just tell me what I'm supposed to do," the woman
has no answer. No one apparently had an answer, they just wanted to control
what should have been only the choice of Sherri and her husband. This is an
important film, telling an important story. It's not just about not wanting
another child, it's about not wanting a child who will cause severe changes
in their family, none of which could be beneficial. Sydney Pollack served as
executive producer for this made for HBO movie.
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related
links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Alien: Resurrection (1997)
Alien Resurrection (1997) *** out of ***** - Cast: Sigourney Weaver,
Winona Ryder, Ron Perlman, Dan Hedaya, Michael Wincott.  Written by: Joss
Whedon.  Directed by: Jean-Pierre Jeunet.  Running Time: 118 minutes.
*** This review contains spoilers. ***
"Alien Resurrection", the fourth film in the popular sci-fi/horror series,
is a slight improvement over the third installment, but overall is a
disappointment.
Sigourney Weaver is surprisingly back as Ellen Ripley.  I say surprisingly
since the character killed herself at the end of the third film.  This one
is set 200 years after part three, and idiotic scientists have cloned
Ripley in order to extract the alien queen she had been carrying inside
her at the time of her death.  These scientists hope to "train" the
aliens.  Amazing how after another 200 years of human evolution that
scientists are still stupid.  Well sure enough, the aliens reproduce and
break free to terrorize everyone.
None of the characters being chased by the aliens are the slightest bit
compelling.  You don't care if any of them escape or not.  You've got the
head idiot scientist, a band of space pirates (of which the only
interesting one, Michael Wincott, is killed immediately), another android
(Ryder, who's character contributes nothing to any aspect of the film),
and Ripley, who really isn't Ripley so again, who cares.
Some other minor problems I had: At one moment, the cloned Ripley doesn't
know what a fork is, yet soon after she's got a witty one-liner for any
occasion.  Another thing, too many "witty" one-liners from the cast.  Good
to know that the aliens aren't too much of a concern anymore.  Along those
same lines, Dan Hedaya's character is just too cartoonish for the film. 
Let's make a serious film here people.  I'm also curious why after all
these hundreds of years of human and scientific evolution that spacecraft
are still dirty, grimy, bulky and blocky.  It didn't take long after the
invention of the automobile to make it a nice looking, streamlined
machine, so why after so many hundreds of years are spaceships still
clunky and crappy looking?
About the film's finale and lead up to that finale, haven't we seen this
before?  Blow up the ship and blow the alien out into space?  All I kept
thinking was how much better the ending of part three was since it was
something completely different.  The ship then at the end crashes into
earth, seemingly destroying a couple of continents (!), and this is
treated as a good thing?  What gives here?
Weaver keeps voicing in interviews about how she likes the erotic aspects
of the series.  Personally, I just don't get what's erotic about monsters,
blood, and goo.  But, there's plenty of "erotica" here for you if you
happen to agree with Weaver.
"Alien Resurrection" starts out very intriguing.  Information is only
given to the audience gradually, and therefore the first third of the film
is quite compelling.  But as soon as the aliens escape, the film just
becomes a mindless bloody gorefest.  If this wasn't an "Alien" film then
I'd have to just catagorize it as a shameless "Alien" rip-off.
Since there will probably never be an "Aliens vs. Predator" film, then
there's really only two things I'd like to see if the series continues. 
Either aliens make it to Earth somehow (even though this film manages to
completely trounce that premise by constantly telling us what a hellhole
Earth has become), or we find the alien's homeworld WITH only the intent
of destroying these things for good.  Anything aside from that will most
likely be just as disappointing as this effort was.  [R]
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed at Chuck's Movie Reviews.
Web address: http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/

Title
Review for Omega Code, The (1999)
Cast: Casper Van Dien, Michael York, Michael Ironside, Catherine
Oxenberg, William Hootkins 
Written by: Stephen Blinn and Hollis Barton  
Directed by: Robert Marcarelli 
Running Time: 99 minutes 
Preposterous religious action film (produced by the Trinity Broadcasting
Network) about a code hidden within the text of the Bible that when
deciphered will lead to the end of the world (nice of those Bible
authors to put a doomsday code into the most read book ever eh?). 
Michael York plays a millionaire diplomat who breaks the code and sets
out to become God on Earth and fulfill the doomsday prophecies, while
Casper Van Dien (terribly miscast and giving an awful performance as a
result) plays the atheist motivational speaker who must stop him. 
Michael Ironside (great as always, despite the silly film surrounding
him) plays a fallen priest and right hand man to Michael York's
character.  Here's some subtle character development you may have missed
pertaining to Ironside's character.  Now despite the fact that we see
him murder a man in the opening scene, the filmmakers aren't quite sure
if their audience will understand that he is evil.  How do they fix
that?  Make specific efforts to show that his character is the only one
in the film who smokes!  There are lots of ominous shots of Michael
Ironside smoking... oooooo scary.  But even that wasn't enough for the
filmmakers apparently, as they later have to infer that Ironside's
character is gay!  It comes out of nowhere and just makes no sense. 
My main problem with this film is that, despite the silly story (which
could have been pulled off... anything can be made believable if
executed correctly), the events of the film aren't shown with any sense
of urgency or importance.  For example, at one point York's character is
declared chancellor of the world or something, and we see one brief,
cheesy news report about it.  The movie keeps telling us that the
apocalypse is coming, but it never seems that way.  There's no "world
reaction" to anything. 
The Omega Code is available on DVD from Goodtimes Home Video.  It
contains the film in the original theatrical aspect ratio of 1.85:1, and
includes the original theatrical trailer, a documentary on the making of
the film, production notes, and cast and crew information. 
The documentary runs about 25 minutes and is actually surprisingly good
(it looks as though it was made for broadcast on TBN), and it does a
comprehensive job of interviewing practically everyone in the cast and
crew (with the exception of Michael Ironside, unfortunately).  The best
thing about it is that whenever crew members are interviewed, they do an
excellent job of explaining their profession and exactly what it is they
do on a movie set.  Most documentaries tend to overlook this.  Doomsday
expert Hal Lindsey is even interviewed (you'll remember his documentary
from the 1970's called The Late Great Planet Earth, where Lindsey
speculated that Jimmy Carter might actually be the antichrist). 
However, at the very beginning of the documentary the producers of the
film managed to get on my bad side.  When interviewed they actually have
the nerve to say "Ever see Raiders of the Lost Ark?  Well, our film is
like that!"  No it isn't.  Not by a long shot.  [PG-13]
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Rules of Engagement (2000)
Cast: Tommy Lee Jones, Samuel L. Jackson, Guy Pearce, Ben Kingsley, Anne
Archer, Blair Underwood, Dale Dye, Philip Baker Hall 
Written by: James Webb and Stephen Gaghan 
Directed by: William Friedkin 
Running Time: 127 minutes 
So, William Friedkin CAN make a good movie... but just barely.  Rules of
Engagement is the latest courtroom movie to hit theaters, with it's
origins owed to 1992's A Few Good Men.  Samuel L. Jackson stars as
decorated United States Marine Colonel Terry L. Childers.  While on a
rescue mission in the Middle East and under heavy enemy fire, Childers
orders his men to open fire into a crowd of demonstrators.  In the end
83 people are dead, and Childers is court-martialed for murder. 
Tommy Lee Jones plays Colonel Hayes Hodges, a retired Marine attorney
who owes his life to Childers.  Childers comes to Hodges to defend him
in his trial, and despite Hodges attempts to pursuade him otherwise he
agrees to do so.  Hodges is unsure however if he's good enough to save
his friend from a lifetime in jail. 
Female moviegoers beware, this film is heavy on the male "macho"
factor.  There's so much testosterone flowing in this movie in fact that
halfway through the two lead characters have no choice but to beat the
hell out of each other for about five minutes. 
Australian Guy Pearce plays Major Mark Biggs, the prosecutor in the case
and a pivotal character of the film.  However, Pearce's performance
almost ruins many of the scenes he's in and lessens the film's dramatic
tension.  You see, he plays his character with a strong New York accent,
one which seemed so silly that it got me laughing on several occasions. 
As I hinted at earlier, director Friedkin basically lucked out here and
emerged with a entertaining flick.  It's slow in spots, a little too
long, and the story unfolds in such a matter of fact manner that it's
hard to really get behind the film.  You know exactly where it's going,
and the audience is basically just waiting to get there.  Even the final
outcome of the trial seems unimportant, as it's brushed off with a quick
joke. 
If Friedkin had edited the film differently I think it could have been
tremendously more entertaining.  The main thing I'd have suggested would
be to not show the entire incident in the Middle East in it's entirety
so early in the film.  Because we see exactly what happens so early on,
we know everything we need to know and are just waiting for the rest of
the characters in the film to catch up.  Why not instead show us
portions of that scene in flashbacks as the film progresses, thereby
heightening the audience's interest in the film by having us not know
the entire truth right away?  Despite all that though, Rules of
Engagement is entertaining enough for me to recommend, as there's
definitely worse ways to spend your time. 
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Big Lebowski, The (1998)
THE BIG LEBOWSKI (1998)
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling
Copyright 1998 - The Jacksonville Film Journal
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Cast: Jeff Bridges, John Goodman, Julianne Moore, Steve Buscemi, David
Huddleston, John Turturro, Sam Elliott, Peter Stormare, Flea, Ben Gazarra,
Phillip Seymore Hoffman, Tara Reid
Written by: Joel and Ethan Coen
Directed by: Joel Coen
Running Time: 119 minutes
My Rating: ***** out of *****
After critic Gene Siskel saw the Coen brothers' 1996 film "Fargo" he
remarked that he would not see a better picture that year.  I thought that
was a pretty bold statement considering how early in the year the film was
released.  Well, here it is the first week of March, the Coen brothers
have released their latest film "The Big Lebowski," and I have to say, in
the words of Gene Siskel: I will not see a better film this year.
To describe the plot of "The Big Lebowski" would be pointless, as it's
just not something able to be described.  Jeff Bridges plays Jeff Lebowski
aka "The Dude," a hippie who gets mixed up in a case of mistaken identity
with a millionaire (David Huddleston), also named Jeff Lebowski.  What
follows includes kidnapping, ransom, auto theft, bowling, musical dance
numbers, former german rock stars, bad pornography, and more comedy than
ten movies usually have.
The Coen brothers, responsible for such wondeful motion pictures as
"Fargo," "The Hudsucker Proxy," "Raising Arizona," "Barton Fink," and
"Blood Simple" always succeed in creating their own little universe on the
movie screen, and with "The Big Lebowski" they certainly succeed again. 
How they have managed to maintain their creative filmmaking and
storytelling abilities, and now manage to TOP all their previous works is
beyond me.  But I am so glad that they have.
I usually try to avoid grand, sweeping statements when I write reviews,
but in the case of "The Big Lebowski" I just can't help it.  Without a
doubt, "The Big Lebowski" is the funniest film I have ever seen.  For the
entire running time of the film, I was constantly laughing.  Yes, that's
right.  I laughed for 119 minutes.  Never once during the 1am screening I
attended did I glance at my watch, and not once did I yawn or take my eyes
off the screen.  While the film ran I never wanted it to end, and when it
was over I wanted them to run it again.  If I was to give out the Oscars,
acting awards would go to all involved (particularly Bridges, Goodman, and
Buscemi, who's dialogue and chemistry with one another is fantastic),
along with awards for writing, directing, production design, music...
everything.  And a note to the Coen brothers: I want a sequel.  I want
more of these characters, and I want it as soon as possible.
Now I realize that comedy is a tricky thing, and that everyone has a
slightly different sense of humor.  And the comedy in "The Big Lebowski"
isn't necessarily jokes, set-ups, and punch lines.  It's dialogue and
attitudes, much like the comedic elements of "Pulp Fiction".
Certainly some of you will see the film and afterwards think that I am
completely insane.  So here's a little test to help you see if you'll go
along with the comedy of the film.  In the early seconds of the film, The
Dude writes a check for a ridiculously low amount of money, something like
$.68.  I found that to be absolutely hilarious.  If you would too, then
"The Big Lebowski" is right up your alley.  It's the best film of the year
so far, and I seriously doubt there will be anything better.  [R]

Title
Review for Brood, The (1979)
The Brood (1979) **1/2 out of ***** - Cast: Oliver Reed, Samantha Eggar, Art
Hindle. Written and Directed by: David Cronenberg. Running Time: 92 minutes.
Very rarely does reading a bad review inspire me to watch a movie. Usually
it's the other way around. A bad review would normally convince me that I
have no desire to see the particular film. But in the case of David
Cronenberg's "The Brood", I just HAD to see it after reading Leonard
Maltin's review of it in his film guide. (Note: I am going to quote the
review now, please understand that I am quoting. This is NOT my opinion but
the opinion of Leonard Maltin which I am using to prove a point. No
scandals, please.)
     "Eggar eats her own afterbirth while midget clones beat
     grandparents and lovely young schoolteachers to death with
     mallets. It's a big, wide, wonderful world we live in!"
Now, if you sometimes enjoy watching a really bad film just to make fun of
it, this must sound like a dream come true! However, after seeing it,
Maltin's description is sadly inappropriate (what he describes is no more
than 3 minutes of the film). Luckily though, it's really not such a bad
movie, and comes dangerously close to being a GOOD one.
I can see how Maltin had a hard time reviewing the film, because it is such
a hard one to describe. But I'll give it a shot. Oliver Reed stars as a
creepy psychologist who cares for mentally ill patients in a compound
somewhere in the woods. One of his patients is a severly traumatized woman
(Eggar) who has a husband (Hindle) and a young daughter. Amazingly, she also
has the wonderful ability to produce an instant child, however a mutant one,
based on her inner rage from her childhood trauma (I know, I know... but
stay with me). These "children" then act upon the rage she feels, killing
the people whom she hates.
Luckily, we don't find this out until the film's final, gruesome scenes. So
until that point it's an intriguing little story about some murders being
committed by "creatures" and it just so happens that the victims have some
relation to Eggar. Her husband, seeking to protect their daughter, sets out
to find the truth.
The horror genre is my least favorite of all genres, and within that genre,
David Cronenberg is one of my least favorite directors. Now, having said
that, you should understand that my rating of the film is EXTREMELY high.
Reed gives an outstanding performance, and helped to make it a bearable,
almost enjoyable experience. I found "The Brood" to be very similar in look
and theme to Larry Cohen's "It's Alive" from 1974, a film that I happened to
enjoy. A major drawback is an incredibly overblown (and therefore
irritating) musical score by Howard Shore which tends to blare at you when
nothing's really going on. And most importantly why I didn't give it a good
rating: I would never want to watch it again. Still, I think I may have to
start re-evaluating some of Cronenberg's other work. There just might
actually be a little story-telling talent there. [R]
--Chuck Dowling  
--Chuck's Movie Reviews -- http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/

Title
Review for Mystery Science Theater 3000: The Movie (1996)
Mystery Science Theater 3000: The Movie (1996) **** out of ***** - Cast:
Michael J. Nelson, Trace Beaulieu, Kevin Murphy, Jim Mallon.  Directed By:
Jim Mallon.  Running Time: 73 minutes.
Big screen version of the cult favorite TV series from Comedy Central.  If
you are unfamiliar with the show, here's the basic premise: Mike Nelson and
his robot friends are trapped in space and forced to watch really bad
movies.  To make the film more tolerable, they talk throughout the film,
making lots of jokes and obscure references to a number of different things.
For the big motion picture version they are forced to watch "This Island
Earth", a horrible 50s sci-fi flick (which surprisingly many film guides
rate highly).  There are only minor differences between this film and the
series: it is funnier than most episodes, it runs a little shorter, the
segments in between the watching of the film aren't done as well as on the
show, and it is rated PG-13, which allows for a little use of language,
but nothing too shocking I assure you.  And be sure to stay tuned through
the final credits.
For some ridiculous and completely stupid reason, Comedy Central cancelled
the TV show right before the film's release.  Comedy Central is now minus one
quality show.  The show has been picked up, however, by The Sci-Fi
Network.  The Sci-Fi network is run by some very bright individuals.
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related
links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for 4 Little Girls (1997)
4 Little Girls (1997) **** out of ***** - Produced and Directed by: Spike
Lee.  Running Time: 102 minutes.
It was 1963 in Birmingham, Alabama.  A blast ripped apart a Baptist
church, killing four young black girls.  That's the story told in "4
Little Girls", the latest film by Spike Lee.  Unlike Lee's other films, "4
Little Girls" is a documentary, told only through old news footage and the
recollections of family and friends of the victims.
The story told is a compelling and emotional one, and for the most part it
is well presented.  A couple of times the subject does seem to wander into
broader areas, as other events in Birmingham are discussed.  This isn't
such a horrible complaint, but the film is called "4 Little Girls" and not
"Birmingham in the '60s".  I would have rather seen more stories and
memories from the friends and family.
Also on hand to deliver their thoughts are Jesse Jackson, Bill Cosby, and
Green Bay Packer Reggie White.  Thankfully, these "outsider" interviews
are kept to a minimum, leaving more time for the family members to speak. 
However, there are a few seconds of interviews with former Alabama
governor George Wallace that are oddly fascinating, and almost deserve
their own film.
I understand that all revenue from the theatrical run of the film will be
donated to a college scholarship fund in Birmingham.  So if it's playing
in your area, you can go help out a good cause and get a fine documentary
for your troubles.  This would also be an excellent film for students and
teachers studying/teaching the civil rights movement.  [NR]
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Godson, The (1998)
Cast: Kevin McDonald, Dom DeLuise, Rodney Dangerfield, Joey Buttafuoco,
Keith Coogan,
Lou Ferrigno, Bob Hoge, Dom Irrera, Fabiana Udenio
Written and Directed by: Bob Hoge
Running Time: 100 minutes
Truly awful parody of The Godfather series and other gangster films.
Kevin McDonald (of TV's "The Kids in the Hall" which says to me that
he should know better) stars the youngest son of the Calzone crime
family.  Dom DeLuise (doing the Brando impression he did in Cannonball
Run II and other places too I'm sure) plays the leader of the Calzone
family, named "The Oddfather".  Rodney Dangerfield, who I could swear
had comedic ability at some point in his career, plays a rival to the
Calzone family, named "The Rodfather".  Are you laughing yet?  Neither
was I.
Inept joke after inept joke makes the similarly themed Jane Austin's
Mafia! look like a cinematic masterpiece.  When Joey Buttafuoco gives
the best performance in the film and the only laugh comes when Dom
DeLuise mutters the line "Your mother's ass" then what does that tell
you?  I'd recommend fast forwarding through this garbage if it wasn't
for the presence of gorgeous Fabiana Udenio (Austin
Powers:International Man of Mystery) playing Don Na (get it?  Don Na?
Donna?  It's funny!).  You may still want to hit mute though.
The Godson is available on DVD from Sterling Home Entertainment.  I
can't imagine anyone wanting to own this film on DVD, but I guess it's
still my duty to inform you of the disc's "features".  It contains the
film in standard (pan and scan) format, the film's trailer, and
production notes.  Curiously on the back of the case, certain cast
members are named in the list of special features.  Since when is an
actor who appeared in the film considered to be a special feature
(especially this cast)?  [PG-13]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email:chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted
without permission.

Title
Review for Addiction, The (1995)
(1995) NO STARS - C:Lily Taylor, Christopher Walken, Annabella Sciorra,
Paul Calderon.
Abel Ferrera, director of such mediocre films as "Bad Lieutenant" and "Body
Snatchers", and of such awful films as "The Gladiator" and "Dangerous Game",
adds another to his awful list. Basically, "The Addiction" is just another
low budget vampire flick, although the term "vampire" is never used in the
film. It tries to be some sort of psuedo-intellectual metaphor for drug
addiction and even man's evilness upon his fellow man.
Taylor plays a college student who is attacked one night in a dark alley by
vampire Sciorra. Sciorra bites her, and then for the next twenty minutes
Taylor basically just gets sick and throws up blood all the time. Pleasant.
Then Taylor starts to get "hungry" so she goes out into the city to get a
"fix". At first, she apparently can't bring herself to actually bite anyone,
so she brings along hypodermic needles and withdraws blood from homeless
people. She then proceeds home and injects herself with the blood. All of
which we get to watch. Boy o boy, at this point we've got vomit and needles,
my eyes are GLUED to the screen. I wonder what other disgusting and
unpleasant things we'll get to see.
Taylor soon gets the hang of biting people, so thankfully, no more needles.
She meets up with Christopher Walken, who plays a sort of mentor vampire who
has been around much longer than Taylor has. In his brief appearence he
spouts out dialog about literature and about man's inhumanity throughout
history. Then he leaves, and the carnage (and unpleasantness) continues.
The only new thing that "The Addiction" tells us about vampires is that if a
vampire approaches you on the streets, he or she will give you the option of
whether or not you want your life saved. The vampire wants you to tell it to
"go away" with strength and confidence, like you really mean it, instead of
just begging and pleading for your life like a little baby. Yes, that's
right, I kid you not. In conclusion, the whole film is boring and
unpleasant, two things that never add up to a good movie. The film is in
black and white if anyone is interested.
Have A Question Or Comment? Email Me At chuckd21@southeast.net
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,500 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
Cast: Tom Hanks, Edward Burns, Tom Sizemore, Jeremy Davies, Vin
Diesel, Adam Goldberg, Barry Pepper, Giovanni Ribisi, Matt Damon,
Dennis Farina, Ted Danson, Paul Giamatti
When I was a little kid (before I even started school), I used to
think that war had spectators like a sporting event would.  I thought
that there were bleachers or something similar where people from
opposing countries would sit and watch (look, I was just five years
old, ok?)  Well, Saving Private Ryan makes you feel like you are a
spectator in World War II, sitting just far enough away as to not get
killed.  It's the first war film I've ever seen that seemingly
presents war as it probably was, instead of how Hollywood thinks it
was.
The film starts with the invasion of Normandy during World War II.
And right away you'll know that you're not about to see just another
war film.  We see one of the invasion boats open up it's doors and
within a second at least ten soldiers are brutally killed.  It's such
a powerful jolt, and I've never seen anything like it.  Compare it to
a scene from another great WWII movie The Longest Day where during the
invasion of Normandy, Sean Connery jumps out of his invasion boat,
falls into the water, and it's treated like a wacky little moment.
Nothing against The Longest Day, but I think that Saving Private Ryan
is probably a little closer to reality.
After an incredibly brutal 20-30 minutes, we come to the plot of the
film.  Three brothers have been killed and their mother is about to
receive all three telegrams announcing their deaths.  It's learned
that there's a fourth brother, Private James Ryan, who is somewhere
behind enemy lines.  A squad of soldiers (led by Tom Hanks in another
outstanding dramatic performance) is ordered to go and find him, so
that he can be sent home.
The plot however, just isn't too crucial to the film.  Saving Private
Ryan isn't about finding a man and sending him home, it's about war,
about what soldiers go through, and the overall devastation that war
causes.  The violence in the film is shockingly brutal.  It may seem
gratuitous, but then again, so is war.
I didn't really care for the film's wrap-around scenes, the scenes
which open and close the film.  In them, an elderly Ryan visits the
graves of the fallen soldiers from the film.  While the scene's
intentions are good, they just don't mesh with the rest of the film.
To me they came off like cheesy TV-movie type theatrics.  That's
pretty much my only gripe though, and it can be easily overlooked
thanks to the excellence of the rest of the film.
So it all comes down to this: is Saving Private Ryan a good movie?
Yes, it most certainly is.  But it's more of a great film, or rather
an example of great filmmaking, than a great story.  It's certainly
not something I'd call entertaining, not something that I'd want to
watch over and over again.  It's powerful, moving, and clearly the
front-runner for an Academy Award in so many categories.  It's easily
the best film Spielberg has ever made, maybe not the best story he's
ever told, but the greatest film he's ever put together.  [R]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL: http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email: chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1995-1998 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be
reprinted without permission.

Title
Review for Orgazmo (1997)
Cast: Trey Parker, Matt Stone, Dian Bachar, Michael Dean Jacobs, Ron
Jeremy, Lloyd Kaufman
Written and Directed by: Trey Parker
Running Time: 94 minutes
Crude, low-budget comedy from Matt Stone and Trey Parker, the creators
of Comedy Central's smash hit "South Park".  Filmed before "South
Park" became a big hit, but released after Stone and Parker's summer
1998 effort BASEketball, Orgazmo tells the tale of Joe Young (Trey
Parker), a mormon on a trip to Hollywood who gets mixed up in the
adult film industry after knocking on the wrong door.  Eventually,
Young becomes both a superstar in the business, as well as a crime
fighting superhero.
Orgazmo is certainly crude (it's rated NC-17), but nothing in the film
really offended me in any way.  It's definately low-brow humor from
start to finish, but even low-brow humor can be done well.  Of course
I could have done without seeing the "T-Rex" character or the rampant
shots of naked male ass... which yes, I understand is part of the
overall joke of the film, but still...
You'd probably never think that a parody of both porn and of martial
arts films would be cohesive enough to be entertaining, but Orgazmo
manages to pull it off.  Sure with these kinds of movies most of the
jokes are hit and miss, but enough of the jokes work here, therefore
making it a pretty entertaining flick for fans of Parker and Stone.
[NC-17]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email:chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted
without permission.

Title
Review for Here on Earth (2000)
See this review as it was intended at: http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/
Cast: Chris Klein, Leelee Sobieski, Josh Hartnett, Michael Rooker, Annie
Corley, Bruce Greenwood, Annette O'Toole, Elaine Hendrix, Stuart Wilson,
Ronni Saxon 
Written by: Michael Seitzman 
Directed by: Mark Piznarski 
Running Time: 96 minutes 
Spoiled rich kid Kelley Morse (Chris Klein) receives a new Mercedes for
a graduation present.  He and his buddies take it for a joyride to a
small nearby town, where he proceeds to torment the locals simply
because he's rich and they're not.  He ends up provoking Jasper (Josh
Hartnett) into a race and as a result, the local gas station and diner
are destroyed when they crash into it. 
Kelley is sentenced to rebuild the diner, and has to live with Jasper in
a spare room over his family's barn.  Jasper's girlfriend Sam (Leelee
Sobieski) soon takes a liking to Kelley however, despite the fact that
1) it was her family's diner that was destroyed and B) all Kelley does
is sit around, sulk, and smart off to the townspeople.  But when she
sees him sweaty and shirtless, that's apparently all she needs to lose
her feelings for Jasper (whose only fault seems to be a perpetual case
of hat hair). 
So Sobieski soon falls in love with Kelley, especially after the day she
follows him through the woods and hears him giving his graduation speech
(which he was unable to deliver because he caused the DESTRUCTION of
property and nearly KILLED dozens of people).  In the speech, Kelley
quotes a poem by Robert Frost, which just so happens to be Sam's
favorite poem as well.  Awwwww.  Soon they're frolicking around in the
fields and for some reason waste no time letting people in town
(especially Jasper's best friend) see them together. 
Kelley continues to make an ass of himself in town, especially when he
shows up at the town dance, drunk and steaming because Sam went with
Jasper.  Kelley runs off and decides to leave town.  Sam catches up to
him at the bus station and he asks her to come to Boston with him. 
Jasper shows up and tearfully confesses to Sam just how much he loves
her, and Sam, without even breaking stride basically says "See ya!" and
takes off to Boston with Kelley. 
Here on Earth goes in so many wrong directions from the start that by
the time its fairly decent ending comes around, its completely
worthless.  Chris Klein and Leelee Sobieski are two of my current
favorite young performers, and it's because of their presence that I
watched this film in the first place.  However, not long into the
proceedings I wanted to just reach into the film and strangle them
both.  I shouldn't have such feelings towards people I like, but their
characters are so infuriating that... well trust me, you'll feel the
same way. 
Even though both of the lead male characters are usually in the wrong,
Kelley is hands down the more unlikable of the two, simply because his
jerkish actions are calculated.  He INTENDS to be a jackass each and
every time he does it.  Jasper on the other hand, only REACTS to
Kelley's provocations, and afterwards comes across as being truly sorry
for his impulsive actions.  But, as in life, nice guys finish last. 
For the entire film we watch Sam fall in love with the guy no one likes
while the film's only sympathetic character gets completely crushed. 
THEN, a cancer subplot comes into play (where things get even MORE
infuriating, if you can imagine that).  What, things weren't depressing
enough for you Mr. Screenwriter?  Who greenlit this project?  Who "on
Earth" thought this would entertain anyone?  Perhaps if the film had
been structured where Kelley perhaps felt some remorse after he caused
the DESTRUCTION of property and nearly KILLED dozens of people.  But
even after he's destroyed these people's lives he continues to be a snob
to them, and ruins one more for good measure. 
Here on Earth is available on DVD from Fox Home Entertainment.  It
contains the film in its original theatrical aspect ratio of 1.85:1 and
is enhanced for 16x9 televisions.  Extras include Jessica Simpson's
music video for "Where You Are", a commercial for the film's soundtrack
(which by the way is the only good thing about the film), the original
theatrical trailer and five TV spots, trailers for other Fox releases
(Anna and the King, Anywhere But Here, The Beach, Drive Me Crazy, Ever
After, Romeo + Juliet, Simply Irresistible), as well as that new Fox
promo touting their upcoming DVD releases that I really enjoy.  The
picture and sound quality on the disc are fine... nothing that will
challenge anyone's audio/video systems of course.  Fans of this movie
(if any exist) should enjoy the DVD release. 
Here on Earth is not entertaining nor is it compelling.  No joy or
entertainment value can be derived from any of the events of the film. 
It is merely a waste of time, money and talent. 

Title
Review for Fools Rush In (1997)
Fools Rush In (1997) **1/2 out of ***** - Cast: Matthew Perry, Salma Hayek,
Jon Tenney, Siobhan Fallon, Jill Clayburgh. Directed by: Andy Tennant.
Running Time: 107 minutes.
An odd attempt to make a romantic comedy based upon a one night stand.
Sucessful businessman Perry is assigned to a project in Las Vegas. One
night, while waiting in line to use the bathroom at a mexican restuarant, he
meets Salma Hayek (who by the way is one of the most beautiful actresses
working today) and the two end up in bed together that night. I guess
nothing says lovin' like a toilet in a greasy taco joint.
Anyway, cut to three months later. Hayek pops up at Perry's house to tell
him that she's pregnant. A quick series of comic misadventures later and the
two are married. Now here's where the film lost it's comedic potential, even
though it fully understood that potential, gave it a shot, and then
immediately threw it aside. After they get married, Hayek starts to get on
Perry's nerves, redecorating his home in a complete mexican motif for
example.
Now had the film stayed true to itself, having Perry realize that 1) he was
a fool, and 2) he rushed into the situation (as the film's very title
suggests) therefore exploiting every potential comedic moment possible,
"Fools Rush In" could have been a hilarious movie. Instead it just gets
sickeningly sappy, dropping the comedy altogether in favor of attempted
romantic scenes which aren't believable for a moment. The cast does it's
best though, with Jon Tenney as Perry's best friend getting many of the
film's best lines, and Hayek plays just about the most attractive pregnant
woman I've ever seen. [PG-13]
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Death Becomes Her (1992)
Death Becomes Her (1992) * out of ***** - C:Goldie Hawn, Bruce Willis,
Meryl Streep, Isabella Rossellini, Jonathan Silverman, Sydney Pollack.
What the hell? The same creative team which brought us the Back To The
Future trilogy and Forrest Gump must have really been bored one day and
half-assedly thought of the idea for this garbage. After the idea was
pitched to the studio, a conversation like this must have taken place:
"Hey guys! The studio gave us the $50 million budget we asked for!"
"A script? Screw the script! Let's call the special effects team! Think of
what we can get for $50 million!"
"What about the public? I think the people like a little script with their
special effects."
"Screw the public! We've got $50 million! Don't let morals cloud your mind,
we're filmmakers!"
And thus was born Death Becomes Her, the most pathetic special effects
comedy since Howard The Duck. There's not even an attempt at comedy in this
film except for one scene involving Sydney Pollack who plays a doctor. The
effects and the direction are excellent but are by no means enough to make a
movie interesting for an hour and a half. A total waste of talent.
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office
reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for Wedding Singer, The (1998)
Cast: Adam Sandler, Drew Barrymore, Angela Featherstone, Christina
Pickles, Steve Buscemi, Jon Lovitz, Kevin
Nealon, Billy Idol, Robert Smigel, Alexis Arquette
Written by: Tim Herlihy
Directed by: Frank Coraci
Running Time: 90 minutes
The Wedding Singer surprised me in a way that I really didn't want to
be surprised. It has a level of sweetness to it that I really didn't
expect, and quite frankly going into it, really didn't want either. I
expected more of the angry-type humor that made Happy Gilmore so
funny. But The Wedding Singer does have it's humorous moments, and in
the end, the sweetness of the film did win me over.
Adam Sandler plays the title character, a young man who earns a living
singing at local weddings. The day before his own wedding, his fiancee
(Angela Featherstone) dumps him. He then starts to fall in love with a
waitress (Drew Barrymore) that he met at one of his shows. Trouble is
that she's engaged to be married as well. On top of that, the guy
she's engaged to is a real jerk, but only Sandler seems to know
that. Oh what to do?
The Wedding Singer takes place in 1985, for no real reason except for
some "gimmick" laughs and the chance to release yet another retro 80s
compilation soundtrack. The gimmicks I'm referring to involving
throwing 80s cultural icons at us and expecting us to laugh at them
just because they're from the 80s. See that? It's a Rubix Cube!
Remember those? It's funny! It's a Rubix Cube! That guy dressed like
Michael Jackson! He's funny! Jokes like that are a sign of weak
writing.
I say that The Wedding Singer won me over mainly because of Drew
Barrymore's character. She's just so cute in this movie.  Late in the
film it looks as though things aren't going to work out between
Sandler and Barrymore and I felt bad for them. It didn't matter that I
knew exactly how the story would end up even before the opening
credits started, and it didn't matter that I'd seen scenes like that
countless times before. For a few moments, I felt for these
characters. For a film this weak to be able to do that... well then
there must be something a little special about it. [PG-13]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL: http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email: chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1995-1998 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be
reprinted without permission.

Title
Review for Cable Guy, The (1996)
The Cable Guy (1996) ****1/2 - C:Jim Carrey, Matthew Broderick, George
Segal, Ben Stiller.
The Cable Guy is easily Jim Carrey's best movie ever and the reason is
simple, it's because it's not a Jim Carrey movie. You see, if this had been
an actual Jim Carrey movie, he'd be jumping all over the place with a weird
haircut and would be talking with his butt cheeks.
Ok, so he's not exactly normal in The Cable Guy either. Actually, his
character is quite dark and complex, not the fun-loving silly guy Jim Carrey
fans are used to. This is certain to make his fans upset and rightfully so.
All comedians get tired of doing the same thing over and over again and this
film was just too good of a possibility for Carrey to pass up. I applaud
what he's trying to do with his career with this film by trying to show
people that he can ACTUALLY act. Carrey adds a great amount of depth to his
character in the film, depth that someone like Adam Sandler or Chris Farley
would not be able to do.
The Cable Guy is the newest entry in the "BLANK-from-hell" genre which
includes other films such as Pacific Heights (the tenant from hell), The
Temp (the secretary from hell), and The Crush (the Alicia Silverstone from
hell). Carrey plays the title character, who doesn't use his real name so
instead he uses names from old TV shows. Throughout most of the film he uses
the name of Chip Douglas.
The cable guy comes to install cable for Steven (Broderick), who has just
recently seperated from his girlfriend on a "trial" basis and has moved into
his own place. Steven asks him about "illegal" cable and Carrey agrees to
"juice him up". But, he expects something in return, Steven's friendship.
And he'll do whatever he has to do to get it.
Broderick gets to do what he does best here, which is the normal guy caught
in a strange situation. His character, at first, doesn't really want Chip to
go away, he just wants him to stop acting so weird all the time. His mistake
comes when his girlfriend wants to give him a second chance and he decides
to brush off Chip, telling him "I don't have any room in my life for a new
friend". Chip then proceeds to ruin Steven's life.
Carrey's performance has many levels to it. One minute you're laughing at
him, the next you feel sorry for him, and then you're scared of him. Ben
Stiller's direction is quite good and the film is very well made. Stiller
should have exploited the film's final punchline/message a little more than
he did, but the joke is still funny anyway. Eric Roberts has a very brief
cameo as himself and it too is hilarious. In conclusion, The Cable Guy is
the best thing Carrey could do with his talents at this point in his career
and he should pursue more films like this one.
Please visit my movie reviews web site at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/

Title
Review for Help! (1965)
See this review as it was intended at: http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/
Cast: John Lennon, Paul McCartney, George Harrison, Ringo Starr, Leo
McKern, Eleanor Bron, Victor Spinetti, Roy Kinnear 
Written by: Marc Behm and Charles Wood 
Directed by: Richard Lester 
Running Time: 90 minutes 
"Hey, someone's got a hold of me finger." 
 --- Beatles drummer Ringo Starr after getting his hand stuck in a
vending machine... the first line spoken by any of The Beatles, in
Help!. 
Help!, the Beatles' second film, is charmingly goofy fun.  The plot
(which is completely insignificant by the way) is best described by the
back of the box for the film: Help! follows the Fab Four on a worldwide
jaunt around the globe. When a fan sends Ringo an ancient sacrificial
ring that becomes stuck on his finger, he becomes targeted by a group of
hilariously obsessed oriental mystics, as well as an ambitious scientist
who has his own plans for the ring.  On the run, the Beatles are chased
from London to the Swiss Alps to the Bahamas, outwitting their pursuers,
singing great songs and having a ball. 
All four band members are given their own individual "bits" of comedy. 
Ringo of course is the bearer of the ring and is constantly on the run,
Paul gets shrunk to microscopic size at one point, George has an action
sequence where he's hanging onto a moving car (Harrison actually does
the stunts too, amazingly), and John... well John basically behaves like
a ten year old tormenting everyone, especially those in a position of
authority.  Best joke of the film though comes at the beginning... the
house the Fab Four lives in and what they do when they come home is
hilarious! 
In interviews I've seen (from The Beatles Anthology I believe), the band
members talk about Help! saying it was basically an excuse for them to
visit places in the world they hadn't been yet.  You can definitely tell
that's the case.  There's no reason for The Beatles to suddenly show up
in the Swiss Alps for a wacky skiing montage, but it's fun nonetheless. 
The gags and the music are the reason to see this film, not the plot. 
Despite the fact that The Beatles are my favorite band of all time, I
had avoided watching this film up until this point (when I had to review
this DVD release).  The Beatles are the greatest rock band in history,
but I was worried that their films would be a disappointment, since
their expertise is in music of course... not movies.  And while they
rarely take any of the events going on around them seriously, they do a
fine job of being themselves.  That's all that's being asked of them. 
Help! is available on DVD from MPI Home Video as part of The Beatles DVD
Collection (as well as being available separately).  The film is
presented in its original fullframe aspect ratio.  Extras are plentiful
on the disc, as it includes: a 1960s interview with director Richard
Lester, Lester's short film The Running, Jumping and Standing Still
Film, alternate audio tracks in Spanish and French (as well as subtitles
in Spanish and French), bios for the filmmakers and the supporting cast
members, the original theatrical trailer (and trailers for A Hard Day's
Night, Magical Mystery Tour, The Beatles: The First US Visit, and "You
Can't Do That": The Making of A Hard Day's Night), two Beatles
newsreels, and behind the scenes footage from the production and the
film's premiere (accompanied by radio spots promoting the film),  
Also on the disc are detailed notes about the restoration process done
to the original print of the film (along with A Hard Day's Night). 
Despite the laborious work put into the restoration of Help!, there
still needs to be more.  Lots of scratches and artifacts are present
throughout... I would have hated to see this print before work began on
its restoration! 
The disc (and movie for that matter) really excels whenever a Beatles
song starts up, and the audio, which is adequate during the film itself,
then kicks into high gear.  You'll hear Beatles favorites like Help!,
You're Gonna Lose That Girl, You've Got To Love Your Love Away, Ticket
To Ride, I Need You, The Night Before, and Another Girl (as well as a
dramatic score rendition of A Hard Day's Night during the finale). 
Beatles fans should definitely add this this DVD to their collection. 
It's the best transfer of the film available and the extras make it all
the more valuable. 

Title
Review for Spice World (1997)
SPICE WORLD (1998)
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling
Copyright 1998 - The Jacksonville Film Journal
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Cast: The Spice Girls, Richard E. Grant, Roger Moore, George Wendt, Mark
McKenney, Bob Hoskins, Meat Loaf, Elvis Costello
Written by: Kim Fuller
Directed by: Bob Spiers
Running Time: 93 minutes
My Rating: ** out of *****
"Spice World" is just one long promotional film for the British girl band
The Spice Girls. Sure there's a hint of humor in there every once in a
while. Actually, there's a couple of pretty good jabs AT The Spice Girls.
But overall, who cares? Not me.
If you don't know by now, The Spice Girls sing songs of love and friendship
and responsibility and girl power, yet dress like streetwalkers from a lower
middle class neighborhood. In "Spice World" they ride around in their big
tour bus, whining about having to do photo shoots and give interviews.
Amazingly, all the talk they do about keeping commitments and upholding
responsibilities only really applies to fun things, things they WANT to do,
not things they are required to do to keep earning money. And they keep
babbling about "girl power" when they should really be talking about
"cleavage power". I mean, if all it takes is girl power, then why are they
only one thread away from bursting out of their skimpy outfits? The film is
PG, but really with only some very minor dialogue changes and scene
extentions, you'd have yourself one raunchy adult film.
By the way, there's something in the opening credits which says "Based on an
idea by The Spice Girls". Wow, they got idea credit! I certainly wish that
was a new trend in Hollywood... giving credit for simply having the thought
"Say girls, let's make a movie!"
The supporting cast fares well. Roger Moore (the real James Bond) mockingly
plays the cliche-spewing "Chief" of The Spice Girls, and darn it all, he's
fun to watch. Mark McKenney also is good as a screenwriter trying to pitch
film ideas to the band's manager (Richard E. Grant). One question though:
George Wendt?
You'd think that "Spice World" would envoke one of two reactions in people.
If you like the Spice Girls, you'll like them even more afterwards. And if
you can't stand them (like me), then "Spice World" will really make you
sick. Oddly, the audience I saw the film with, roughly 50 twelve year-old
girls, sat in silence for the entire film. Well, not the two who sat
directly behind me. They kept muttering "This is stupid" over and over
again. Maybe there is hope for humanity after all. [PG]

Title
Review for Ready to Rumble (2000)
Cast: David Arquette, Scott Caan, Oliver Platt, Rose McGowan, Martin
Landau, Joe Pantoliano, Caroline Rhea, Ahmet Zappa
Featured Wrestlers: Bill Goldberg, "Diamond" Dallas Page, Sting, Disco
Inferno, Sid Vicious, Bam Bam Bigelow, Perry Saturn, Curt Hennig
Written by: Steven Brill
Directed by: Brian Robbins
Running Time: 107 minutes
Harmless, silly and fun comedy about dim-witted wrestling fans Gordie
and Sean (David Arquette and Scott Caan) who idolize current World
Championship Wrestling heavyweight champion Jimmy King (Oliver Platt). 
When King is screwed out of his title by a corrupt promoter (Joe
Pantoliano), Gordie and Sean take it upon themselves to find their
fallen hero and restore his glory.
My biggest fear about Ready to Rumble was dispatched early on, as the
filmmakers are quick to show that wresting is indeed choreographed (but
not fake, mind you).  The hook of the movie is that Gordie and Sean are
just TOO stupid to realize that.
Arquette and Caan are suitably over the top with their performances,
which is exactly what a movie like this requires, and Oliver Platt (one
of my favorite actors) is a riot as the drunken washed-up ex-champion. 
Many have scoffed at the idea that Platt should be playing a heavyweight
champion wrestler with an unbeaten record, but for me it just added to
the "silly factor" of the film, thereby increasing my enjoyment of it. 
One casting complaint however: Rose McGowan as a sexy dancer?  Please...
if Rose McGowan is sexy then I'm Marilyn Manson.
Given the current state of the actual WCW, if Oliver Platt were
appearing as Jimmy King right now on WCW programming, he'd be the most
popular guy they have.  On a similar note, the "plot line" of the
wresting portions of the film are more entertaining than anything the
WCW writers have been able to come up with in the last two years. 
Although one does have to ask... why would any wrestling promoter fire
the head wrestler of a company who is both unbeaten and extremely
popular with the fans?
Director Brian Robbins (you'll remember him as Eric from TV's "Head of
the Class") just knows how to make good dumb movies.  This movie fits in
nicely with his previous efforts Good Burger and Varsity Blues.  And
screenwriter Steven Brill (the epic Mighty Ducks trilogy, Late Last
Night) manages to keep things both sophomoric and clever at the same
time, with almost all the jokes of the film getting a laugh out of me. 
The only exceptions to that were: 1) a scene involving a van full of
singing nuns and 2) any scene involving the old woman wrestling fan. 
Those moments made me cringe and/or groan.  As an added bonus though,
the audience is treated to outtakes from the film as the final credits
roll.  [PG-13]
Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for How to Be a Player (1997)
How To Be A Player (1997) NO STARS out of ***** - Cast: Bill Bellamy, Bernie
Mac, Gilbert Gottfried. Written by: Mark Brown and Deetria Johnson. Directed
by: Lionel C. Martin. Running Time: 98 minutes.
Wow, a film without any redeeming qualities whatsoever. I'm amazed that
someone thought this was a story that must be told on screen. Many blacks in
Hollywood complain that they are not nominated for awards based on their
race. I think first they need to concentrate their energy on themselves, and
stop making movies which makes them look like nothing more than sex-crazed
buffoons. Even I'm offended by it.
Bill Bellamy is a "player" which means he sleeps with a lot of women and
lies to them. What a pleasant main character. One day, his friends decide
that they want to find out how to be a player. Why they decide this "one
day" I have no idea. How many years have they been friends and why all of a
sudden would they want to learn? Anyway, Bellamy agrees to teach, and his
wonderful lesson to his friends consists of letting them ride in his car
while he rides from house to house having sex with women. This is the bulk
of the film folks, guys riding from house to house, one keeps getting out to
have sex, while the others sit in the car.
Since Russell Simmons is producer, and since the official title of the film
is "Def Jam's How To Be A Player", I was ready to be jumping up and down and
stomping my feet and beating the person next to me because of the comedy.
Amazingly, aside from Gilbert Gottfried's 90 seconds of screen time, there
was no comedy in the film for me to express myself in such a manner. Instead
of jokes, there's just an endless stream of profanity and naked breasts (and
naked breasts aren't so bad, but naked breasts alone don't make a good
movie).
Be sure to bring along your ebonics to english dictionary as well. Gilbert
Gottfried's character serves as one in his very brief appearance, asking for
explanations as to what is being said. They should have brought him along
for the entire film. [R]
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Jing cha gu shi IV: Jian dan ren wu (1996)
First Strike (1996) **** out of ***** - Cast: Jackie Chan. Directed by:
Stanley Tong. Running Time: 85 minutes.
After a brief theatrical run earlier this year, Jackie Chan's latest action
flick "First Strike" arrives on home video. If you enjoyed "Rumble in the
Bronx", you'll probably enjoy this one almost as much.
"First Strike" is known by many other titles, but the main thing you'll need
to know is that it's the fourth in Chan's "Police Story" film series.
"Supercop", the previous Chan film released to theaters, was the third in
that series. I wasn't too impressed with "Supercop", but "First Strike" has
restored my interest.
I usually find the plots of Chan's films unimportant, just time filler
between the incredible action sequences. "First Strike" is no exception. The
story has something to do with the CIA, the KGB, double agents, and a stolen
nuclear warhead. No matter though, as there are numerous spectacular scenes
of action. The stunts and the fight choreography are top-notch. There's a
fight sequence which takes place underwater in a shark tank, which I was
completely ready to dismiss as ridiculous. But somehow, amazingly, the scene
is pulled off in a very credible fashion. Also, as with "Rumble in the
Bronx", the film has a great sense of humor.
"First Strike" is, in many regards, a variation of a James Bond film.
However, instead of an overly calm, over-sexed main character, Chan's
character is an actual human being. He gets hurt when he's hit (which is
often) and he's not-overconfident. Even though he's a master at martial
arts, his countless facial expressions while fighting (or in any of the
action sequences) denote that even he's constantly surprised at what he can
accomplish.
American action movie directors these days seem to think that their audience
is full of idiots who will swallow whatever garbage that's spoon fed to
them. And the number of these horrible action films is rapidly increasing.
Chan's movies consistantly amaze me, as each time I see something I've never
seen before. Our directors could learn a great deal from that, but I doubt
they even have the guts to try.  [PG-13]
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Independence Day (1996)
Independence Day (1996) ***** - C:Will Smith, Bill Pullman, Jeff Goldblum,
Robert Loggia, Randy Quaid, Mary McDonnell, Judd Hirsch, Brent Spiner,
Harvey Fierstein, Harry Connick Jr.
This is the greatest summer movie ever. I repeat, this is the greatest
summer movie of all-time. This is exactly what a summer movie should be.
It's fun, loud, tense, exciting, action-packed, and it will keep your
attention for two and a half hours.
Unless you've been living in a cave for the last year, you've seen the
previews and know what the film is about. If for some reason you don't,
here's the plot: aliens start to destroy the earth and we have to stop them.
That's it. That's all there is. But it's more than enough. With that you get
mass destruction, hundreds of human and alien aircraft dogfighting in the
skies, aliens here on earth, the inside of an alien mothership, and lots of
suspense. This is a great roller-coaster ride of a movie.
That's not to say it doesn't have it's problems. The plot isn't exactly new.
Some scenes seem to be "inspired" from several other films including the
Star Warstrilogy, The Right Stuff,War of the Worldsand many of the
disaster films from the 70s. The music, which is good, just seems to be
poured on a little too much at times. Also, Randy Quaid plays a drunk in the
film who claims aliens kidnapped him several years ago. Yet, even though
there are aliens running around and alien ships are destroying the planet,
whenever Quaid mentions that he was kidnapped everyone acts like 'Yeah,
yeah, sure you were, ok whatever," and then roll their eyes like he's crazy.
But, all of these things are trivial because as I said before, this is the
greatest summer movie ever.
To be a successful summer movie (or any movie for that matter) the film
needs to make you forget your troubles and entertain you. ID4 succeeds
fantastically. For two and a half hours you will completely forget about
what's going on in your life and be completely engrossed in the lives of the
people on the screen. ID4 needs to be seen in a theater to be appreciated
because it will likely lose most of it's impact on TV. Director Roland
Emmerich completely redeems himself after the dreadfully boring Stargate.
Please visit my movie reviews web site at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
You'll be glad you did.

Title
Review for Quest, The (1996)
(1996) *** - C:Jean Claude Van Damme, Roger Moore.
I was fully prepared to hate this film. I haven't liked any Van Damme movie
in the past, so why would now be any different? And he directs the film as
well. I figured that this would be like Steven Seagal's "On Deadly Ground",
where an egomaniac was given too much control and wound up making a truly
awful film. But, I found "The Quest" to be pleasantly entertaining, and
worth an hour and thirty-five minutes of my life.
Van Damme isn't trying to do anything new with the kickboxing genre, and
that's good because there really isn't anything new that CAN be done with
it. He plays a pickpocket in the 1920s who, through a series of accidents,
ends up in the "Lost City" somewhere in Asia fighting in a worldwide
tournament to find out who is the world's best fighter. Along the way he
meets up with Roger Moore, who plays an suave ex-British Navy man who has
gone into business for himself, which includes pirating ships and stealing
anything valuable that he can get his hands on.
Van Damme as a director surprised me. The film looks and feels completely
authentic, and the fight scenes are well staged (he does use slow-motion
just a bit too much however). Also, he doesn't make his character the star
of the film. Whenever Moore is on screen, Moore is the center of the
camera's attention as Van Damme just stands in the background listening to
his every word. Also, his character doesn't even think he can win the
tournament until late in the film, so he's not cocky and arrogant which
would have easily become annoying.
"The Quest" is not a great film by any means. It's simple, it uses all the
cliches of the genre and offers nothing really new. But it doesn't try to be
anything different than that. It succeeds at what it wanted to succeed at,
which was to be mildly entertaining. Roger Moore (who IMO was the best Bond)
steals the film and I'm glad he did. He's fun to watch. Don't expect much
from "The Quest", and you just might find yourself being entertained.
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,500 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office
reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for Road to Wellville, The (1994)
Anthony Hopkins, Matthew Broderick, Bridget Fonda, John Cusack,
Dana Carvey, Colm Meaney, Lara Flynn Boyle.
The Road To Wellville is one big mess of a movie. There are three seperate
story lines throughout the film and none of them come together at the end.
The main story involves Broderick and Fonda who come to the Battle Creek
Sanitarium, a "health" resort run by the inventor of the corn flake, Dr.
John Henry Kellogg (Hopkins). Another plot involves John Cusack trying to
start a rival breakfast food company and still another involves Kellogg's
son (Carvey) who keeps terrorizing his father and the people at the
sanitarium.
Broderick's character is subjected to all sorts of strange "health"
contraptions, which allow him to do what he does best, the normal guy in a
strange situation (see also: The Cable Guy, The Freshman, and Biloxi Blues).
It's his reactions to what's going on around him that make the movie, and
the entire film should have been about him and his experiences.
What we get instead are things that I can't imagine anyone caring about.
These things include: vomiting, endless fart jokes, gratuitous naked fat
people, gratuitous sexual discussions by naked fat people, masterbation,
talk about masterbation, mud, and unfaithful spouses. Also, the ending is
unsatisfying. However, there is good score music and as I said earlier,
Broderick's character is amusing. But overall, steer clear of The Road To
Wellville. D:Alan Parker.
Have A Question Or Comment? Email Me At chuckd21@southeast.net
Please visit my movie reviews web site at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
You'll be glad you did.

Title
Review for Nature of the Beast (1995)
(1995) *1/2 - C:Eric Roberts, Lance Henriksen, Brion James.
A Victor Salva Film. Victor Salva. Hmmm. Why does that sound so familiar to
me? Victor Salva. Nope, I can't quite place it.
We learn early in the film that there are two criminals on the loose. One
has stolen money from the mob, and one is killing everyone he comes into
contact with, calling himself "Hatchet Man". He's called "Hatchet Man"
because he likes to chop up his victims into little tiny pieces using his
hatchet, obviously. The two main characters (the two only characters really)
meet up and drive around the desert, stopping in hotels and diners along the
way. Roberts, as an intense drug addict, feels as though he has bonded with
businessman Henriksen (who for some reason wears a really fake looking
padded stomach to make it look like his character has a pot belly), and will
not let him wander from his site as they travel through the desert in
Henriksen's new company car, each alluding to the fact that they know who
the other person is.
"The Nature of the Beast" is a letdown, and it seems that writer/director
Victor Salva has no idea how to make a film, whoever he is. One big mistake
with the film is the casting. Eric Roberts is perfectly cast in his role of
the shady, dusty drifter, but Lance Henriksen is not the right man for his
character. You see, the script depends on the fact that this character be
played by an actor who can portray a bewildered business man-type character
and Henriksen has played one too many psychos in his career to be able to
revert back to this kind of part. He seems demented from the beginning of
the film, which makes you start to think more along the lines of the
"surprise" plot twist, which if you have only a thimble full of brains
you'll be able to figure out.
Victor Salva. Wait! I know! He's that guy who worked with the "Rat Pack"
films along with Sinatra and Dean Martin! Oh, no that was Henry Silva. Hmmm,
well who is this Victor Salva guy?
It's during the last twenty minutes or so when the film completely falls
apart. The "surprise" that you already know and are completely ready for, is
just presented on screen casually with no attempt to make it a startling
revelation. Then at one point, Henriksen has gotten so sick of Roberts' drug
use that he ties him to a chair, injects him with a mix of heroin, cocaine,
and alcohol and then watches him die. He then buries him and goes about his
business. Now about six hours later, Roberts digs his way out of his grave,
perfectly ok. He then confronts Henriksen and starts confessing to him that
he's the devil and well, you can't kill the devil now can you? But, maybe he
is the devil and then again maybe not. Needless to say, none of it makes any
sense. And the final confrontation makes you care about the outcome just
like if you were watching a serial rapist and a child molestor fight each
other.
Child molestor! That's it! Victor Salva is that guy who was convicted of
molesting the child star of his previous film "Clownhouse!" I knew I knew
his name. His crimes are the reason I will never watch "Powder", because
there are much more talented directors out there who aren't working who HAVE
NOT BEEN CONVICTED OF SEXUAL MISCONDUCT WITH LITTLE BOYS and who deserve the
opportunity to work much more than this twisted pervert. Man, I wish I had
put things together before I sat through this mess.
Lance Henriksen is credited as "Creative Consultant" during the end credits
of the film. He must have thought up the idea of the fake stomach.
Have A Question Or Comment? Email Me At chuckd21@southeast.net
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,500 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office
reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for Body Shots (1999)
Cast: Don McKellar, Sandra Oh, David Cronenberg, Genevičve Bujold, Tracy
Wright, Sarah Polley, Callum Keith Rennie 
Written and Directed by: Don McKellar 
Running Time: 96 minutes 
Well I'll be damned... the Canadians CAN make a good movie. 
The world is coming to an end.  We don't know why or how, but apparently
there is no way to stop it.  The world has had this information for
months, as most of the rioting and other assorted chaos has passed and
governments have shut down operations.  Yet for a handful of Toronto
citizens, life goes on.  They aren't going crazy or attacking people in
the streets.  Instead they are simply preparing themselves for the
end... some engaging in activities they've always wanted to do, some
gathering with family and friends, and others just seeking to be alone. 
These people's lives however all intersect during their final six hours. 
Writer-director-star Don McKellar has crafted a highly unique and
emotional film.  All of the main characters are compelling as they try
and do whatever it is they need to do on their last night on Earth. 
Craig (Callum Keith Rennie) tries to fulfill all his sexual fantasies, a
gas company employee (David Cronenberg) calls every customer letting
them know the gas will be flowing until the very end and thanks them for
their business, and Patrick (McKellar) just wants to be by himself but
isn't having much success.  Even minor characters keep popping up where
you least expect them to, tying everyone even closer.  
Things seemed a little hokey towards the beginning of the film, but
ultimately everything comes together nicely (although it's not a happy
film... some moments are understandably gut-wrenching).  The story is
enhanced by some unexpected humor and very realistic performances,
particularly from Sandra Oh, whose character is just trying to get home
to her husband before the end. 
I have absolutely no problem that the reason for the end of the world is
never given, nor does it bother me that the world is ending at exactly
12 midnight (in Toronto anyway).  But I do wonder why the sun never
sets.  Come midnight, the sun is still shining brightly.  Maybe the sun
is crashing into the earth... who knows.  Also, it's comforting to know
that in mankind's final moments on the planet, people will still gang up
on the street for the sheer purpose of pushing over a car or a bus
(that's not a shot at this film mind you... I know people are just
stupid and truly would be out in the street tipping over cars). 
Last Night is available on DVD from Universal Home Video.  It contains
the film in fullscreen format and includes the original theatrical
trailer.  [R]
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
AOL Instant Messenger: FilmJax
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Ulee's Gold (1997)
Ulee's Gold (1997) *** out of ***** - Cast: Peter Fonda, Patricia
Richardson, J. Kenneth Campbell. Written and Directed by: Victor Nunez.
Running Time: 111 minutes.
Living a small town in Central Florida, Ulee Jackson (Fonda) is an aging
beekeeper who's had a difficult life. His wife has passed away, his son is
in jail for robbery, and his daughter-in-law has run off, leaving him to
raise her two daughters by himself until his son is released. With demand
for Ulee's honey slowly decreasing, the upcoming season will be his most
important. Unfortunately, some people from his son's criminal past are about
to re-enter the scene, and could possibly change Ulee's life forever.
"Ulee's Gold" is very slow-going, but thankfully the story's conflict
presents itself early enough, so the audience is interested to see what's
going to happen next. Peter Fonda, in a role I could easily have seen his
father play (and sometimes in this film the resemblance between Henry and
Peter is uncanny), gives probably the best performance I've ever seen from
him. He always seems to be playing Peter Fonda, but here he's give an actual
character to work with, and I'll admit I was impressed. It's not a fantastic
performance, but a very good one considering who's giving it.
My only real complaint with the film is the character of the youngest
daughter, who seems way too thoughtful, sensitive, and poetic for someone
that young. "Ulee's Gold" is a pleasant little film. Nothing great, but
certainly entertaining enough. [R]
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Grosse Pointe Blank (1997)
Grosse Pointe Blank (1997) ***1/2 out of ***** - Cast: John Cusack, Minnie
Driver, Alan Arkin, Dan Aykroyd, Hank Azaria, Jeremy Piven, Joan Cusack.
Written by: Tom Jankiewicz, D. V. DeVincentis, Steve Pink, and John Cusack.
Directed by: George Armitage. Running Time: 106 minutes.
Director George Armitage's previous film, 1989's "Miami Blues", had a huge
amount of potential which it only slightly capitalized on. "Grosse Pointe
Blank" is exactly the same way.
Cusack plays hit-man Martin Q. Blank (honestly, why are hit-men in movies
born with hit-man names? Why not Herbert Schmedling? Anyway, I digress...)
He returns to his hometown to do a job, and it just so happens that his
10-year high school reunion is also the same weekend. He uses that as his
cover, but also uses it as an opportunity to reunite with his former
girlfriend (Driver), whom he dumped on prom night and then promptly vanished
from town.
"Grosse Pointe Blank" is a funny movie, with many humorous lines, scenes,
and ideas. However, the main flaw of this film is the romantic subplot,
which unfortunately overcomes the real plot and by the end of the film has
become the main story. Minnie Driver seems to be a competent actress, but
not once did I ever believe that these two characters EVER knew each other
in the past, let alone that they were ever romantically involved with each
other. There is ZERO chemistry between the two, and each scene Cusack and
Driver spend with each other brings the film to a grinding halt.
Alan Arkin, without a doubt one of my favorite actors, is on hand to play
Martin's psychiatrist, who doesn't really want the job upon learning what
Martin does for a living. His first scene is great, the second is brief, yet
humorous. And his remaining appearances are too quick to be anything. The
real surprise here is the return of Dan Aykroyd, who hasn't been funny in a
movie since 1989's "Ghostbusters II", and there are even people who would
argue with that, saying he hasn't been funny since a long time before. The
supporting cast is equally fine, with Piven and Azaria as standouts.
"Grosse Pointe Blank" has all the makings of a great film. A great story,
great cast, and great potential. But as I've stated it just falls short of
"great" status. Cusack however, proves that he can carry a movie with ease.
If this is even a minor success at the box office, combined with the money
this summer's actioner "Con-Air" (which co-stars Cusack) is expected to
bring in, he could very well find himself to be on the way to major stardom.
Time will tell. [R]
--Chuck Dowling  
--Chuck's Movie Reviews -- http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/

Title
Review for Godzilla (1998)
Cast: Matthew Broderick, Hank Azaria, Jean Reno, Kevin Dunn, Harry
Shearer, Michael Lerner, Maria Petillo,Vicki Lewis, Doug Savant
Written by: Dean Devlin and Roland Emmerich
Directed by: Roland Emmerich
Running Time: 139 minutes
In contrast to almost every other film critic, I'm a big fan of the
summer movie season. I like the kinds of movies it produces: big,
dumb, action movies with lots of special effects. Also in contrast to
other critics, I am a big fan of Independence Day, the previous effort
from Dean Devlin and Roland Emmerich. So, how could Godzilla be bad? A
big dumb summer effects fest from Devlin and Emmerich? How could that
go wrong? Sadly it does, in many, many ways.
I wish you could have seen my face during the course of the film. If
you could time-lapse such a thing, you'd see my expression change from
gleeful anticipation to virtual shock and outrage. Could my jaw have
dropped any lower based on the idiocy being presented on screen? No.
You can make almost any premise seem plausible by film's end, no
matter how ridiculous it sounds. Back to the Future for example, is
100% absurd but is executed flawlessly. I feel the same way about
ID4. Silly, but the execution pulls it off. Godzilla however, is
presented with about as little credibility as possible.
As far as Godzilla's new look goes: is it as good as the original
Godzilla? No, not even close. But it's probably more accurate, looking
and moving more like a giant lizard than a guy walking upright in a
rubber suit. Was it worth waiting a year to see? No, not really. But
overall the special effects are nothing short of outstanding, and they
(along with the film's soundtrack) are the film's only redeeming
qualities.
Godzilla's main problem (aside from the fact that it directly rips off
Steven Spielberg's Jurassic Park and The Lost World countless times)
is it's tone. The old Godzilla films were pure camp, so the new film
needed to do either one of two things: also be pure camp, or treat
this matter seriously. Amazingly, it does neither. It sits right on
the border between the two, unable to make up it's mind. It's too
silly to be taken seriously, but too serious to be taken
lightheartedly. I mean, a giant monster makes it's way to New York
City and begins destroying everything. Who's in charge of the military
operation to stop it? A colonel (Kevin Dunn). No five star generals
anywhere in sight, just a colonel in charge of the most inept group of
fighting men our country has ever assembled. In charge of the
operation out in the field?  A stammering, sweaty, nervous idiot
soldier (Doug Savant) who has no business being in charge of a
military washroom, let alone a mission to destroy Godzilla.
Then there's Matthew Broderick. Now I like Broderick, and was really
looking forward to that tried and true "Broderick schtick". You know
what that is, it's when Broderick's is placed in an odd situation and
he constantly doesn't understand what's going on. There is some of
that here, but Broderick plays his character way too broadly, with
wild eyes and cartoonishly bad facial expressions and dialogue. And
going along with the idiot logic, the U.S. military specifically seeks
out Broderick for his expertice, yet fails to follow any of the advice
he gives them.
The most annoying part of the film though is two needless characters
who serve no purpose except to take shots at two well known film
critics, Gene Siskel and Roger Ebert. Michael Lerner plays "Mayor
Ebert", the mayor of New York and yes, he looks exactly like Roger
Ebert. He's running for re-election, and his campaign slogan is
"Thumbs Up for Mayor Ebert". To make matters worse, he has an
associate named "Gene" who looks just like Gene Siskel. For some
reason though, "Gene" is made out to be Mayor Ebert's little kiss-ass
of sorts, telling him at times to just calm down and enjoy some
candy. It's embarrassingly bad writing like this that helps destroy
"Godzilla". Lots of screen time wasted.
Godzilla is sure to be a bit hit (probably THE big hit of the summer),
thanks to a great year-long marketing campaign which never revealed
the appearance of the new Godzilla creature. I sure wish I could
pursuade you not to go though. But millions of you will, and then
you'll see for yourself. [PG-13]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL: http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email: chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1995-1998 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be
reprinted without permission.

Title
Review for Clueless (1995)
     I hate to be blunt, but CLUELESS stinks.  It's a really bad movie
on so many levels.  Think of CLUELESS as a FAST TIMES AT RIDGEMONT HIGH
for the 90s for two reasons: they were both directed by Amy Heckerling
and they both stink.  In a movie season so devoid of comedy, CLUELESS
is not what we need, not now and not ever.
     CLUELESS stars Alicia Silverstone as a pouty rich girl that no one
watching this film should identify with or care about.  (By the way
Alicia, you've got that pouting expression down pat, move on.)  She and
her rich friends go through terrible troubles in this film such as
hoping this guy likes me and wondering what to wear.  Oooooo.  Also,
these kids talk like juvinile Dennis Miller clones without the humor.
I'm 20 years old.  I graduated high school and even spent some time in
college and no one I ever came across could use every word in the
dictionary in a sentence.  So, we are supposed to believe that these
brain dead, drinking, dope smoking, immature idiots who don't know
their left from their right have time between shopping and grooming and
partying and exercise routines to sit down and read the American
Heritage Dictionary cover to cover??  Now that might be funny if they
were using the words wrong, but in every occasion they are absolutely
right.  I want anyone who talks like this or knows anyone who talks
like this to drop me a line.
     Back to the movie, CLUELESS is just awful.  Have I said that?
Well, I can't stress it enough.  The worst thing for a comedy to be is
unfunny, which is what CLUELESS is.  There is a laugh here and there,
but I think I was laughing at things that weren't meant to be funny.
And someone tell me if this film is supposed to be satire, because to
me, there needs to be a normal character in this film to point out the
satire.  Stay far, far away from CLUELESS.

Title
Review for South Park: Bigger, Longer and Uncut (1999)
Cast: Trey Parker, Matt Stone, Mary Kay Bergman, Isaac Hayes, numerous
cameo voices
Written by: Trey Parker, Matt Stone and Pam Brady
Directed by: Trey Parker
Running Time: 80 minutes
Date Reviewed: July 8, 1999
I guess I should start out by saying that I am a huge fan of the
animated series "South Park" which runs on Comedy Central.  I've
followed it since it's debut, and while it has had it's occasional ups
and
downs, overall it provides more laughs than any other show on
television,
cable or otherwise.  I should also point out that just because I'm a
huge
fan of the series didn't automatically guarantee this movie a high
rating.
There have been other shows that I have been a major supporter of that
didn't do much for me in their big screen outings (Twin Peaks:Fire Walk
With Me comes to mind immediately).
While South Park:Bigger, Longer & Uncut runs about four times as long as
an
episode of the television series, it never once wears out it's welcome
or
becomes tiresome.  As the story goes, the four main characters (Stan,
Kyle,
Cartman, and Kenny) sneak into their local multiplex to see the new
R-rated
Terrance and Phillip movie Asses of Fire.  When they emerge, they have
discovered even worse language than they use on a daily basis (thanks to
an
extremely profane yet irresistibly catchy musical number from Terrance &
Phillip).  This enrages their parents who blame Canada (Terrance and
Phillip are Canadian you see) and war is soon declared on our neighbors
to
the north.
What's encouraging about South Park:Bigger, Longer & Uncut is that isn't
just an R-rated version of the hit show.  Series creators Trey Parker
and
Matt Stone could have very easily made just another episode for the big
screen, but instead they've given us a movie with social commentary
about
hypocrisy, censorship, and (gasp!) parental responsibility.  Yes you've
read correctly... this movie has a message.  Don't let that scare you
off
though, there are more laughs in this film than you'd think would be
possible.
Parker and Stone hit a number of "sacred" targets in their film, but as
they've said in interviews "We're equal opportunity offenders".  No
single
organization or racial group is targeted more than another.  And what
makes
the potentially dangerous comedy work so well is because it is so absurd
in
it's presentation.  The situations which the laughs come from are so
outlandish that I personally can't see any of them as being offensive.
Sure the language is harsh, but if you've seen any R-rated movie before
there shouldn't be anything here that would shock you.
However, I don't advise you take your kids either.  It is definitely not
for youngsters unless you, as a parent, explain to your kids about "foul
language" and why it's not always appropriate in the REAL world.
Curiously, I think that many of the ideas and situations in this film
are
far "worse" than anything in Trey Parker's Orgazmo, which the MPAA rated
NC-17.  Why that film is rated NC-17 and this one is rated R goes to
show
the randomness of the current ratings board.
Surprisingly, it would to be hard to classify South Park:Bigger, Longer
&
Uncut as either a comedy or a musical.  Normally I abhor musicals, but
when
they are this funny and the songs are as memorable, I can overlook my
feelings.  And I have to give credit where credit is due.  I've taken a
couple of harsh shots lately at Marc Shaiman and his overblown scores in
films like Patch Adams and The Out of Towners.  In this case, the music
he
has written (along with Trey Parker, mind you) fits perfectly.  Mocking
all
different types of musical numbers from Disney animation to the grand,
sweeping musicals of the 60s to Les Miserables, everything works.  The
soundtrack album is a must have.  On a sidenote: I would have loved to
sit
it on the recording sessions to see the chorus singing some of the
extremely filthy lyrics they have to sing in this film.
South Park:Bigger, Longer & Uncut is a great time at the movies if you
love
the series, or if you just love to laugh.  Sure the animation is crude
and
you may say the humor is even cruder, but a lot of the comedy here
requires
a good bit of intelligence to "get".  Those of us who do get it have
something great to enjoy.  [R]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email:chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted
without permission.

Title
Review for Oleanna (1994)
The content of a film has never made me angry. I have never seen a film
where one of the character's actions were so frustrating that I just wanted
to reach into the film and beat them. The story involves a college professor
(Macy) who tries to help one of the girls in his class understand what he's
teaching. Keep in mind that throughout the film the teacher does absolutely
nothing wrong.The student returns later and accuses the professor of sexual
harassment. Even though the professor explains to her that he was only
helping her to understand, she says it's not his intentions that are the
issue, it's how she interprets his actions. That's like if you are driving
along and way off in the distance there's a car behind you. You then drive
into a ditch because you think the car will catch up with you and crash into
you. So, as a result, you sue the driver because you thought he would damage
your car, even though the driver never even came remotely close to you.
This female character is clearly insane and if there are people like her who
think how she thinks, then society as we know it will surely crumble. The
film is well acted by Macy and not at all well acted by the psychotic
student. The dialog seems forced, however, and for the first thirty minutes
or so, the two characters have a conversation that would take normal people
thirty seconds to have. Written and directed by David Mamet.
Please visit my movie reviews web site at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
You'll be glad you did.

Title
Review for Judgment Day (1999) (V)
Cast: Ice-T, Suzy Amis, Mario Van Peebles, Coolio, Linden Ashby, Tom
"Tiny" Lister Jr., Max Gail 
Written by: William Carson 
Directed by: John Terlesky 
Running Time: 90 minutes 
An asteroid is on its way towards Earth, and the one man who knows the
technology to stop it has been kidnapped by a religious fanatic (Mario
Van Peebles) who thinks the upcoming destruction of the planet is God's
will.  It's up to a rogue FBI agent (Suzy Amis) and a convict (Ice-T) to
find him.  Sure, it's a direct to video knock off of Armageddon and Deep
Impact... but it's really not that bad, with surprisingly good
production values for a movie of it's type.  The performances are also
surprisingly decent. 
Director John Terlesky is an actor as well, probably best known for his
prominent role as C.J. in 1987's The Allnighter (he also played the
Deathstalker in Deathstalker II, whatever that may be).  Also, it's good
to see Max Gail (from TV's "Barney Miller") again. 
Judgment Day is available on DVD from Artisan Home Entertainment.  It
contains the film enhanced for 16:9 televisions, and includes the
trailer, cast and crew information, and "asteroid information".  [R]
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for First Knight (1995)
     I remember hearing the King Arthur legend as a kid.  The one thing
I remember most was Merlin the magician.  Maybe I am ignorant to the
timeline of the tales of King Arthur and his men, but Merlin should
have been in FIRST KNIGHT.  He could have given poor Richard Gere an
accent, a new expression for Julia Ormond, and a way out for Sean
Connery.
     Seriously, just picture this movie with Merlin's character, if
only to lighten the tone.  You cast Alan Arkin in the part, have him
doing various wacky things throughout, and then at least you have some
entertaining moments, something that FIRST KNIGHT is sorely lacking.
     Basically what we've got here with FIRST KNIGHT is "Legends of
the Fall: The Armor Years".  I didn't care for LEGENDS OF THE FALL
(hmmm, how odd that Julia Ormond was in both) and that's all this movie
reminded me of.  I hate it in movies when one person loves another
person, yet that person loves another just a wee bit more, even though
there's nothing wrong with the first person.  That kind of conflict
doesn't entertain me.
     I also have yet to enjoy Richard Gere in any movie.  After
checking his filmography, I realized that out of all of the films he
has done, only INTERNAL AFFAIRS is halfway decent.  All the rest are
exactly the same.  In FIRST KNIGHT, he wanders through his performance
with an American accent, and a face that suggests that he might either
cry or kill someone at any moment.
     Overall, I will just say that FIRST KNIGHT is slow, predictable,
and at times, laughable.  Makes you wonder if director Jerry Zucker of
AIRPLANE! and THE NAKED GUN fame filmed two movies at once.  This one,
and a parody of it and at times some footage from the latter slipped
into this one.

Title
Review for Con Air (1997)
Con-Air (1997) *1/2 out of ***** - Cast: Nicolas Cage, John Malkovich, John
Cusack, Steve Buscemi, Ving Rhames, Colm Meaney. Don Davis. Written by:
Scott Rosenberg. Directed by: Simon West. Running Time: 115 minutes.
Sometimes I just don't know what's worse: a movie that's bad from start to
finish, or a bad movie which every once in a while shows a moment of
creativity, but then returns to being bad. "Con-Air" falls into the latter
catagory.
The plot, if you can call it one, is childishly simple. Convicts take over a
prison plane and attempt to escape to a foreign country. Good guys try to
stop them. That's it. The film's main hero is Nicolas Cage, a former US
Ranger who was sent to jail for accidentally killing a punk who was
attacking him and his wife. (I guess that jail sentence was to send a
message out to all people that accidentally killing a drunken hoodlum while
defending your family WILL NOT BE TOLERATED!) This of course is merely just
a gimmick to have a "good" guy on the plane when it gets hijacked. It just
so happens that Cage is being paroled, and is just trying to return home to
his wife and daughter.
The criminals who hijack the plane are John Malkovich, who plays Cyrus the
Virus. His nickname is unjustified, as he never does anything to seemingly
serve such a nickname. His assistant is Ving Rhames, who plays Diamond Dog.
His nickname is unjustified, as he never does anything to seemingly serve
such a nickname. Along the way they are joined by another criminal, Steve
Buscemi, who plays the Marietta Mangler. His nickname is unjustified, as he
never does anything to seemingly serve such a nickname. I think you can see
a trend here.
The problem with "Con Air" is that it must have been written by a four year
old. The "Oh Come On!" factor is high with this one, as more of the movie
progresses you'll want to actually jeer the stupidity running rampant on the
screen. There's not one new idea or concept here, and every cliche is beaten
to hell, and then some more. For example, any movie where criminals hijack
an airplane or an airport, do you think the main bad guy will sarcastically
use flight attendant phrases, such as: "Enjoy your flight" or "Welcome
aboard Con-Air"? What makes the whole thing infinitely more frustrating is
that while this four year old was writing the script, apparently his folks
would wander into the room and scribble a decent line of dialogue or a brief
moment into the script. Then they'd wander off again to let the little one
finish his little story.
The characters are one of the most disappointing things about the film. For
no reason whatsoever, the writer gave Nicolas Cage's character an accent,
and Cage decides to do a very slight variation of his "Raising Arizona"
character's accent. This distracted me for the whole film, as all I could do
was remember how good "Raising Arizona" is, and how retardedly stupid it is
for this character to have a pointless, sometimes unintelligible accent. The
last part of the film winds up in Las Vegas, and imagine that! Nicolas Cage
is in Las Vegas! Can he do a movie not in Vegas?
John Cusack, who for some reason made this film yet completely trashes this
type of film in interviews, is completely wrong in the part of a US Marshall
(!). But, his character is worthless, and really has no bearing on anything.
He's given a nemesis, a DEA agent (Colm Meaney), who's only purpose is to
argue with Cusack. These two men argue about how things should be handled,
who's tougher, blah blah blah, which only made me wonder why the government
assigned two different agencies to this prison transfer but didn't bother to
give anyone control of the situation.
Malkovich is just doing a slightly more maniacial version of his bad guy
from "In The Line of Fire", which again distracted me because all I could do
is remember how good "In The Line of Fire" was. His character also isn't
extremely bright. He hides all the plans for the hijacking in his old jail
cell, which are immediately discovered (and amazing decoded by Cusack in a
matter of seconds). The problem is that these are papers, which could have
easily been ripped up and flushed. But instead he just casually hides all
this important evidence, which instantly lets the cops know what to do. A
brilliant criminal indeed. Also, I can't watch Malkovich much because he's
always giving interviews about how he doesn't really like films and would
rather be in the theater.
Buscemi's character holds the most promise, as he gets a truly great
entrance scene. Unfortunately as it turns out, his character - a mass
murderer - turns out to be nothing but comic relief. A funny serial killer.
His character's final scene, the last shot of the film, is supposed to be a
big joke. But when you see it, really think about it. Is it really funny? If
it happened near you, would you find it hilarious or be scared to death?
What a total waste of potential there.
Amazingly the most sympathetic and crucial character of the film is a
stuffed bunny rabbit. No, I'm not joking. Cage is bringing it home for his
little girl, and you'll notice that throughout the film that this bunny
rabbit is the basis for the film's turning points, as well as a basis for
unintentional hilarity. Get this... at one point to threaten Nicholas Cage,
Malkovich actually picks up the toy, holds a gun to it, and in all
seriousness says "Stay back or the bunny gets it". Please feel free to throw
the remainder of your soda at the screen when this happens. I guess the four
year old thought it was hilarious.
After a slow opening 20 minutes to set the story, "Con-Air" is non-stop
action. But it's so unoriginal and uninspired that you'll want it to stop.
Also, I don't know what the director has done in the past, but he should not
have been allowed to shoot or edit action sequences. The spastic and rapid
fire editing makes "Natural Born Killers" look like one big tracking shot,
as every time action takes place it's like looking at a cartoonist's
flipbook of completely random images. It's much too noisy, as bullets fly,
things explode, AND heavy score music blasts the audience all at once. If
there was any dialogue in there, I hope I missed it. I guess one other big
problem is that there's a false sense of urgency about capturing these guys.
They don't have some sort of master plan to cause great harm to people,
they're just trying to get to the Carribbean or wherever there's a
non-extradition treaty. Nothing in the script was well thought out.
"Con-Air" is a total disappointment. Hopefully others can recognize its
insulting stupidity and it will fade quickly from the summer movie scene.  [R]
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related
links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Dante's Peak (1997)
Dante's Peak (1997) *1/2 out of ***** - Cast:Pierce Brosnan, Linda Hamilton,
Charles Hallahan. Writer:Leslie Bohem. Director:Roger Donaldson.
Much has been said about the "return" of the Irwin Allen-style disaster
film. I don't think that the comparison is entirely accurate. Sure there
were lots of cheesy "disaster" movies in the 70s, "Airport", "The Towering
Inferno", "The Poseidon Adventure" and "Earthquake" are just a few. What
made those movies watchable was the fact that every character in the film
was played by a HUGE star. That made it tolerable enough. Nowadays, all the
money goes to the special effects, so we're stuck with maybe one star, one
minor star, and a huge group of bit actors or unknowns. That's not a lot of
fun. I'd rather hear a big star spout out a silly line, than a nobody spout
out a silly line.
"Dante's Peak" is the first of two volcano movies to be released in 1997.
"Volcano", the other one, is set to be released later in the year. Even
though it has the dumber title, I think that "Volcano" should easily be
superior to this insult to our intelligence. The premise for "Volcano"
sounds interesting, an unknown volcano underneath the city of Los Angeles
erupts. The premise of "Dante's Peak" is limp. Scientists think a volcano
may erupt in a small northwestern town and spend the first hour of the film
debating whether or not to evacuate the town. The first hour of the film is
hereby proclaimed worthless, because everyone in the theater KNOWS the
volcano is going to erupt. That's why we're there.
Brosnan plays volcano expert (keep that in mind, he's an EXPERT) Harry
Dalton. In true disaster-movie style, he has suffered some sort of trauma
due to a volcano. In the first scene in the movie we see his girlfriend
killed when a hot rock hits her in the head. While this may seem tragic on
paper and it must be heartwrenching in real life, on film its pure cornball.
Hard to keep from laughing at that. And thus the tone is set for the film.
Flash forward some months to now, or whatever. We see a building. On the
building is a big sign which reads "United States Geological Institute" (or
something very similar). Then these words appear on the screen: "United
States Geological Institute" telling us that we indeed are looking at the
"United States Geological Institute". This is the mentality we are dealing
with here. We are letting people make big budget motion pictures who don't
realize that we can READ THE WORDS WRITTEN ON THE BUILDING. Director Roger
Donaldson we salute you.
Anyway, inside the "United States Geological Institute" we learn that there
is volcano activity in Dante's Peak and so Dalton's boss sends his best man,
volcano expert Harry Dalton, to investigate. Keep in mind that Harry Dalton
is both a volcano expert and the best man they've got at the "United States
Geological Institute".
Meanwhile in Dante's Peak, two punk teenagers decide to go skinny dipping in
a hot spring. As they start to make out, the creepy music plays, the volcano
gets "angry" and really heats up the hot spring, killing the naughty teens.
We're watching a slasher movie here folks.
Volcano expert Harry Dalton arrives in town and is escorted around by the
town's mayor and coffee shop owner (Hamilton). The mayor is divorced with
two kids, and gee whiz, I wonder if hunky Brosnan and sultry Hamilton will
end up together at the end? You know, I wish there were more movies where
the two leads, a male and a female, went through hell on earth and then go
their separate ways.
Anyway, volcano expert Harry Dalton makes his expert conclusion that the
volcano is going to erupt and the town should evacuate. But before they can
begin, his boss and a team of volcano experts show up. They listen to his
expert opinion, and immediately brush it off. His boss basically reacts like
"I know you're an expert and my best man and all, but next time, why don't
you just stick to what you know?"
The volcano teams goes up to the volcano to send some sort of robot down the
volcano to take scientfic readings. Again, slasher-movie mentality takes
over. The robot malfunctions, creepy music starts to play, and one scientist
goes down, alone and against all logical advice, to repair it. The scene
plays as if this action angers the volcano, and the volcano makes rocks fall
onto the scientist. I know that's not how it's intended to seem, but it
does.
Well AS WE ALL KNOW, the volcano does erupt, and the movie gets SO stupid at
this point that it makes the first hour look like "Citizen Kane". For
various inane reasons which I don't even feel like talking about, Brosnan,
Hamilton, and the kids all travel TOWARDS the volcano instead of away from
it, and then spend the rest of the film trying to get back out. Thank god
volcano expert Harry Dalton is along to help out. For example, when
journeying across a lake to escape a rapid flowing river of lava, Dalton
notices that the lake has turned to acid. He is able to scientifically
deduce this because the bottom of the boat is being eaten away by acid. His
expert advice to the group is "don't touch the water". Thank god he's with
them.
"Dante's Peak" is an hour of nothing, twenty minutes of special effects (all
of which are in the trailers), and then has just about the most
ANTI-climatic ending to any disaster movie ever. I could have written the
script in less time than it takes to actually run the film. I've got my
money riding on "Volcano".
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office
reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for Xtro (1983)
Xtro (1982) NO STARS out of ***** - Cast: Maryam D'Abo. Written and Directed
by Harry Bromley-Davenport. Running Time: 84 minutes.
Stupid and utterly disgusting British horror flick about a boy's father who
is abducted by aliens. Now get this: the father returns to earth three years
later as an alien, he kills a woman and enters her body in order to be
reborn as a man, and then spends the rest of the film killing people in
order to turn into ANOTHER alien. Then there are killer clowns and midgets
and toy soldiers involved in the mayhem. The ONLY reason I watched this
(well, fast-forwarded through it actually) was because I needed to see some
film beginning with 'X', and it was the only one I could find (I'm not
watching "Xanadu"). Amazingly, someone thought so highly of this garbage to
finance two sequels!!! [R]
Xtro 2:The Second Encounter (1991) 1/2 out of ***** - Cast: Jan-Michael
Vincent. Written and Directed by: Harry Bromley-Davenport. Running Time: 92
minutes.
Nine years after Sir Harry Bromley Davenport's smash hit "Xtro", someone
approached him and said, "We want another one!" And so Davenport said, "ok!"
and typed up the script and made this film. And it has absolutely NOTHING to
do with the first. I guess he figured that the film needed the recognition
of his original masterpiece in order to be a success. Heh.
In this film, a group of scientists are able to enter into another
dimension. But by doing so releases a slimy monster. And let the "Alien" and
"Aliens" rip-offs begin! For example, the creature presents itself by, how
else, bursting through someone's stomach! And there are heavily armed
marines to deal with the creatures! Even though "Xtro 2" is a hundred times
better than the original, it still sucks, and at least the original was
original! [R]
Xtro: Watch the Skies (1995) NO STARS out of ***** - Cast: Andrew Divoff,
Jim Hanks, Robert Culp. Written and Directed by: Harry Bromley-Davenport.
Running Time: 97 minutes.
Hmm. Well, I just don't get it. I just don't understand who is funding Harry
Bromley-Davenport and why is he making all these terrible movies about
aliens? This latest installment in the "Xtro" saga (say it along with me)
HAS NOTHING TO DO WITH THE FIRST TWO!!! Can't we create some sort of law or
something to prevent this??? Not just the use of the title but the actual
making of the movies?
Well, THIS TIME, a group of marines is sent to a forgotten island populated
with bunny rabbits, a senile old man, oh and of course, aliens. The aliens
then start to kill the marines, and I think some of the bunnies too. Jim
Hanks (Tom's brother) plays one of the marines and looks, acts, and sounds
very much like his brother. For just a few minutes, I was enjoying almost
Tom Hanks doing things. Only for a few though. I can't wait for the next
installment in the series that has nothing to do with anything that came
before it! [R]
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related
links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Devil's Own, The (1997)
The Devil's Own (1997) *1/2 out of ***** - Cast: Harrison Ford, Brad Pitt,
Ruben Blades, Treat Williams. Written by: David Aaron Cohen, Vincent Patrick
and Kevin Jarre. Directed by: Alan J. Pakula. Running Time: 107 minutes.
"The Devil's Own" has every reason to be a good film: a good cast, a good
premise, and a respected director. But what it lacks is much more important:
logic, interest, and entertainment.
Despite his second billing, Brad Pitt stars as a IRA terrorist who is
brought over to the United States (thanks to a corrupt judge) to purchase
guided missiles to help with the war in Ireland. Now as the movies begins,
we learn that Pitt has killed more than 20 people. Then we get to see him
blow a few more away. And we are supposed to like this guy? The film sure
wants us to, making Pitt seem warm and fuzzy. The film has already reached
its first problem, and only 10 minutes have elapsed. Terrorists are not our
friends, no matter how attractive they may be considered to be.
The corrupt judge moves Pitt into the basement of Harrison Ford, a New York
City cop with a wife and three daughters. In movie time, it seems as though
Pitt has only lived there one week, but we are supposed to believe that
these two men have somehow bonded. I never bought it, and the film has
achieved it's second problem.
Pitt attempts to buy these missiles from a stereotypical bad guy with no
personality (Treat Williams). Of course something goes wrong with the deal,
and FINALLY, an hour into the film, the plot starts to begin. Williams sends
bad guys to find the money, which is hidden in Ford's home. As they are
searching, Ford and his wife arrive home. The three men attack them. Now,
after that settles, Ford is understandably angry at Pitt for bringing this
into his home. He sets out to bring Pitt to justice.
During the film's yawn-inducing first hour (where I actually became
fascinated by my watch for about 10 minutes, before remembering that there
was a movie going on), we keep seeing scenes of Ford being a cop. Why? To
justify his top billing? To give him something to do is most likely. Then he
gets involved in a mind-numbingly overused subplot about his partner (Ruben
Blades) killing a suspect by accident. Also, the film completely gives away
the ending during its first hour, when Ford confesses to Pitt that he's
never killed anyone. Hmmmmm.
During the second hour, Ford's character is obviously angry, as he should
be. Yet no matter what Pitt does, he can't bring himself to hate him. This
is a major flaw. You've got a terrorist who's ruining a cop's life yet still
presented as squeaky clean, and the cop chasing him who seems to be angry at
everyone else BUT the terrorist. There's never any conflict in the film, and
conflict is what DRIVES a suspense-thriller.
"The Devil's Own" (and what is the title referring to?) reportedly cost $95
million to make. $95 million! And for what, to see Harrison Ford shoot Brad
Pitt? Come on. Like I said, my watch was more interesting. [R]
--Chuck Dowling  
--Chuck's Movie Reviews -- http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/

Title
Review for Wishmaster (1997)
WISHMASTER (1997)
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling
Copyright 1998 - The Jacksonville Film Journal
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Cast: Wendy Benson, Chris Lemmon, Andrew Divoff, Robert Englund, Tony Todd,
Kane Hodder, Ted Raimi, Ethan Embry, Buck Flower, Reggie Bannister
Written by: Peter Atkins
Directed by: Robert Kurtzman
Running Time: 90 minutes
My Rating: NO STARS out of *****
"Wishmaster" is a worthless excuse for a movie, horror or otherwise. It's a
cross between "The Monkey's Paw" and "A Nightmare on Elm Street", as we
learn about evil genies and their desire to take over the world. They can
only cause harm however when you ask them to grant you a wish. Of course,
whatever you wish for has some sort of sick and twisted spin on it, to only
benefit the evil genie (Andrew Divoff).
The film is your typical horror nonsense, lots of gore and screaming just
for the sake of having gore and screaming. The script is standard and the
acting is fair at best (Divoff, if he's using his actual voice, is pretty
interesting though). And fans of the genre will most likely enjoy seeing
various actors from other horror films in cameos here and there.
When the story begins we're in the middle ages, and a wizard or something is
battling these evil forces. The wizard manages to gain the upper hand, and
encases the evil into a brilliantly beautiful red gem. Why do that? Why put
pure evil in something which is bound to gain attention from people? Why not
encase the evil in a dirt clump or a rat dropping? No one's going to pick up
a rat dropping and polish it, breathe on it, and talk to it. This is the
type of stupid "movie logic" we're dealing with here. Just wish that you'll
never have to sit through this, like I did. [R]

Title
Review for Drive Me Crazy (1999)
Cast: Melissa Joan Hart, Adrien Grenier, Stephen Collins, Faye Grant 
Written by: Rob Thomas 
Based on the novel "How I Created My Perfect Prom Date" written by: Todd
Strasser 
Directed by: John Schultz 
Running Time: 91 minutes 
The Law of Crowd Pleasing Romantic Movies states that the two leads
must end up together by film's end.  If you're not familiar with this
law, then maybe you've seen the trailer for this film which SHOWS that
the two leads are together by film's end.  Now if you're a regular
reader of mine, you've heard me say this countless times: You know how
Drive Me Crazy is going to end, but is the journey to get to that
ending worth it?  No, it definitely is not.
Melissa Joan Hart (from ABC's "Sabrina, the Teenage Witch") likes a
hunky stud on the basketball team.  Adrien Grenier is her grungy
neighbor who's just broken up with his activist girlfriend.
Apparently he wants to make his ex-girlfriend jealous enough to take
him back, and she wants someone to take her to the big year end dance.
So the two pretend to date for some reason, but only after Hart gives
Grenier a bath to turn him into a hunky stud.  Will Grenier like his
new popularity and turn on his friends?  Will this crazy scheme work?
Do I care?
The teen comedy resurgence of late has been surprisingly good in terms
of comedy.  What makes movies like Can't Hardly Wait and 10 Things I
Hate About You work (and to a lesser extent, She's All That and Never
Been Kissed)is because the writers of those films seem to realize that
high school is a joke and write their scripts accordingly. I don't
know what the writer's intention was with Drive Me Crazy.  There was
some smart comedy in those films to make the obvious endings worth
getting to.  Here there's nothing... just teens whining about who's
going to take them to the big dance.  Do me a favor kids, go get a job
or something... just shut the hell up.
In all honesty, the best part of this film is the end credits.  Now
normally when I say that it's followed with the joke "...because the
movie is finally over."  In this case though the end credits really
are the most entertaining part of the film.  After the obligatory
second playing of Britney Spears' titular song, there's a quick
commercial jingle for a burger joint the kids in the film hang out in
and a brief rendition of the school song for their high school.
Nothing great, but more entertaining than anything in the 90 minutes
which preceded them.
Sci-fi fans take note: there are brief appearances from Stephen
Collins (Star Trek:The Motion Picture) and Faye Grant (the TV
miniseries "V" and "V:The Final Battle").  [PG-13]
The Jacksonville Film Journal 
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email:chuckd21@leading.net 
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted
without permission.

Title
Review for Speed 2: Cruise Control (1997)
Speed 2:Cruise Control (1997) **1/2 out of ***** - Cast: Sandra Bullock,
Jason Patric, Willem Dafoe, Glenn Plummer, Colleen Camp, Joe Morton, Tim
Conway, Kimmy Robertson. Directed by: Jan de Bont. Running Time: 100 minutes.
Having the word "speed" in your film's title carries with it some
responsibility. To use the word "speed" in your film's title, you need to
either have a fast paced story, or at the very least, an object important to
the story which moves very very fast. "Speed 2:Cruise Control" has neither
one, which should almost make you feel cheated as you watch it.
Sandra Bullock returns from "Speed" as Annie. She's dumped Keanu Reeves and
hooked up with another member of the "suicide team", played by Jason Patric.
You can easily tell though, that this whole thing was written for Reeves,
who backed out at the last minute. Anyway, the new happy couple go on a
vacation aboard a cruise ship, and darn the luck, it's being taken over by a
psycho (Willem Dafoe).
Dafoe is a disgruntled former employee of the cruise line who designed all
the computer systems onboard. He developed some sort of copper blood
poisoning illness from the computers (or something like that) and so the
company immediately fired him. Now he's out for revenge. He plans to steal a
fortune in jewelry from the ship's vault and then ram the ocean liner into
an oil tanker.
Willem Dafoe is adequate, yet nothing special as the villain. But it's
refreshing that he's working alone. He doesn't have a team of bad guys, and
none of the crew members reveal themselves to be bad guys during the film.
Bullock's character has gotten awfully annoying, and her main purpose in the
film is to make repeated references to her character's experiences from the
first film. Patric makes a satisfactory replacement for Keanu Reeves, and he
actually fares the best of all the cast. And I always like to keep track of
former cast members of "Twin Peaks" when they get work. Here, Kimmy
Robertson who played Lucy the secretary shows up as the ship's cruise
director.
The film's main flaw is it's big sequence towards the end where the ship is
heading, very slowly, towards an island. This scene goes on forever, and
shockingly is done with a sense of "Wheeee!" as mass destruction occurs,
people's lives and property are ruined and quite possibly many people could
be brutally maimed or killed. This sense of gleeful whimsy in the scene is
almost insulting. And during this sequence there's yet another "dog in
peril" scene, a movie trend which I am completely sick of.
"Speed 2:Cruise Control" isn't a bad film, and it's certainly better that
most of this summer's offerings. But what keeps it from achieving a good
rating is that it's just hopelessly standard action fare. There's nothing
new in it to distinguish it from any other action movie of its type. And
usually when you make a sequel, you want to try and outdo SOMETHING from the
previous film. Not one moment here even comes close to being as good as
anything from the original. [PG-13]
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Men in Black (1997)
Men in Black (1997) ***1/2 out of ***** - Cast: Tommy Lee Jones, Will Smith,
Linda Fiorentino, Rip Torn, Vincent D'onofrio. Directed by: Barry
Sonnenfeld. Running Time: 98 minutes.
Finally a decent summer movie has arrived. Not a great one, but decent. But
as far as the summer of 1997 is concerned, decent is equal to greatness.
"Men in Black" is probably this summer's most hyped film. In it, secret
government agents are responsible for monitoring all alien activity here on
earth. Yes, it seems aliens have been amongst us for years now. Smith is a
New York cop who unknowingly chases down an alien, and Jones recruits him to
join the secret organization.
The film does two things right, it's basic premise and the script. The
concept is refreshingly original and the dialogue is very funny. What it
fails at is character development and the actual story itself. Any details
of this secret organization are hardly mentioned, and we are led to believe
that there are only two actual agents in this group. Not much, but just a
tiny bit of development for the two main leads would have been nice.
As far as the meat of the story goes, an evil alien comes to earth to get a
little jewel or something he needs for some reason. That is how clear that
part gets. This evil alien, who earlier in the film is really built up to be
a forceful presence, crashes his ship into earth (if aliens are so advanced,
why are they always crashing into earth?) and attempts to use the body of a
farmer (D'onofrio) to blend in. I use the word "attempts" because for the
whole movie D'onofrio staggers around grotesquely disfigured because the
skin doesn't quite fit the alien's body, or the alien doesn't really have a
handle on how to use it. It's partly amusing to watch, but overall it seems
to defeat the purpose of even having a villain. Do we care if the slothing
mutant gets whatever it is he needs or if Jones and Smith stop him? There's
never any sense of danger whatsoever. You can make a zany movie like this
and still have a threat to deal with in the end, just take a look at
"Ghostbusters". And the film's final scenes are just plain wrong, as it goes
in all sorts of different directions, none of which did it need to go in.
Unfortunately, some of the special effects aren't created well, and do not
interact well with the scenes they are used in. The filmmakers should have
studied the computer effect techniques from "Mars Attacks!", as those are
still some of the most flawless interactive computer effects I've seen.
"Men in Black" does entertain however, despite it's flaws. Jones and Smith
have some great lines, and there's a scene where Jones forceably
interrogates a small dog that's one of the funniest things I've seen in a
long time. It's a fun flick, as summer movies should be. [PG-13]
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Excalibur (1981)
Cast: Nigel Terry, Helen Mirren, Nicholas Clay, Cherie Lunghi, Paul
Geoffrey, Nicol Williamson, Gabriel Byrne, Katrine Boorman, Liam
Neeson, Colin Redgrave, Patrick Stewart, Charlie Boorman
Written by: Rospo Pallenberg and John Boorman
Based on the book "Le Morte d'Arthur" by: Thomas Malory
Directed by: John Boorman
Running Time: 141 minutes
I've never been a big fan of the whole "sword and sorcery" genre.  Not
for any particular reason mind you, it's just never help much appeal
to me.  As a result, I'd never even considered watching a second of
John Boorman's Excalibur.  Now, eighteen years after it's release
comes a DVD of the film... so I decided I'd give it a shot.  I'm
thrilled that I did, as Excalibur is one of the best told stories I've
seen in a long time.
Surely everyone is familiar in some way with the legend of King
Arthur, but I doubt there's a better representation of it on film than
this one.  Excalibur begins as the wizard Merlin (Nicol Williamson)
strikes a deal with Uther (Gabriel Byrne) to help Uther bed the woman
he desires, even though it has caused war amongst the people of the
land.  As a result of this encounter, Arthur is born.  Due to the
bargain previously struck, Merlin takes young Arthur away with him.
Arthur (Nigel Terry) grows to be a man and one day, by complete random
chance, pulls the mighty Excalibur from the stone in which it was
thrust into by Uther years earlier.  This signifies that Arthur is now
king of the land.  Much follows, including the rise and fall of
Camelot, the introduction of the knights of the round table, meeting
Lancelot (Nicholas Clay) and his subsequent affair with Arthur's wife
Guenevere (Cherie Lunghi), and the battles between Merlin and Arthur's
half-sister Morgana (a gorgeously young Helen Mirren).
Excalibur holds up incredibly well considering it's age... more than
likely due to the incredibly compelling story.  Great production
values and use of music (both original score by Trevor Jones and
familiar stock music from Richard Wagner and Carl Orff) compliment
this experience.
Excalibur is available on DVD from Warner Home Video.  It contains the
film in it's original theatrical aspect ratio of 1.85:1, a commentary
track with director John Boorman, a biography and filmography for
Boorman, and the film's original theatrical trailer.
I'm not sure why, but I wasn't expecting much from the commentary by
John Boorman.  To my surprise though it was very informative.  Boorman
does take his time, and sometimes leaves gaps of silence between bits
of information, but he's still knowledgeable about seemingly every
aspect of this film.  Most directors I hear do commentary about a film
that they made years earlier tend to forget many of the tiny
details... like actor's names for example.  In those cases, directors
usually bring along a director of photography or co-producer to ask
questions to in order to help refresh their memory.  But Boorman's
there all by himself, able to identify things as detailed as every
different filming location, even when they change two or three times
in a single scene (unfortunately, if you've never been in Ireland you
won't know where he's talking about).  Boorman's commentary is also
highly complimentary.  He's very giving with kind words to both cast
and crew.
Some interesting tidbits of info he shares: Helen Mirren and Nicol
Williamson couldn't stand one another based on an event from their
past, and both threatened not to do the film if they had to work with
one another.  Boorman was able to convince them both to do the film,
and since their characters are enemies he was able to use their
natural animosity towards one another for their performances.  Also,
Liam Neeson and Mirren had a relationship for a year or two after they
met on the set.  And Boorman still has the sword Excalibur, Helen
Mirren's breastplate, and the Holy Grail in his home (that's got to be
a surreal experience to walk into your living room and see the Holy
Grail sitting on your mantle).
Excalibur is a great film, and this is a great DVD to own.  The
transfer is great... making it hard to believe that the film is over
18 years old.  If it weren't for the familiar faces in the cast you'd
think this was a recent effort.  If you're a fan of sword and sorcery,
a Boorman fan, or just love great storytelling, get yourself a copy of
this one.  [R]
The Jacksonville Film Journal
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email:chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted
without permission.

Title
Review for You've Got Mail (1998)
By this time, everyone knows that in these kinds of movies (romantic
comedies) the two main characters will be together by the film's end.
The question though is: Will the journey to that point in the film be
interesting enough?  In the case of You've Got Mail, the answer to
that is sadly "not really".
You've Got Mail reteams Sleepless in Seattle co-stars Tom Hanks and
Meg Ryan with director Nora Ephron for a remake of the 1940 James
Stewart classic The Shop Around the Corner.  In this modern retelling,
Ryan is a small book store owner in New York City who faces
competition from a multi-millionaire's (Tom Hanks) new book megastore
which opens up down the street from her.  The two square off in real
life, but little do they know that they are actually in love with each
other thanks to their anonymous communications via email.
As far as the film goes, everything seems rather distant and
uninvolved.  The original seemed to have much more emotion and depth
to it, and you would think a remake would only take things further.
Instead, everything seems slightly contrived and lacking real emotion.
I enjoyed Tom Hanks performance, as it seems I always do, but I'm
getting tired of seeing Meg Ryan play the exact same person in every
single movie she's in, that character being "the sweet girl involved
with the wrong guy".  You'll wish there was more time to devote to the
supporting cast, particularly Greg Kinnear who vanishes mid-way
through the film without any explanation whatsoever.  He's the "wrong
guy" dating Meg Ryan's character... who by the way is never really
made to look like the "wrong guy".  He's a little odd, but definately
not a bad guy in any way, shape, or form.  And independent film queen
Parker Posey... what on earth is she doing in an actual studio film
that people will see?
A quick note about the score for the film.  It sounds exactly like the
music in our local Winn-Dixie grocery store commercials that everytime
the main theme would play, I'd recite the words for the store's jingle
in my head.  It was a minor annoyance to me, but I'm positive no one
else in the country picked up on it.
You've Got Mail is available on DVD from Warner Home Video.  It
contains the film in it's original aspect ratio of 1.85:1.  Special
features on the DVD include the HBO First Look:A Conversation with
Nora Ephron documentary, a video tour of various locations in New York
City's upper west side, a feature length audio commentary with
writer-director Nora Ephron and producer Lauren Shuler Donner, an
alternate music only audio track, the usual cast and crew info and
production notes, and TWELVE theatrical trailers (two for this film,
one for the 1940 original The Shop Around The Corner, one for it's
remake In the Good Old Summertime, and eight for other films you might
enjoy, like Joe vs. the Volcano, Tin Cup and Message in a Bottle).
The DVD also contains a plethora of DVD-ROM features, but since I do
not have DVD-ROM access (and am pretty much against the concept
anyway) I'm not really going to go into any of them here.
The audio commentary for the film is pretty bland in my opinion, since
Nora Ephron just doesn't exactly ooze enthusiasm.  Producer Donner
does seem fairly excited to talk about the film, but 1) she sounds
like she's not wearing a microphone and is hovering behind Ephron in
the recording studio, and 2) Ephron cuts her off and talks over her on
numerous occasions.  Add all that to the fact that they're talking
about a movie that just didn't do a whole lot for me and you've got
one mediocre commentary.  The HBO documentary is equally blah, as it's
mainly just a sit down interview with Nora Ephron.  Although, the
documentary does have one highlight: there's a quick scene in it
that's not in the film itself with Meg Ryan and Greg Kinnear sitting
in a movie theater.  Had it been kept in the final cut I would call it
my favorite moment in the film.  [PG]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email:chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1999 - The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted
without permission.

Title
Review for Prophecy II, The (1998)
Cast: Christopher Walken, Jennifer Beals, Russell Wong, Eric Roberts
Written by: Matt Greenberg and Gary Spence
Directed by: Gary Spence
Running Time: 87 minutes
"The Prophecy II" is a vast improvement over the original. This
direct-to-video sequel again stars Christopher Walken as the evil
angel Gabriel, who's been cast out of hell and again wants to cause
havok in heaven and on Earth.
This time Gabriel is in pursuit of nurse Jennifer Beals, who is to
give birth to a half angel child. What this all means, I'm unclear
on. The film's story is pretty murky about details. But I do know that
Walken gives a very spirited and entertaining performance. Whenever
he's on screen, the film shines. It doesn't matter what's going on at
the time, because Walken's making it all worth while. Unfortunately,
he's not on enough to really make the film work. Most of the film is a
lot of religious psychobabble, none of which is really all too
interesting.
Eric Roberts has a small role as the angel Michael (who I'm assuming
is also who John Travolta played in 1996's "Michael").  His role seems
pointless though, as he never really does anything except share a
couple of lines with Walken.
"The Prophecy II" is a very good attempt, but still falls short of the
mark of being something good. At least though the finale of this film
isn't a meaningless duel between the evil angel and the devil, as was
the case in the original. [R]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL: http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email: chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1995-1998 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be
reprinted without permission.

Title
Review for Apocalypse, The (1997)
The Apocalypse (1997) 1/2 out of ***** - Cast: Sandra Bernhard, Cameron Dye,
Matt McCoy, Laura San Giacomo, Frank Zagarino. Running Time: 92 minutes.
A direct-to-video, low-budget sci-fi release with an intriguing title and a
bizarre cast, but without anything worthwhile to watch. This has all the
characteristics of a Roger Corman flick, yet his name is nowhere to be found
in the credits.
Now try and follow along with me on this one. Laura San Giacomo is on board
a spacecraft, starts to go nuts and runs around in vintage Benny Hill style.
Cut to many years in the future. Captains of a salvage ship (Bernhard and
McCoy) discover Giacomo's ship and naturally want to salvage it. But they
have no crew, so they have to hire a group of untrustworthy scoundrels,
who's leader just happens to be Bernhard's former lover. Sure enough, those
scoundrels prove themselves to be untrustworthy, as they turn on their
employers. But then they find themselves being taunted with Shakespeare by
the ship's computer, played by Laura San Giacomo. Make sense to you?
Poor Sandra Bernard. She starts her film career with a bang in Scorsese's
"The King of Comedy", then "Sesame Street Presents Follow That Bird" and
"Hudson Hawk" have brought her to this. She's SO out of place here, and it
seems like she knows it since she gives such a non-performance. Someone
reading their script for the first time could deliver more emotion. So when
you leave a movie and all you can say is, "Wow, that Matt McCoy is pretty
good", then there's a problem there. For what it's worth, Sandra and co-star
Cameron Dye also wrote and perform a song during the film's closing credits.
[R]
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for X Files, The (1998)
Cast: David Duchovny, Gillian Anderson, Martin Landau, Blythe Danner,
William B. Davis, Armin Mueller-Stahl, John Neville, Terry O'Quinn,
Glenne Headly, Tom Braidwood, Dean Haglund, Bruce Harwood
I have mixed reactions when it comes to The X Files.  I'm a big fan of
the show, so naturally I'd be a fan of the film.  And I did like the
film.  It has all of the elements which makes the television series
enjoyable: aliens, government conspiracies, etc etc.  But overall,
it's TOO much like the show.  In other words it would have made a
great episode, but there's nothing really there to merit me having to
pay for something that I get to see for free every week.
I would think that when you make a feature film out of a television
series that is still in production, there would be some reason to do
so other than money.  Apparently not.  The story being told in the
film should be one that just simply can't be told within the confines
of the small screen.  But aside from the score being a little bit
grander, the screen a little bigger, and a couple of visual effects,
there's no reason for this to be a feature film.  It's hardly even a
sweeps week episode.
And as far as the specifics of the story go, what plot elements
haven't we seen before in the series?  When the film begins, the X
Files division has been shut down (seen that).  The powers that be
then try to split FBI agents Fox Mulder (David Duchovny) and Dana
Scully (Gillian Anderson) apart (seen that).  Scully plans on quitting
the FBI (seen that).  Mulder then asks Scully "How can you say that?
After everything we've seen?"  (seen that).  Shadowy characters seek
out Agent Mulder to tell him secrets (seen that).  Those shadowy
characters are soon killed (seen that).  The other shadowy characters
decide that instead of killing Agent Mulder (which would of course,
solve all their problems) that they will take Agent Scully away from
him and do harm to her (seen that). Mulder will attempt to discover
aliens, but doesn't even bother to bring along a pocket camera to
document his inevitable discovery (seen that).  In the end, Mulder and
Scully have experienced something which makes them want to go on and
pursue their work, even though they have no hard evidence of anything
at all.  Yep, I've seen that too.
Then there are new elements of the story which perplex me.  For
example, usually when the evil powers that be decide to cover
something up, people die.  Here, they buy some kids shiny new bikes in
exchange for their silence.  Ok.  Then, it's revealed that the aliens
that the government had been conspiring with (and which aliens were we
having the conversations with, the black ooze aliens or the snarling
monster aliens?) have double-crossed them.  For some reason, they blow
this off and just continue to go along with the plan as scheduled.
Seems to me that would change some motivations.  Obviously not.
Please don't get me wrong with all of this though, the film did
entertain me.  It also managed to entertain the friend that went with
me who hasn't even seen an episode of the show.  So I guess it did
what it intended to do, which is to get both fans and non-fans of the
show to buy a movie ticket.  I just wish The X Files had been more
feature-film worthy.  [PG-13]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL: http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email: chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1995-1998 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be
reprinted without permission.

Title
Review for Friday the 13th Part 3: 3D (1982)
Friday the 13th Part III (3-D) (1982) *1/2 out of ***** - Directed by: Steve
Miner. Running Time: 96 minutes.
I wish I could accurately describe the theme music for part 3. The best way
I can put it is that it's funky. I know this is an odd question, but
remember the opening music of "Police Academy 4:Citizens on Patrol", when
Steve Guttenberg and Michael Winslow perform the title song "Citizens On
Patrol" during the opening credits? It's just like that.
Anyway, part 3 takes place a day after the events of part 2 (so technically
still 1985). This time, a group of horny teens (who also bring along two
aging hippie potheads for some reason) head up to a cabin on Crystal Lake
for a weekend of sex and weed. It turns out that one of the teens had been
attacked by Jason earlier in her life (which must have been between parts 1
and 2) so why she has returned to Crystal Lake ONE DAY after a new batch of
murders is beyond me. She's the lone survivor this time. Part 3 was
originally shown in theaters in 3-D, and from what I can tell from the
video, it looks as though they may have been fairly decent effects.
Jason had long, wild hair when he was unmasked in part 2. Now, one day later
he's completely bald. Also, it being one day later, it can't be Friday the
13th now can it? Oh well. Steve Miner is the only director who helmed more
than one film in the series. [R]
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related
links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Star Wars: Episode I - The Phantom Menace (1999)
Cast: Liam Neeson, Ewan McGregor, Natalie Portman, Jake Lloyd, Ian
McDiarmid, Samuel L.
Jackson, Terence Stamp, Frank Oz, Kenny Baker, Warwick Davis, Brian
Blessed, Anthony Daniels
Written and Directed by: George Lucas
Running Time: 131 minutes
Date Reviewed: May 19, 1999
I always wondered how I would review the original Star Wars trilogy if
I was seeing it today for the first time.  After all, I'm not a
wide-eyed, impressionable youth anymore.  Now I'm a tough-to-please,
sarcastic, cynical film critic.  I thought I would have this
opportunity when George Lucas released the "special editions" of the
original Star Wars trilogy back in 1997.  The fact of the matter was
that even though I hadn't seen these films in the theater in ages, too
many childhood memories came flooding back as I viewed them to sway my
opinion at all.  Simply put, I love the original Star Wars trilogy.
Growing up, I must have seen those three films hundreds of times.  So
now that there's a new chapter in the Star Wars saga, Star Wars
Episode I - The Phantom Menace, I get my chance for an unbiased
review.
The Phantom Menace is a prequel to the original Star Wars trilogy,
which were episodes 4-6 of George Lucas' science fiction vision.  When
the first trailer for The Phantom Menace hit theaters last year, I saw
it once... maybe twice.  I tried my best to withhold judgment against
everything I saw, simply because I didn't want to have any
preconceived notions about anything for the film.  Months passed, and
a second trailer was released.  Again, I only saw it once, trying not
to get my hopes up.  I didn't read anything online about the film's
production, and only briefly scanned through the preliminary reviews
that flooded the web after the initial press screenings.
On a side note: I saw all the people waiting in line for tickets weeks
before the film's release, and I saw all those same people standing in
line again so they could be the first ones into the theater for the
Wednesday, May 19th 12:01am show.  On a whim, I walked up to my local
gigaplex at 12:15am that Wednesday and asked if there were any tickets
available for the second show at 12:30am.  I was told that over 300
were still available.  So I purchased one, walked into the theater and
got my usual middle of the theater seat...  all of which took me about
60 seconds to do.  Waiting an extra 29 minutes saved me hours of
standing in line.
When the 20th Century Fox and Lucasfilm logos appeared on screen, the
crowd I was with cheered.  Those cheers exploded into energetic frenzy
when the Star Wars logo came on screen to the familiar John Williams
score.  At this moment, I actually had a chill of excitement run
through my body.  I was seeing the new Star Wars movie.  But despite
my attempt at low expectations, by film's end I was disappointed.
I won't even bother getting deep into the plot of The Phantom Menace
simply because it doesn't matter.  It doesn't matter to you reading
this because I'm sure you already know it, and it doesn't matter much
to me because quite frankly, it's not very interesting.  Two Jedi
warriors try to save a queen and prevent a war... amongst trade
negotiations and political debate and Senate meetings and the like.
Most of it is as exciting as watching a futuristic version of C-SPAN.
Yawn.  At the center of all the political blah in the film is the
introduction of Anakin Skywalker (Jake Lloyd, not doing a very good
acting job I'm afraid), who of course grows up to be the father of
Luke Skywalker and Princess Leia, and also becomes Darth Vader.
Now I must admit, one thing that I knew I would have a problem with is
the character of Jar Jar Binks.  Put simply, this might be one of the
most annoying characters not only in the Star Wars films, but in film
history.  Completely computer generated and talking in an embarrassing
Buckwheat-style slang, Jar Jar is an abomination to the Star Wars
universe (take the annoying Ewoks and multiply them by a million and
you still don't have the annoyance factor that this character
produces).  George Lucas has stated that he made this movie for kids,
and so kids are supposed to love Jar Jar.  Good for them.  As a kid
though, I hated the Ewoks... and I'm pretty sure I would have hated
Jar Jar too.  What makes me sad about this "kid humor" factor is that
Lucas feels that fart jokes and Jar Jar stepping in piles of crap are
funny.  Is that how you reach a kid of the 90s?  Poop?
Now yes, the special effects in the film are great... but they are CGI
effects.  Now I don't know about you, but I just don't like CGI
effects because to this day they just don't look real.  Give me models
and guys wearing latex masks and puppets any day.  Until CGI effects
blend in with real action, I'm not going to be a big fan of them.  Of
all the huge effects in the film, my favorite was the underwater
sequence in the first hour of the film.  Many will say that the pod
racing sequence was their favorite, and maybe it would have been one
of mine, but at that point in the film we've seen oh... 10,000 CGI
effects!  Nothing about it stood out, except maybe how annoying the
two headed CGI creature that was announcing the race seemed to be.
The most disappointing thing about the entire film is it's lack of a
main villain.  Darth Maul (Ray Park) is the closest thing the film has
to a villain... he's the apprentice of another villain of sorts in the
film Darth Sidious (who becomes the emperor that we see in both The
Empire Strikes Back and Return of the Jedi).  But the character of
Darth Maul (like all the characters in the film) is so underdeveloped
that the only way you know he's a villain is because he scowls at our
heroes when he sees them.  As a matter of fact, you'll see more of
Darth Maul at your local Taco Bell than you will here.  This character
had huge potential, and I would have loved to see more of him.  But as
I've said, Lucas didn't make this movie for me (nor does it seem he
made it for the die hard fans either).
A positive note for the film is it's final 20-30 minutes or so.
Cutting back and forth between a land war, a space battle, and a
lightsaber duel between Darth Maul, Obi-Wan Kenobi (Ewan McGregor),
and Qui-Gon Jinn (Liam Neeson), the sequence is what Star Wars is all
about.  Had the whole film been on this level of interest and
intensity I'd be delighted.
Quick questions about the film: Why do the droids C-3PO and R2-D2 not
recall any of the events in this film when we see them in Star Wars?
Why are the battle droids used in mass number for anything?  Sure they
may look pretty cool, but the battle droids are the most ineffectual
fighting force I've ever seen.  I think I saw them hit exactly one
target that they were shooting at throughout the course of the film.
Why not use more of those droids that could roll into a ball and chase
after you?  Those were much more effective.  What on earth was that
force field contraption that the Jedi get trapped in during their
battle with Darth Maul?  And finally, what does the title The Phantom
Menace even mean?  Who is the titular phantom menace?  Technically,
this film could also be called The Pesky Ghost, or The Troublesome
Spectre.
When I left the theater I was left with the question "Is the new Star
Wars film any good?"  It's so hard to really say.  Is it as good as
the original trilogy?  Definitely not.  Is it even a good science
fiction movie?  Almost.  The story lacks a human element to it.
There's no Han Solo character for the audience to identify with,
instead there's just a lot of Jedi jargon which sounds dangerously
like Star Trek inspired technobabble.
I'll say this for it though, even though at about thirty minutes into
the film I started to feel the effects of the silo full of soda which
I was enjoying, I didn't even consider leaving my seat.  I wasn't
going to miss a second of the film.  Despite all of my disappointment,
that has to say something about the film.  So to you George
Lucas... you made me not want to go to the bathroom.  Cheers to you.
[PG]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email:chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted
without permission.

Title
Review for Wild Things (1998)
Cast: Kevin Bacon, Matt Dillon, Neve Campbell, Theresa Russell, Denise
Richards, Robert Wagner, Bill Murray
Written by: Stephen Peters
Directed by: John McNaughton
Running Time: 113 minutes
I have to refrain from thinking like a typical guy as I review Wild
Things. A typical guy should just go nuts for this sort of trash,
easily giving it a rave review. I mean, how many male fantasies are
NOT presented to us on the screen? You've got lots of attractive women
either soaking wet, in bathing suits, their underwear, or just flat
out nude. You've got sex scenes, including girls making out with one
another. And you've got the world famous two-girl cat fighting. But
I'm not your typical guy. While all the above is pretty good stuff,
it's no different than your average direct-to-video stupid erotic
thriller. Thankfully though, Wild Things delivers in other
areas. Areas that real movies need to deliver in.
Wild Things is so sleazy that scum bag... I mean screenwriter Joe
Eszterhas (Showgirls, Jade) must be convinced that he wrote it. You've
got shades of Basic Instinct, Body Heat, and even Diabolique in
there. Taking place in South Florida, Matt Dillon plays a high school
guidance counselor (at a school which all the women are practically
bursting out of their clothing, and there's not one remotely
unattractive girl in the whole place). Early on in the film, he is
charged with rape by one of his students (Denise Richards). Then
another girl (Neve Campbell) also accuses Dillon of rape. What I've
just described is the basis of the film, yet I haven't even scratched
the surface on all the slime which will be presented to you. Nor will
I even try to do so. The story takes so many twists, turns, and
double-crosses that you just might get lost.
The cast is pretty good, one aspect that sets it apart from the
before-mentioned stupid erotic thriller. Now the dialogue is laughably
bad in most scenes, but it's usually delivered by the actors with that
sort of tongue-in-cheek attitude, as of they are saying "Yes, we know
it's silly too. Just watch." much like most of Starship Troopers
was. The writer obviously knows this isn't Citizen Kane, doesn't
he?. Bill Murray, brilliant as always, plays the strip-mall lawyer
that Dillon hires to defend him. He adds the intentional humor. He has
about 20 minutes of screen time, and it's all great stuff. The rest of
the cast seems to be acting adequately enough, with the possible
exception of Theresa Russell, who makes up for her bad acting by being
scantily dressed most of the time. And Kevin Bacon (who also
executive-produced) has one quick scene that will let you make as many
new "Six Degrees of Kevin Bacon" jokes as you'd like. When you see it,
you'll know what I mean.
A big problem I had was that the film spent way too much time trying
just to confuse the audience. Forget the fact that the amount of
double-crossing going on would just never work, what I'm talking about
are individual scenes which are presented to the audience solely to
fool us. Characters who have ulterior motives obviously have to act
inconspicuous around others, yet many times they just keep acting,
even when no one else is around!
Even as the closing credits start to roll, you'll want to stay in your
seat as the film will flash back to earlier events, explaining
itself. I don't believe I've ever seen that before, and it was a
pretty interesting idea. Just be sure to stay seated, people behind
you get pretty ticked off when you stand up to leave, and then keep
standing to watch the screen.
Wild Things is certainly trash, no doubt about that, but it's
entertaining trash. It knows it, and doesn't try to be anything but.
It's humorous, both intentionally and unintentionally. And the story,
while completely absurd, is interesting to watch unfold. And watching
it unfold around young scantily clad women climbing out of swimming
pools? Even better. [R]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL: http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email: chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1995-1998 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be
reprinted without permission.

Title
Review for Red Corner (1997)
Red Corner, just like other movies of it's type (The Trial, Closet
Land), reaffirms why I'm never going to a foreign country.  Now how
many times have we seen a movie about an American (in this case,
Richard Gere) going to a foreign land (in this case, China), only to
be accused of some crime (in this case, murder and rape) and then
whining for the whole movie about American rights and ideals and all
that? I mean yeah sure, we're a great country and all, but how many
movies like this do we really need?
I'm not ruining anything by telling you that Gere is framed in the
film, because never once is the audience led to believe that there's
even the possibility of guilt on his part. Remember, movies today have
no guts. Instead, we just watch Gere deal with being imprisoned in a
foreign land, dealing with the foreign people, complaining about
foreign law, etc. etc. We even know from the beginning why he's being
framed, and this may sound stupid but it's technically all based
around a clone of the TV show Baywatch. Yes that's right, a rip-off of
Baywatch causes Gere to be framed for murder.
Red Corner is a film with no new concepts or ideas whatsoever, but yet
is still slightly compelling enough to remain watchable, for the most
part anyway. By the last 10 or 15 minutes though I was just ready for
the film to be over and done with. Once the culprits were revealed, I
just couldn't have cared less. [R]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL: http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email: chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1995-1998 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be
reprinted without permission.

Title
Review for Courtyard, The (1995) (TV)
The Courtyard (CABLE-1995) *** out of ***** - Cast: Andrew McCarthy,
Madchen Amick, Cheech Marin, Bonnie Bartlett, Vincent Schiavelli.  Directed
By: Fred Walton.  Running Time: 105 minutes.
New York architect Andrew McCarthy is transferred to Los Angeles and finds
a great apartment in a complex called Shangri La.  One night he is awakened
by someone blasting their television and through a pretty clever mix-up
involving the intercom system he is entangled into a complex murder plot.
He meets and falls in love with the victim's sister (Amick, from TVs "Twin
Peaks") and more and more feels like he was the cause of her brother's
death.  So he sets out to try and uncover the killer's identity,
interfering with the investigation of detective Cheech Marin.  The problem
is: just about everyone living in the complex is insane in one way or
another.
"The Courtyard" is pretty good considering the quality of most
made-for-cable films.  It's got a good story, with plenty of possible
murder suspects for the audience to choose from.  I guessed it correctly by
the way, and if you pay close attention to the dialogue you'll be able to
figure it out as well.  If there's nothing else in at the video store, this
one may be worth your time, as long as your video store actually HAS a copy
of it.
--Chuck Dowling  
--Chuck's Movie Reviews -- http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/

Title
Review for Citizen Ruth (1996)
Citizen Ruth (1996) ** out of ***** - Cast: Laura Dern, Swoosie Kurtz,
Kurtwood Smith, Mary Kay Place, Burt Reynolds, Kelly Preston, David Graf,
Alicia Witt, Tippi Hedren, Diane Ladd. Written by: Alexander Payne and Jim
Taylor. Directed by: Alexander Payne. Running Time: 105 minutes.
George Carlin once said that you can joke about anything. I believe that.
Although it helps when the joke is funny. "Citizen Ruth" tries to poke fun
at the abortion controversy raging in this country right now, and while the
subject isn't exactly known for its comedic potential, it would have been
possible for this film to be funny. But it's not. Mainly it comes across as
awkward.
Laura Dern plays Ruth Stoops, an indigent woman who has major drug problems
and has become pregnant for the fourth time. After being arrested, she faces
felony charges for indangering the life of her fetus. The judge then comes
to her and tells her to go and "take care" of her problem (which makes
absolutely no sense based on the crime which she was charged). Eventually,
organizations representing both sides of the issue are involved, and are
playing a game of tug-a-war with Ruth's situation. Neither side really cares
about Ruth herself, but are just using her to advance their agenda.
The character of Ruth Stoops needed to be sympathetic at some point for the
audience to care about her, but it never happens. Whenever she's not trying
to get high from paint or glue fumes, she's getting drunk, yelling,
screaming, crying, falling down stairs, beating up young children, or
punching herself in the stomach. It got to the point where the people who
were exploiting her came off more favorably than she actually did.
There are just a couple of good things about the film. One is a scene
involving a very perky pro-choice doctor and nurse. That scene made me
laugh. The other is Burt Reynolds. I like Burt, and I'm glad to see him
working. Other than that though, "Citizen Ruth" isn't very entertaining, and
mostly comes off as an unpleasant viewing experience. [R]
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related
links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Frighteners, The (1996)
(1996) ** - C:Michael J. Fox, Trini Alvarado, Jeffrey Combs, Jake Busey,
Dee Wallace Stone, R. Lee Ermey.
"The Frighteners" tries to be too many things all at once. It's part comedy,
part horror, part thriller, and sadly, only partially entertaining.
The film stars Michael J. Fox, a con-man who enlists the aid of two spirits
to haunt people's houses. Then he shows up to "exterminate" them and
collects from the homeowners. Sounds good so far. The town that he lives in
however, has had a recent history of people dying mysteriously. Mainly,
their hearts have been crushed with no signs of outside force used. Sounds
good too. Then, Fox is able to see one of the murders take place. It's
committed by a grim-reaper type spirit that just reaches into people and
rips the life out of them. Also very interesting. So what's the problem?
Well, the main problem with "The Frighteners" is that there's no depth into
anything. The paragraph above gives as much information as the movie gives,
which is hardly any. Fox is working with two spirits, a stereotypical black
man and a wimpy white guy, to help him scam money. How does he know these
spirits? How did he meet them? How did they decide to do this? What exactly
do they do during these cons? No details available. At one point, the
spirits are haunting a rich woman, making her small children fly around the
room. When Fox shows up to exterminate them, she waves a newspaper in his
face which states that he is a local con man who bothers people at funerals.
So she throws him out. Now, did the newspaper state that he works with two
spirits to con people? No, of course not. If it had, ever newspaper in the
world would be hounding him. All it said was that he bothers people at
funerals. So she just dismisses the fact that her children were FLYING
AROUND THE ROOM. Yeah, ok. Anyway, this interesting plot line is dismissed
15 minutes into the film.
So now we're onto the mystery of what is killing all the people in town.
Well, early on in the film we are treated to footage from a documentary
about a vicious killing spree at a hospital in town. The murders were
committed by an orderly there (Jake Busey, who looks and sounds so much like
his father Gary that it's frightening) who wanted to kill more people than
one of his mass murderer idols. We are then told that the orderly was
executed for his crimes. Now, why are we watching this? Well, one of the
Laws Of Movies is that you will hardly ever be given information in a film
that doesn't have anything to do with the story (unless you're watching
Michael Mann's Heat). So obviously it's this guy's spirit who's doing all
the killing. But the film treats the discovery of this like some sort of
revalation, like we're supposed to be so surprised by it. I can't stand
watching a story where we the audience know everything that's happening but
have to watch the characters on screen figure it out for themselves. That's
why I can't stand TV's "Columbo".
The biggest problem I have with the film is that nothing about the spirits
or the spirit world is given any detail. For example, the two spirit friends
of Fox have to ride in his car to get from place to place, yet other
spirits, like the demon, just fly around. These spirits walk without any
problems, but pass through walls and fall in holes and other things. Then
why does the ground support them? R. Lee Ermey (the drill sergeant from
"Full Metal Jacket") has a great bit part here as a drill sergeant spirit
who's in charge of the graveyard and keeps the other spirits in line. He
can, at will, change outfits and suddenly produce big machine guns from thin
air. So why can't the other spirits do this as well? The black spirit
complains early on that he wants a new outfit. Well, Ermey can change his
clothes with ease, so why can't the black guy? Later, Fox's two spirit
buddies are fighting the demon, basically just by holding on to it. Yet,
when Ermey fights with the demon, he magically produces heavy artillery to
fight the beast. Again, why can't the other spirits do this? What are these
levels of the spirit world where you can do different things?  It's bad
writing, that's what it is.
Late in the picture, Fox's character realizes (how he realizes this I have
no idea) that the only way he can fight this demon is by fighting it in the
spirit world, so he basically kills himself to go fight it. Then, 20 minutes
later he's brought back to life and after resting for about three minutes,
he proceeds at full strength, alive, to go and fight the demon again. So
what was the point of killing himself in the first place??? Ten minutes
after coming back from the dead he gets shot several times, falls 5 or 6
stories through many floorboards, dies again, but is still ok by the end of
the final scene, which can't take place more that two days after the ordeal.
The police, who were not witnesses to the film's outcome, seem completely ok
with the explanation that Fox must give them, about demons and ghosts
killing everyone. Also, the romance that develops between Fox and Alvarado
is so phony that it's annoying. These people fall in love in a matter of
minutes, which also happens to be a matter of minutes after Alvarado's
husband dies. Truly ridiculous.
There are a few bright spots in the film. Jeffrey Combs plays a truly
whacked-out FBI agent who's in charge of investigating "weird cases". Combs
("Re-Animator" and "From Beyond") always plays this type of character
flawlessly, and he's very entertaining here. The special effects are also
excellent, but just as with another Robert Zemeckis production Death Becomes
Her, the special effects are all there is. "The Frighteners" is a major
disappointment.

Title
Review for Chamber, The (1996)
The Chamber (1996) ** out of ***** - Cast: Chris O'Donnell, Gene Hackman,
Faye Dunaway, Raymond Berry, Lela Rochon, Bo Jackson. Written by: William
Goldman and Chris Reese. Directed by: James Foley. Running Time: 110
minutes.
There are two characters that for the life of me I cannot figure out
Hollywood's fascination with: the President of the United States and
convicted murderers. "The Chamber" makes the FOURTH film in less than two
years about someone trying to save a GUILTY person from the death penalty.
Chris O'Donnell stars as Adam Hall, a fresh young lawyer who travels to
Mississippi to appeal the case of Sam Cahall (Gene Hackman), a convicted
murderer whose racist beliefs cause him to blow up a building containing a
Jewish lawyer and his two young children. We find out early that Hall is
actually Sam's grandson, which is why he has requested the case. He doesn't
seem to care for his grandfather, and it certainly seems like he hates
racism, but I guess he hates the death penalty even more. He must save his
mean old granddad from that mean old gas chamber.
Now knowing that this was the fourth movie in the last few months to do the
exact same story, stupid me, I figured that this was a mystery and was
trying to figure out who really planted that bomb so that mean old racist
Hackman can get out of jail. As I said, stupid me. Hackman is guilty. And
none of the characters make any sense. Hackman (who does give a good
performance, even with an illogical character) is mean, racist,
cold-hearted, yet forgiving, sympathetic, and kind. How is that possible?
And I already explained O'Donnell's paradox, I see no reason why he is
trying to save this man's life.
Another main problem is that Hackman's (and other's) racist speeches go
completely unanswered. While he's spouting his racist views we might see a
shot of someone rolling their eyes or whatever, but no one speaks up to put
Hackman in his place. It's as if the filmmakers think that all of society
has matured so much that everyone will also just roll their eyes and
realize, "Hey, racism is stupid". This can be dangerous. A great many people
who feel the way characters do in this film are still out there, and these
unanswered comments can make strong impressions on those weak-minded people.
I didn't get to see "The Chamber" in the theaters, it was gone too quickly.
That surprised me. John Grisham movies have always been blockbusters. After
seeing it however, I understand why. Attention Hollywood: the movie-going
public has no desire to see movies about people trying to save the lives of
convicted murderers! It just doesn't interest them. Go figure. [R]
--Chuck Dowling  
--Chuck's Movie Reviews -- http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/

Title
Review for Blind Vengeance (1990) (TV)
All three of these films are available on home video.
Blind Vengeance (TV-1990) **** - C:Gerald McRaney, Lane Smith, Marg
Helgenberger.
An intelligent made for TV movie? Not possible you say? Well, it's true.
"Blind Vengeance" is a smart and original TV flick. At first you're led to
believe otherwise. Two boys are killed in a small town for unknown reasons
by three locals led by Lane Smith. But the three men are found not-guilty
because of a legal technicality. One of the boys' fathers (McRaney) come to
town to seek revenge on those who murdered his boy. You're thinking that
it's just going to be another "Death Wish" clone where the father hunts down
and kills the bad guys, but that isn't so. What he does instead is he starts
to slowly torment the killers, within the confines of the law, in hopes to
get them to turn against each other. The film's only flaw is a completely
unnecessary romantic sub-plot. "Blind Vengeance" is well worth watching.
The Great American Traffic Jam (TV-1980) 1/2 - C:Desi Arnaz Jr., Michael
Lerner, Rue McClanahan, Ed McMahon, Al Morinaro, Vic Tayback, Abe Vigoda,
Lyle Waggoner, Charles Napier, Howard Hesseman.
Absolutely dreadful TV movie with one of the most ridiculous and completely
boring stories ever written. A group of characters all get stuck in a big
traffic jam and then sit in their cars and talk about their problems. Tense!
Gripping! Exciting! Anyway, there's also a stupid subplot about the Traffic
Control Center trying different things to get traffic moving again. The
characters in the Traffic Control Center keep acting like this traffic jam
is the worst catastrophy in human history. This might have been meant to be
a parody of the disaster films from the period ("Earthquake," "The Towering
Inferno," etc.), but I just can't give a TV movie that much credit. As a
comedy it doesn't work, as satire it doesn't work, and it's a complete waste
of 100 minutes of your life. Also known as "Gridlock" but who cares.
Not My Kid (TV-1984) **1/2 - C:George Segal, Stockard Channing, Andrew
Robinson.
Typical TV movie about the effects of a teenage drug addict on a normal
family. After an entertaining first half, the film becomes a series of
tearful confessions by teenages in a drug rehab facility. Somehow it ends up
being the fault of the father (Segal) and he has to be the one to make the
final confession. (!) Be sure to applaud when Segal says the film's title.
Irritating music score and a laughable ending.
Have A Question Or Comment? Email Me At chuckd21@southeast.net
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,500 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for Wyatt Earp (1994)
Wyatt Earp (1994) ****1/2 - C:Kevin Costner, Dennis Quaid, Gene Hackman,
Michael Madsen, Tom Sizemore, Jeff Fahey, Mark Harmon, Bill Pullman,
Isabella Rossellini, Jo Beth Williams, Mare Winningham, Mackenzie Astin, Tea
Leoni.
"Wyatt Earp" faced unfortunate comparisons to the Kurt Russell film
"Tombstone" which came out only months earlier. And while both are immensely
entertaining, they are in fact two distinctly different kinds of films.
"Tombstone" is an action picture, centering around the events which took
place in the town of Tombstone involving Wyatt Earp. "Wyatt Earp" is a drama
about the man himself, about what made him who he was, and about the events
throughout his entire life. People who expect lots of action from this film
will be disappointed, but I knew exactly what I was about to see and
therefore my expectations were met.
"Wyatt Earp" runs over three hours long, something which audiences today
just won't stand for, no matter if the film is good or not (which makes no
sense, especially when people will rent three movies and then watch them
back to back). For me, as long as a movie is good, then it can go on
forever. "Wyatt Earp" in no way seems too long.
Surely almost every movie-goer by now has seen some version of the Wyatt
Earp legend, or at least knows it's story. So there's not much need to
discuss the plot of the film. Wyatt Earp and his family try to lead normal
lives, but get drawn into the business of keeping the peace and can not
escape that profession.
Now, I have seen many film versions of this story: "My Darling Clementine",
"Gunfight at the OK Corral", "Hour of the Gun", and "Tombstone". And I still
must say that I'm confused as to the actual events leading up to and
following the big gunfight between the Earps and the Clantons. None of the
film versions have successfully gone into enough detail to explain matters.
I guess that the filmmakers assume that we already know the background info
and therefore don't need to give much exposition into the conflict.
Kevin Costner, who in my opinion has received a lot of unnecessary criticism
in the last few years, does a fine job with the title character. He
convincingly plays Wyatt from his teenage years up until old age. Dennis
Quaid, who pulled a Robert De Niro losing over 30 pounds to play the sickly
Doc Holliday, gives a fantastic performance. The same goes for the rest of
the cast, all doing just fine with what they are given to do. The direction,
cinematography, and set design are all excellent, as is James Newton
Howard's eloquent score music.
A minor problem with the film is that the script tries to cover way too much
ground, and even at its long running time you feel as though the filmmakers
have barely scratched the surface. Also, characters seem to wander in and
out of the story with no explaination as to where they are. Other
characters, such as Mark Harmon's, aren't even introduced to us, we just
have to figure out who he is as we go along! And, the final two scenes seem
unsatisfactory. You want to see Wyatt return to his father and resolve their
conflict. You want to see Wyatt take Doc to the hospital and to say goodbye
to his friend. But, I guess if movies always went exactly where we wanted
them to, then the whole movie "experience" would lose it's effect.
A special expanded edition of "Wyatt Earp" was released on video which
included more that twenty minutes of footage which had been cut from the
original theatrical version. All of the scenes re-added are worthy scenes,
adding more depth to characters, and giving more infomation about who
certain people are, such as Mark Harmon's character and Isabella
Rossellini's character. The expanded edition gets *****.
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,500 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office
reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for Contact (1997)
Contact (1997) NO STARS out of ***** - Cast: Jodie Foster, Matthew
McConaughey, James Woods, Tom Skerritt, Angela Bassett, John Hurt, Rob Lowe,
David Morse. Written by: James V. Hart and Michael Goldenberg. Based on the
novel by: Carl Sagan. Directed by: Robert Zemeckis. Running Time: 150
minutes.
Hollywood, and specifically Robert Zemeckis, has given me a cure for
insomnia which will never fail to work. "Contact" is just about the most
painfully slow, dull, and lifeless film I have ever had the misfortune to
sit through in a movie theater.
Now, as I have been reading the advance reviews for "Contact" it seems that
my opinion here is going to be in the minority. I've read statements like
"It's one of the best films of the decade" and "Hollywood has finally come
close to perfection". So I feel as though I'll need to over-justify many of
my comments.
First off, I am all for long movies, just as long as it's a good movie. If a
film can maintain it's level of entertainment, it can go on forever as far
as I'm concerned. So when I say that "Contact" is way too long, which it
most certainly is, don't dismiss it as that I just hate long movies.
Second, there doesn't have to be action or mayhem going on in a film for it
to entertainment. I'm not a brainless drooler who's only entertained by
stuff blowed up real good. Some of my favorite films are dramas, with very
little going on in them. But they have a compelling story and characters who
are interesting, unlike "Contact".
"Contact" is all about listening for radio signals from outer space for
signs of intelligent life. Sounds exciting doesn't it? The opening shot of
the film, a very lengthy pullback through the universe, shows us how far our
own radio and television signals are able to reach. But this goes on WAY too
long, and sets the stage for the film's utter boredom.
In the first 45 minutes, not much happens. You'd think that this would the
time where characters are developed, but not so. There just really isn't
anything going on. Astronomer Jodie Foster meets up with hunky Matthew
McConaughey and the two immediately jump into bed together. This is
character development?
Then, a signal is received from outer space. Finally, something interesting.
But amazingly, the scene is so dull, and done with a total lack of energy
that who would care? Foster discovers this signal, and then for ten minutes
babbles nothing but complex scientific jargon about it to her co-scientists
which left me completely lost. What exactly is going on? Take some advanced
science classes and maybe you too can understand.
>From that point on, I was pretty much looking around the theater for
something else to look at. So to go into the details about the remainder of
the film would be impossible to do, since it never got more interesting than
the theater ceiling. I do know that James Woods and David Morse are
completely wasted in very small roles. Robert Zemeckis, please don't follow
the path which you are on. Joel Schumacher awaits you at it's end. [PG]
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Turbulence (1997)
Turbulence (1997) *1/2 out of ***** - Cast: Ray Liotta, Lauren Holly, Ben
Cross, Hector Elizondo, Rachel Ticotin, Catherine Hicks, J. Kenneth
Campbell. Written by: Jonathan Brett, Steven E. De Souza and John Herzfeld.
Directed by: Robert Butler. Running Time: 100 minutes.
Say, tell me if you've seen this before: a crisis on-board a commercial
airliner causes a stewardess to have to fly and land the plane herself.
Airport '97 anyone?
Ray Liotta is a psychotic serial killer being transported from New York to
California on Christmas Eve.  Amazingly, on what would seemingly be a busy
day of travel on one of the most flown routes, only about six other
passengers are on the flight.  Anyway, they take off, Liotta escapes and
kills all the police and the pilots, and stewardess Lauren Holly locks
herself in the cockpit to fly the plane.  The story is beyond routine, the
script is
embarrassing (at one point, this jumbo jet is flying completely upside
down), the characters are worthless, and the performances are annoying.
Surprisingly, co-writer Steven E. De Souza actually wrote the first two "Die
Hard" movies!
"Turbulence" takes place at Christmas time, yet the film was released a few
days AFTER the holidays.  Brilliant marketing, as no one cares about anything
having to do with Christmas after December 26th.  The studio knew they had
a bomb, and purposely dumped it out when the fewest number of people would
see it. [R]
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me (1999)
Myers is still good as Austin Powers and even better as Dr. Evil.  He
also unfortunately plays a third character who is not so entertaining
called Fat Bastard... a huge Scottish fellow who's only real purpose
in the film is to be disgusting.  There was only one moment of his in
the film that I enjoyed (clearly a improvised one), but thankfully his
character's screen time is kept to a minimum (unlike another annoying
supporting character from a big summer 1999 release I might add).
Heather Graham is on hand as 60's CIA agent Felicity Shagwell and
provides some very nice visuals... and a decent performance too I
guess... as does Elizabeth Hurley, briefly reprising her character
from the first film.  Rob Lowe plays the younger version of Robert
Wagner's character Number 2, and does an amazingly dead on
impersonation of Wagner.  And you'll wish for more of Seth Green, who
plays Dr. Evil's son.
So how does it compare to the first film?  Well, in some ways it's
better and in some ways it's worse.  From a storytelling standpoint
the first film is vastly superior.  It was able to combine a cohesive
story and huge laughs without any problem whatsoever.  This film has
some very inspired moments, so much so that it will help you overlook
the complete lack of a comprehensible story (I know if the writers had
tried, the story could have been fleshed out with ease).  And many
times the comedy here is better than the comedy in the first one.  I
think each one has it's own strong points which make up for it's own
weaknesses.  Having said that, I liked both films about the same, and
look forward to a third one.  [PG-13]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email:chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1999 - The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted
without permission.

Title
Review for Rocketeer, The (1991)
(1991) ****1/2 - C:Alan Arkin, Bill Campbell, Jennifer Connelly, Timothy
Dalton, Paul Sorvino, Terry O'Quinn.
Parents who complain about the lack of quality family movies each year
should all be slapped. Every year, Hollywood gives them one or two films
with exactly what they ask for, and then they don't go! "The Rocketeer" is a
perfect example. It's a great film for the whole family and yet it bombed at
the box office.
The story takes place in the 1940's. Campbell stars as a pilot who stumbles
across a single person jet pack built by Howard Hughes (O'Quinn). The
government wants to get their hands on it to use it against the Nazis, and
the Nazis want the jet pack to use against the world. Campbell's best friend
Peevy (Arkin) constructs a helmet with a rudder on it and Campbell
reluctantly tests the jet pack to save a friend in need at an air show. The
papers, on hand for the show, all witness a flying man and name him The
Rocketeer. Campbell's girlfriend (the gorgeous Jennifer Connelly) is later
kidnapped by an Errol Flynn-type actor (Dalton) who happens to be a nazi spy
and also wants the jet pack.
The film has a great cast, especially Alan Arkin, who has yet to give a bad
performance on film. My only reason for not giving the film a perfect rating
is because one of the thugs in the film is this big mutant thing which looks
like a leftover from the cast of Warren Beatty's "Dick Tracy". That's just
too silly to overlook. "The Rocketeer" has a rousing musical score and
overall, it's just a simple, fun, entertaining family movie.
Have A Question Or Comment? Email Me At chuckd21@southeast.net
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,500 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office
reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for Allnighter, The (1987)
Cast: Susanna Hoffs, Dedee Pfeiffer, Joan Cusack, John Terlesky, James
Shanta, Michael Ontkean, Pam Grier, Meshach Taylor, Max Perlich
Written by: M.L. Kessler and Tamar Simon Hoffs
Directed by: Tamar Simon Hoffs
Running Time: 95 minutes
It's the last weekend of school at Pacifica University and three beach
house mates: Gina (Joan Cusack), Val (Dedee Pfeiffer) and the Molly
(Susanna Hoffs, lead singer for The Bangles) have big plans.  Val and
Gina hope to attend a wild beach party to end all beach parties, and
Molly is looking for either true love (she's looking for someone smart
and cool like playwright Sam Shepard!) or a one night stand.
These plans never materialize thanks to supposed "comedic" antics that
try to ruin their final big night together.  For example, the guy that
Molly wants her one night stand with (Sheriff Harry S. Truman from
"Twin Peaks" himself, Michael Ontkean, playing an ex-rock star that
Molly confuses with George Harrison!) flat out rejects her.  And Gina
and Val?  Well they get arrested for prostitution in a wacky whimsical
sub-plot!
Directed by Susanna Hoffs' mother Tamar Simon Hoffs, everything about
The Allnighter is quite frankly a waste of time.  Even the title is
misleading, since that at least 45 minutes of this movie takes place
the day after the uneventful "all nighter".  The long, pointless
surfing montages, the chicks in prison sub-plot (with Pam Grier to
boot), and the extended sequence when Hoffs strips down to her skimpy
underwear and dances around to Aretha Franklin's "Respect" are all
utterly worthless (well ok, Hoffs in her underwear is fine by me, but
you get the idea).
Although initially a Universal release, The Allnighter is presented on
DVD from Anchor Bay Entertainment.  It has the film in standard (pan
and scan) form, as well as it's original theatrical aspect ratio of
1.85:1.  Also included on the DVD: an audio commentary by director
Tamar Simon Hoffs and star Susanna Hoffs, a music video for the film
directed by Tamar Simon Hoffs (the song for which is slightly catchy,
but the video itself is unintentionally hilarious), the original
theatrical trailer, and biographies for both mother and daughter
Hoffs.
The commentary track is fairly entertaining as far as commentary
tracks go, but rarely do mother and daughter Hoffs seem to be on the
same train of thought.  They'll talk over each other and interrupt one
another, then neglect to go back and finish the previous anecdote that
was being told.  Also at the start of the commentary, Susanna Hoffs
informs us that she has laryngitis, which doesn't exactly make for an
interesting listening experience.
Another bonus on the DVD is a short film circa 1982 written, produced,
and directed by Tamar Simon Hoffs called The Haircut.  It stars John
Cassavetes as a businessman who enters a barber shop for a quick trim
only to come away amazed at the deluxe full-service treatment given
inside.  This short film runs roughly 20 minutes long, and is
infinitely more entertaining than anything in The Allnighter.  Running
commentary is also given for this short film by both mother and
daughter (the latter appears in the film as part of "The Bangs"... an
early formation of The Bangles).
Overall, Anchor Bay gives us a fairly solid DVD for a film that barely
seems worth all the effort.  I mean sure it might be "the first major
studio film written, produced, and directed by a woman"... but does
that make it any good?  No.  [PG-13]
The Jacksonville Film Journal
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email:chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted
without permission.

Title
Review for Bean (1997)
Bean (1997) ** out of ***** - Cast: Rowan Atkinson, Peter MacNichol, Burt
Reynolds, Harris Yulin, Pamela Reed, Larry Drake. Written by: Richard Curtis
and Robin Driscoll. Directed by: Mel Smith. Running Time: 90 minutes.
You would think that this film's dismal failure would be due to American
filmmakers getting hold of a brilliant British comedy and "Americanizing"
it. You'd be wrong, since full blame can be placed on the very folks who
wrote and created the series: Rowan Atkinson, Robin Driscoll, and Richard
Curtis. Should you ever happen to meet those chaps, do me a favor. Grab them
by the hair and yell really loudly in their ear, "WHAT WERE YOU THINKING?!
HAVE YOU EVER HEARD THE PHRASE 'IF IT AIN'T BROKE DON'T FIX IT'?!" Then walk
away.
The film concerns Mr. Bean (Atkinson) and his visit to America while
escorting the painting of "Whistler's Mother" to an American buyer (played
by Burt Reynolds, in the type of bit part that his success in "Boogie
NIghts" should hopefully do away with). Now how or why Mr. Bean is sent on
this trip makes no sense, and I can't even describe how the film explains
it. The point is that Mr. Bean comes to America and causes wacky trouble.
Problems problems problems, where to begin? First, the score music from the
TV show has been completely replaced by score that is either at times one
note away from the score from "Beetlejuice" or one note away from the score
from "Rob Roy". Then, the song choices are totally uninspired. "Good
Vibrations"? "I Love L.A."? Wow, don't put any thought into that guys. Also,
Bean makes WAY too much noise in the film. The character doesn't speak much,
but in the series you really only heard the laughter of the audience, and
maybe the occasional murmur from Mr. Bean. Each episode was like a Chaplin
silent movie. In the film, Bean is constantly moaning, grunting, whining,
etc. It's annoying, and just plain wrong for the character. The main problem
though is that it's just not funny. With each episode of the series there
would be dozens of really great laughs crammed into less than 30 minutes.
Multiply that running time by three however, and the laughs steadily
decrease. They even have the gaul to REPEAT jokes from the series. Sad, and
creatively lazy.
As a series, "Mr. Bean" only ran for about 13 episodes or so. Why on earth
did Atkinson and the gang decide it was time to completely rework
everything? 13 half-hour episodes certainly hadn't exhausted all possible
situations. All I can say positively for the film at this point is that it's
almost appropriate for all ages, if it wasn't for a couple of scenes where
it appears as though Mr. Bean is having sex with things. And even that isn't
a very positive statement. Please guys, go back to England and go back to
television so you'll make me laugh again. [PG-13]
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Gimme Shelter (1970)
(1970) ***1/2 - C:The Rolling Stones.
I am not a huge music fan and I must admit that I don't own any albums by
the Rolling Stones, which made me hesitant to watch a documentary about a
concert they performed back in 1969. However, "Gimme Shelter" is a
fascinating film. At that concert, four babies were born and four people
were killed, and one of the murders was captured on camera by the crew
filming the documentary. It seems as though that before the concert, the
Hell's Angels were asked to make sure that no one gets onto the stage and it
seems they took their job a little too seriously. Even without that, the
documentary is still interesting. People keep trying to grab Mick Jagger,
dogs run across the stage, etc. It has a "Hey, Look At The Freaks" feel to
it, as we watch so many people whacked out on drugs do really embarassing
and stupid things. I hope that these people had children, that these
children rent this film, see their parents making complete fools of
themselves, and then torment their parents until the day they die. This film
would be great for schools to show as part of their "Say No To Drugs"
programs. George Lucas is credited for some of the camera work.
As a footnote: Jim Carrey's character in The Cable Guy, right before singing
"Somebody To Love" by Jefferson Airplane, credits the song's success to this
film. However, even though Jefferson Airplane does play at the concert, that
song is not part of the film.
Have A Question Or Comment? Email Me At chuckd21@southeast.net
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,500 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office
reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for Traveller (1997)
Traveller (1997) ** out of ***** - Cast: Bill Paxton, Mark Wahlberg,
Julianna Margulies, James Gammon, Rance Howard. Written by: Jim McGlynn.
Directed by: Jack Green. Running Time: 103 minutes.
I've read that Bill Paxton searched a long time for a project that he could
both produce and star in. He finally found what he was looking for in
"Traveller". I have no idea what was appealing to him about it.
"Traveller" is an odd story about a large family of Irish-Americans who live
in the woods of North Carolina. Their only means of financial support
involves driving around to various surrounding towns and ripping off hard
working men and women. The head of this family is a man by the name of Boss
Jack, a respected and feared man who never goes out on the cons.
Once, a "traveller" married outside the family (the horror!) and produced a
son (Wahlberg). When that man dies, Wahlberg journeys to North Carolina to
attend the funeral. He finds that he is not welcome, but insists on learning
what the family is all about. Bokky (Paxton), one of the highly regarded
members of the clan, agrees to give him a shot and takes him along on his
next scamming trip.
My main problem with the film is this: who cares about any of these people?
You can make con men compelling characters, mainly by having them involved
in cons which they are ripping off other con men. But not innocent people.
This film treats the people who are getting conned with such contempt, as
the scenes showing them actually getting ripped off are done with an odd
sense of whimsy, like its fun to break the law. Its a good ol' time, as
Randy Travis music plays on the soundtrack and we watch the silly people
lose their money and hopelessly chase after the laughing con men. Yeehaa!
Now, Paxton's character is supposed to undergo a change in the film after he
feels bad about ripping off a bartender (Margulies). In the con (which I
don't know if it's a common one or not, but if it isn't, then it's stolen
from the 1994 movie "Deadfall"), Marguiles ends up losing her job. When
Paxton comes later to apoligize, she gets all gooey and they fall in love.
That would be my reaction to someone who ripped me off and caused me to lose
my job. And so what that Paxton's character feels remorse? You'll notice he
feels remorse for the sexy woman, I don't see him going back and apoligizing
the the poor farmers he's scammed, or anyone else for that matter. And I
could see women not caring for this film, seeing it as just yet another
instance where the man has to come to the rescue of the airhead girl who
can't think for herself. This seemed blatently obvious to me, and I NEVER
think along those lines. So who does it appeal to? Most likely Bill Paxton's
family, and mythical gangs of con men who live in the woods, if they ever
get the chance to catch a movie.
Wahlberg also has his own subplot going, about being accepted into the
criminal clan, but I really can't care about that either. And I still can't
buy Wahlberg as an actor, as I keep expecting him to drop his pants and yell
"Damn! Yeah baby! Come on come on!" Ron Howard's parents both have roles
here as well, even though Ron Howard has no credited association with the
film. [R]
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related
links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Private Parts (1997)
Private Parts (1997) ***1/2 out of ***** - Cast: Howard Stern, Robin
Quivers, Mary McCormack, Fred Norris, Paul Giamatti, Gary Dell'Abate, Jackie
Martling, Carol Alt, David Letterman, many musician cameos. Written By: Len
Blum and Michael Kalesniko. Directed By: Betty Thomas. Running Time: 109
minutes.
Before I review this film I need to set a few things straight about my views
of Howard Stern. I have no views of Howard Stern. Now please, before you
Stern fans start sending me hate mail consisting of "YOU SUCK! STERN
RULES!", let me explain. I live in a town where Howard Stern's radio show is
not aired. My only exposure to the man is when I occasionally watch the 30
minute show of his on the E! network. And, just watching that show is not
sufficient enough to form an opinion of the man. The E! show represents, at
the most, 1/6th of his daily radio show. So please, understand that I have
no preconceived opinions about Howard Stern. I'm not a fan, and I'm not an
enemy. Let's continue...
"Private Parts" chronicles shock-jock Howard Stern's rise to fame and
fortune. The story begins as Stern recalls his childhood to airplane
seatmate Carol Alt. We see a few select scenes from Howard's childhood: His
early brushes with radio, and his days at an all-black high school, for
example. Then the main story begins: Howard Stern wants to be a disc jockey.
We see Howard working various radio jobs across the country, meeting his
future wife Alison (Mary McCormack), and assembling the team which he
currently employs. These scenes are certainly entertaining, but aren't
necessarily laugh out loud funny.
The hilarious scenes come later as Howard has moved to New York City to work
at WNBC radio. The network weasels who hired him without even knowing what
kind of show he did are shocked to discover the content of his radio show.
They attempt to censor him at every opportunity through an executive named
Kenny (Paul Giamatti), and these confrontations provide the best moments of
the film. I don't particularily think that Stern's radio persona is all that
funny, but when he's fighting the establishment it serves a purpose.
(Please, I liked the film, no "YOU SUCK! STERN RULES!" letters.)
There are some flaws in the film, mainly the interruptions in the story so
some naked woman or society freak can tell us that Howard is now in Detroit
or whereever. They don't fit the film and are an unwanted distraction. The
film ends abruptly and it feels like there's much more story to tell. I'll
be looking forward to a possible sequel to continue that story. Stern proves
himself to be a good actor, but the true test will come when he plays a
character other than himself. I'll be looking forward to that as well. [R]
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related
links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Clue (1985)
Cast: Eileen Brennan, Tim Curry, Madeline Kahn, Christopher Lloyd,
Michael McKean, Martin Mull, Lesley Ann Warren, Colleen Camp, Lee Ving,
Bill Henderson, Howard Hesseman 
Written by: John Landis and Jonathan Lynn 
Directed by: Jonathan Lynn 
Running Time: 96 minutes 
Clue is an unfairly ignored comedy, very similar to 1976's Murder by
Death.  This big screen version of the classic board game (what's
next... Chutes and Ladders:The Motion Picture?) is filled with slapstick
antics and silly dialogue.  The plot, for what it's worth, has all the
characters from the game (in this case, the names from the game are used
as aliases) meeting in an isolated mansion to confront Mr. Boddy (Lee
Ving), the man who's been blackmailing them all.  When he turns up dead,
everyone (including the audience) must figure out whodunnit... and in
what room, and with what object. 
While not as witty as Neil Simon's Murder By Death, Clue definitely has
it moments.  It has so many moments in fact that I use a lot of the
lines from the film when I'm joking around with my friends.  To this
day, whenever someone says the phrase "Well, to make a long story short"
I have the follow up phrase "Too late" ready to go.  The cast (all very
good comedic talents) play well off one another, while the late Madeline
Kahn (as the dark and sultry Mrs. White) sometimes steals the film away
from the rest.  And Colleen Camp, as the French maid Yvette, displays
some of her natural talents as well. 
Clue is available on DVD from Paramount Home Video.  It includes the
film in its original theatrical aspect ratio of 1.85:1 (and is enhanced
for 16x9 televisions) and features the original theatrical trailer.  A
French language audio track is also available. 
The trailer holds up well considering most previews from that time do
not, and it even includes a scene not in the film itself (a scene that
should have been in the film, as it's a good joke).  Also, the trailer
is scored to the music from Airplane!, which was an interesting choice. 
When Clue played in theaters, it ran with the gimmick of three different
endings.  If you wanted to see all three, you had to go to the movies
three separate times.  So when the film was released on home video,
rather than releasing three separate videos, all three endings were
included on one tape... the first two endings being "What If?" endings
and the third ending being the actual ending.  Now for the DVD release
you get two choices.  You can watch the film as it was presented on home
video or you can select to watch it with one of the three endings
randomly chosen for you.  (Note: there's an easter egg hidden in the
disc pertaining to this.  After watching the film with a randomly
selected ending, when you return to the menu screen you will be able to
highlight the large magnifying glass and select it.  When you do, a
secret menu opens, allowing you to watch any of the three endings by
themselves.) 
Now while I applaud the effort of Paramount here, as they clearly tried
to do something special with the disc, it just doesn't work well. 
First, why not give the VIEWER the choice of what ending we want to
watch?  Maybe someone like myself who's seen the movie hundreds of times
would like to sit down and show it to someone with the second ending
only.  I'm no technical DVD expert, but I can't imagine that being too
hard to accomplish.  Secondly, the delay between when the film itself
ends and one of the endings begins is too long and too obvious, thereby
becoming a distraction right when you definitely don't need a
distraction.  Finally, the back of the DVD case states "And now, with
this special DVD version, you can see all 3 surprise endings".  I have
no idea why they would word it that way, since that's not a special
feature in the slightest.  The video has been out for fifteen years now
(good lord, has it been that long?) and it's played on television with
all three endings all the time. 
These are merely minor complaints however, seeing that I've watched the
home video version hundreds of times and have no problem watching the
film as such on the DVD.  The picture and sound are wonderfully improved
over my worn out VHS copy, and I'm thrilled that Paramount agrees with
me that Clue is a film worthy of being preserved on this great digital
format. [PG]
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
AOL Instant Messenger: FilmJax
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Odd Couple, The (1968)
Cast: Jack Lemmon, Walter Matthau, John Fiedler, Herb Edelman, David
Sheiner, Larry Haines, Monica Evans, Carole Shelley 
Written by: Neil Simon 
Directed by: Gene Saks 
Running Time: 104 minutes 
"You leave little notes on my pillow.  I told you a million times I
can't stand little notes on my pillow.  'We are all out of Corn Flakes -
F.U.'  It took me three hours to figure out that 'F.U.' was Felix
Unger." 
   --- A frustrated Oscar Madison (Walter Matthau) running down a list
of his complaints against his roommate Felix Unger (Jack Lemmon), in The
Odd Couple. 
The classic Neil Simon comedy (based on his own stage play) about
suicidal Felix (Lemmon), who is persuaded by his poker friend Oscar
(Matthau) to stay with him in his apartment after Felix's wife throws
him out and files for divorce.  The hook: Oscar is messy and likes his
apartment that way, while Felix is an obsessive/compulsive neat freak. 
The two men, despite their friendship, instantly clash. 
Movies just aren't as delightfully funny as this one is.  Every line of
Neil Simon's dialogue flows like comedic poetry, and all the actors are
just perfect in their performances.  Lemmon is at his best as the
anxiety ridden Felix, but it's Matthau who shines brightest as Oscar,
whose world is being invaded and rearranged, mostly against his wishes
(the type of character I always enjoy identifying with).  And who can
forget that catchy score by Neal Hefti? 
The best thing about the film (and this is a testament to the quality of
the writing) is that it's a comedy with SUBSTANCE.  These two men, even
while at each other's throats, genuinely care for one another as
friends.  When they clash, it isn't cartoonish hatred being displayed,
but genuine frustration with the fact that they are such good friends
but just cannot manage to co-exist.  Movies nowadays, take Grumpy Old
Men for example, just don't have that extra spark there.  These days
it's just animosity for the sake of comedy. 
A television series followed (starring Jack Klugman and Tony Randall),
which I'll admit I've never seen an episode of in its entirety, and Neil
Simon even scripted the sequel, The Odd Couple II, which was released in
1998.  Neither of them compare to this comic masterpiece though.  It's
one of the best comedies of all time and easily earns its spot in my top
ten favorite films. 
Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
AOL Instant Messenger: FilmJax
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Jawbreaker (1999)
Cast: Rose McGowan, Rebecca Gayheart, Julie Benz, Judy Greer, William
Katt, Jeff Conaway,
Carol Kane, Pam Grier, Marilyn Manson
Written and Directed by: Darren Stein
Running Time: 87 minutes
Three of Reagan High School's elite females kidnap their friend on her
birthday (more specifically, they break into her room as she's
sleeping, stuff a jawbreaker in her mouth, cover her mouth with tape,
tie her up, and throw her in the trunk of their car.  Not
surprisingly, she ends up choking to death on the jawbreaker.  Time
for comedy!
One of the girls in the clique expresses concern over the death of
their friend and what they've done to cause it, so the other two
quickly oust her from the group and alienate her at school.  Then,
after another girl overhears them confess to killing their friend, in
exchange for her silence they give her a makeover and invite her to
join their group.  This is pretty much all that happens in Jawbreaker.
The film's opening three minutes or so which set the film in motion
are the only noteworthy events here.  None of the lead characters are
interesting in the slightest, and the supporting cast (who would have
been interesting) is wasted beyond belief.  Pam Grier is on hand to
play a gritty police detective investigating the murder case, but
ultimately she has absolutely no bearing on anything.  William Katt
(TV's The Greatest American Hero, House) plays the father of the dead
girl, and he has all of about three seconds of screen time.  Honestly,
do you still get paid if you just wander into a movie and not say a
word?
The only moment in the film that even remotely made me smile lasts
about one minute.  It involves Jeff Conaway as the father of one of
the girls, who tries to bond with his snotty daughter by recalling how
she used to listen to Tiffany records.
Believe me, I'm all for a well done dark comedy.  But Jawbreaker makes
no attempts at humor whatsoever, dark or otherwise (unless you count
cartoony sound effects which are included in many of the film's
scenes).  It's just up there on the screen.  You'd like to think that
you don't know exactly where the film is going, but you will, trust
me.  You'll be hoping that at some point, maybe the film will get
intelligent, maybe do something different, maybe have someone turn the
tables on these uppity girls.  But that won't be happening until the
film's finale, which is an abrupt, contrived, ridiculous mess.
Basically, Jawbreaker is Heathers '99.  All I could think about as I
watched this film were things I liked about Heathers.  And I hated
Heathers.  So what does that tell you?  [R]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email:chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted
without permission.

Title
Review for Being There (1979)
Being There (1979) **** out of ***** - Cast: Peter Sellers, Shirley
MacLaine, Melvyn Douglas, Jack Warden, Richard Dysart, Richard Basehart,
James Noble. Written by: Jerzy Kosinski. Directed by: Hal Ashby. Running
Time: 124 minutes.
Peter Sellers tried to get "Being There" made for eight years, and I'm very
glad he succeeded. He plays a childlike gardener named Chance whose only
knowledge about life is from what he sees on television. When his father
dies, he is forced to leave his home for the very first time in his life. He
proceeds to get into situations where people keep thinking he's brilliant,
even though he is saying very little about anything except gardening.
I must admit that I do not understand the final shot of the film. Something
odd happens which I think I understand, but I could be wrong. And even if
I'm right, it doesn't make much sense.
One thing that bothered me while watching the film (and though it did bother
me, it did not have any bearing on the film's rating) was watching Melvyn
Douglas' performance. He won the Best Supporting Actor Oscar that year OVER
Robert Duvall from "Apocalypse Now" which I feel is a travesty. Douglas is
ok in the film, but he's just a dying old man. Nothing special. But like I
said, it didn't influence my opinion of the film. I just wanted to voice
that opinion that Duvall was robbed.
Sellers, who's health was failing at the time of the film, desperately
wanted to win the Best Actor Oscar which he had lost in 1964 for Dr.
Strangelove. He came very close. He did win the Golden Globe award, but lost
the Oscar to Dustin Hoffman.
As brilliant as he was as the bumbling Inspector Clouseau and in "Dr.
Strangelove", "Being There" is his greatest performance on film. Just in the
very first minute, before he even says a word, you can see in his eyes that
this character has the mentality of a child. Many who worked on the film and
who worked with Sellers in the past said that Sellers was very similar in
real life to Chance, which makes his final great performance even more
touching.
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related
links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for League of Their Own, A (1992)
A League of Their Own (1992) **1/2 out of ***** - Cast: Tom Hanks, Geena
Davis, Madonna, Jon Lovitz, Rosie O'Donnell, Lori Petty, David Strathairn,
Garry Marshall, Tea Leoni, Bill Pullman.  Directed By: Penny Marshall.
Running Time: 128 minutes.
Another example of a critical hit that just isn't that good. Hanks plays a
drunken ex-baseball star who is given a job as the manager of one of the
all-girls baseball teams developed during World War II.
The movie is basically about two baseball-playing sisters (Davis and
Petty) who love each other but Petty also hates Davis because Davis is a
big star and is stealing the spotlight away from Petty. So Petty bitches
and whines and breaks things throughout the entire film and then ends up
victorious in the end. What?
Whining and complaining brings about glory and victory?
Another problem with the film is that Davis is given too much screen time
and the rest of the cast is neglected. Hanks and Lovitz are outstanding, but
given little to do. In the beginning of the film, a big deal is made about a
plain-looking girl who can play the game really well. Then you really don't
see her again. And then there's another girl who can't read. So you're
thinking that during the film there should be some minor yet heartwarming
scenes about teaching her to read, right? No, just one joke involving
Madonna and a sex novel.
And how about that Madonna huh? She's finally found a role that she can play
without difficulty. She's a slut. But, she's a slut with a heart! Throughout
the film she keeps mentioning all the things she does with men. Then when
the players are told that there will not be another season of women's
baseball, she starts to cry hysterically saying that she won't go back to
dancing in front of men. Then in the next scene she's off to town to pick up
guys. Huh? It's ok to sleep with as many as possible but degrading to get
paid just to dance for them?
Given all the talent involved with the film, it's a shame that it's simply
mediocre at best.
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related
links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Naked in New York (1994)
Naked in New York (1994) **1/2 out of ***** - Cast: Eric Stoltz, Mary-Louise
Parker, Ralph Macchio, Kathleen Turner, Tony Curtis, Timothy Dalton, Jill
Clayburgh, Whoopi Goldberg, Griffin Dunne, Chris Noth. Directed By: Dan
Algrant. Running Time: 91 minutes.
"Naked in New York" tells an all too familiar story about trying to maintain
a relationship while trying to maintain a career, and deciding overall which
is more important. Well, it attempts to tell that story.
Eric Stoltz plays an aspiring writer who meets photographer Mary-Louise
Parker while in college. They move in together and everything seems fine.
Then, after a while, Stoltz gets an offer to have one of his plays produced,
but in New York City. At the same time, Parker also gets an opportunity to
further her photography career. He moves out to New York, and their only
communication is the occasional phone call.
The film then shifts gears (meaning: it doesn't know what it wants to be) as
Stoltz tries to get his play ready to premiere. His producer (Tony Curtis)
has faith in him, but various problems slow his efforts. Late in the film
there's some needless full frontal Eric Stoltz, part of a dream sequence
which seemingly served no purpose except to justify the film's title. Whoopi
Goldberg plays a concrete face in a wall, and really, that's the best way I
can describe it.
The film was entertaining enough to get a good rating, until it ends with a
"non-ending" where nothing is resolved. Its message is that no matter what
happens to you in life, everything will turn out okay in the end. What
fantasy land does this screenwriter live in? Martin Scorsese served as
executive producer. [R]
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related
links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for High School High (1996)
High School High (1996) ** out of ***** - Cast: Jon Lovitz, Tia Carrere,
Mekhi Phifer, Louise Fletcher. Written by: Robert LoCash, Pat Proft and
David Zucker. Directed by: Hart Bochner. Running Time: 84 minutes.
"Spoof" movies are a difficult genre of film. In a given year there may be
one released, sometimes two. There have been many great ones: The two
"Airplane" films, "Top Secret", the two "Hot Shots" movies, and "The Naked
Gun" trilogy. There have also been many dreadful ones: "Spy Hard",
"Repossessed", and almost all of Mel Brooks' films. What the good ones have
in common is in some way the participation of Jim Abrahams, Pat Proft, and
Jerry and David Zucker. When they are involved in a spoof film, its usually
guaranteed that a great deal of time has gone into the script, cramming it
with as many jokes as possible, and sometimes with more jokes than possible.
Well, despite the presence of Pat Proft and David Zucker in the film's
credits, "High School High" just isn't funny. With the good films of the
genre, there will usually be about 85 minutes of comedy in the film's 90
minute running time. With "High School High", there's maybe 5 minutes of
total comedy.
Jon Lovitz' comedic talents are wasted in this spoof of such films as
"Dangerous Minds", "The Substitute", "Lean on Me" and "The Blackboard
Jungle". He plays a naive school teacher who gets assigned to a run down,
criminal-infested school (Marion Berry High, the film's best joke) and
thinks he can make a difference in these kids lives. Fine, good so far. My
problem here is that there are so many targets available for ridicule here,
and NONE of which are capitalized upon. For example, no matter what your
views of "Ebonics" are, you just can't deny that it's a made-up language.
It's ridiculous. So why not make some jokes about it? Not here. Also, the
soundtrack of the film is comprised of real rap songs. Why not make up some
ridiculous rap songs? What struck me is that after about the first 15
minutes, the filmmakers actually started to try and make a SERIOUS movie.
Granted the tone is comical, but there's just so much plot here, and the
filmmakers ACTUALLY want us to care about it and the characters.
Late in the film there's actually a quick parody of a scene from "The Deer
Hunter", which angered me because 1) hardly anyone watching the film will
get the joke, and B) it's not even done well! Come on guys, if all of a
sudden you're going to do that sort of thing, you had better do a good job
with it.
A trend I've noticed in the genre since "The Naked Gun 2 1/2" is that makers
of spoof movies have started to create moments of silence in order to give
people a moment to laugh without missing anything. It's generally done by a
character saying the joke, then cutting to another character who tilts their
head like a dog hearing a high-pitch noise and then makes a puzzled face. It
happens about 300 times in "High School High" and it couldn't be more
annoying. And if you sit through this entire film you'll most likely come
away with a puzzled face as well. [PG-13]
--Chuck Dowling  
--Chuck's Movie Reviews -- http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/

Title
Review for Craft, The (1996)
The Craft (1996) * out of ***** - Cast: Robin Tunney, Fairuza Balk, Neve
Campbell, Rachel True, Cliff De Young.  Directed By: Andrew Fleming.
Running Time: 100 minutes.
Director and co-writer Andrew Fleming is steadily becoming my least
favorite filmmaker.  He made 1988's "Bad Dreams", a horrible rip-off of the
"Nightmare on Elm Street" series.  Then in 1993 he made "Threesome", a very
disgusting film about three college roommates who all end up sleeping
together at the same time.  Now he gives us "The Crap", I mean, "The
Craft".  Actually, there's not much difference.
"The Craft" is all about four freaks, I mean, witches, who live in Los
Angeles.  Say, what better location for witches?  They all attend the same
catholic high school which, of course, is populated with the meanest kids
in the world.  The witches use their witchy powers to take revenge on the
racist girl, the womanizing jock, and to make themselves pretty (actually,
just brushing their hair and taking a shower would have made them pretty).
But, as stories about power go, things tend to get out of hand.  The head
witch Nancy (a scary looking Fairuza Balk) starts to go mad after being
struck by lightning while chanting at the beach.  (Wouldn't you?) She wants
to fly around and kill people, but the good witch Sarah doesn't want any
part of it and leaves the group.  Well, let me tell you that you don't
leave a group of witches, it's
like the mob.  Soon the remaining three witches are casting spells on Sarah
and in the final scenes are trying to kill her.  At this point, who cares?
The last 10 minutes features about a million bugs and snakes, which I
always believe is a ridiculous thing to put into a movie because about 90%
of the audience will turn away from the screen rather than look at bugs.
So making the climax of the film
all about bugs and snakes certainly is brilliant filmmaking.
"The Craft" is obvious from start to finish, with no depth into anything.
It's not even a good "revenge" flick, as the supposed "good" characters are
so stupid and unlikable that you really have no one to root for.  And I
don't blame Andrew Fleming entirely, because I don't think anyone could
have made a good film out of the script.  It's just not a worthwhile story.
[R]
--Chuck Dowling  
--Chuck's Movie Reviews -- http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/

Title
Review for Absolute Power (1997)
Absolute Power (1997) * out of ***** - Cast:Clint Eastwood, Gene Hackman, Ed
Harris, Scott Glenn, Judy Davis, E.G. Marshall, Laura Linney. Writer:William
Goldman. Director:Clint Eastwood.
In 1992, Clint Eastwood won a Best Director Oscar for his excellent western
"Unforgiven". The next year he followed that up by directing the equally
excellent "A Perfect World". In 1995 he received great acclaim for directing
"The Bridges of Madison County". Something has happened to Clint Eastwood.
Something bad.
"Absolute Power" is an absolute mess. The film opens with two very pointless
scenes, and then dives into the story. It seems that Eastwood is a burglar
and one night he decides to break into the house of a millionaire
(Marshall). While in the vault of the house, a drunken couple enters the
room. Eastwood is able to hide in the vault, and luckily it has a two-way
mirror so that he can see everything going on. As it turns out, the two
people are the millionaire's wife, and the President of the United States
(Hackman). As they play around with each other, the film keeps cutting to
Eastwood every three seconds so he can look disgusted. We must see this
reaction 75 times during the scene. The President then decides he's going to
slap the girl around, and then turns into a raving psychotic. He tries to
kill the girl (this is the President of the United States folks) and during
the struggle the secret service breaks into the room and kills the girl.
Eastwood now must decide whether or not to run or to try and bring down the
President of the United States.
Eastwood is also supposed to be a "master of disguises". His brilliant
disguises consist of a hat and jacket, sometimes a fake mustache. Amazingly,
even though he just looks like Clint Eastwood with a hat on, he is able to
fool people who are just 10 feet away.
Eastwood has used the same composer for his films since the mid-80s, a
person by the name of Lennie Niehaus, who is absolutely terrible. However,
in "Unforgiven", "A Perfect World", and here again in "Absolute Power"
there's about 5 minutes of really good score. Each and every time, Clint
Eastwood has composed that score himself. So why can't he do the entire
film? He obviously knows what good score is. Why he lets Niehaus compose a
boring score for each movie he makes is beyond me.
There is one decent scene in the film. It's when the cop assigned to the
case (Harris) goes to talk to Eastwood about his possible connection with
the crime. It's a very simple scene, it's just two men talking. But the two
stars seem to play off of each other well and I was hoping for more
interaction between their two characters.
The resolution of the events in the film is both unsatisfying and unclear.
But the main problem with the whole premise is that the villain of the film
is the President of the United States. It's absurd. Another problem is that
the President, being an insane psychopath, should be the main focus of the
film. He's not. Hackman is in the film for maybe 15 minutes, most of that
being the scene where he's trying to rape and kill the girl. I hope Hackman
got paid a lot of money for his cameo appearance. It's also equally absurd
that we are supposed to be rooting for Eastwood, who is also a criminal. But
I guess since he's not a violent criminal then that makes it ok.
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office
reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for Stuart Little (1999)
Cast: Geena Davis, Hugh Laurie, Jonathan Lipnicki, Jeffrey Jones, Brian
Doyle-Murray, Estelle Getty, Julia Sweeney, Dabney Coleman, Allyce
Beasley, Harold Gould, Jon Polito, Jim Doughan 
Featuring the Voices of: Michael J. Fox, Nathan Lane, Chazz Palminteri,
Steve Zahn, Jim Doughan, David Alan Grier, Bruno Kirby, Jennifer Tilly 
Written by: M. Night Shyamalan and Greg Brooker 
Directed by: Rob Minkoff 
Running Time: 85 minutes 
George Little (Jonathan Lipnicki) wants a little brother.  After Mr. and
Mrs. Little (Hugh Laurie and Geena Davis) visit the orphange, they
decide to adopt Stuart, a talking mouse (voiced by Michael J. Fox). 
George isn't so fond of his new brother when Stuart arrives at the
Little house, and neither is Snowbell the family cat (voiced by Nathan
Lane).  George and Stuart eventually bond while preparing for a remote
control boat race, but Snowbell wants Stuart out of the house (he's
unable to live with the taunts of other neighborhood felines saying it's
ridiculous that a mouse has a pet cat). 
Stuart Little is a mix of live action and computer generated imagery
(CGI).  The character of Stuart, while obviously a computer generated
image, grows on you as the film progresses and you'll soon see him as
much more than a mere special effect.  There is also a great deal of
animal training involved with this film, as many of the "supporting
cast" are actual cats (with computer animated mouths so they can
speak).  It's fascinating to watch these cats give performances without
an actual mouse to interact with. 
Stuart Little is a charming family film.  There are some great laughs in
the movie (with a script co-written by The Sixth Sense's M. Night
Shyamalan no less!), some moments that can only be described as "too
cute" (the boat race sequence is what won me over) and even the majority
of the one-liners (common nowadays in children's films or films
featuring Nathan Lane) are tolerable.  Kids and parents will love this
one. 
Stuart Little is available on DVD from Columbia Tristar Home Video. 
There are two different DVDs on sale: one contains the film in full
frame, and the other presents the film in its original theatrical aspect
ratio of 1.66:1.  Both versions feature choices of either Dolby Surround
or Dolby Digital 5.1 audio.  Both versions also contain the following
extras (and hang in there with me here... there's a lot of them): a full
length audio commentary track by director Rob Minkoff and animation
supervisor Henry Anderson, a full length audio commentary track by the
visual effects supervisors, an isolated score track, an interactive
trivia game, an interactive featurette that goes step by step through
eight of the effects in the film, a making of documentary that
originally aried on HBO, and a Stuart Little read-along story (which you
can read yourself or have Stuart read for you).  
There are also three music videos, and six theatrical trailers (called
TheCATrical Trailers... get it?  It's funny!) for Stuart Little and five
other Columbia Tristar releases: The Adventures of Elmo in Grouchland,
Madeline, The Nuttiest Nutcracker, Muppets From Space, and Baby Geniuses
(the only bad thing about this entire DVD... I did not want to be
reminded of the awfulness that is Baby Geniuses).  DVD-ROM features are
also on the disc, including web links and a demo of the Stuart Little
CD-ROM game. 
But wait... there's still more!  There's a section called "Basement
Treasures" where you will find the auditions of the film's animators,
six deleted scenes which you can select to view with or without
commentary from the director, a visual effects gag reel, a production
gag reel, and an incredible eight minute storyboard sequence detailing
the original concept for the boat race scene (with commentary from the
director). 
The first commentary track features director Rob Minkoff and animation
supervisor Henry Anderson.  They give insightful and detailed thoughts
about the film's production.  Minkoff likes to point out scenes where
other screenwriters came in and polished up the script, namely writers
like Scott Alexander and Larry Karaszewski (who wrote The People vs.
Larry Flynt and Ed Wood) and Lowell Ganz and Babaloo Mandel (who wrote
Splash and Multiplicity, among others).  Anderson is very appreciative
of the animators who worked with him and often points out which
animator worked on each scene as they occur.  The second commentary
track features visual effects supervisors John Dykstra and Jerome Chen
who discuss more specific details of the effects in the film.  Movie
fans will enjoy the informative first commentary track, serious
animation buffs will love the second one. 
Now I know this is slightly off topic, but it is related specifically to
this DVD so I must voice this now.  One of the music videos on the disc
is for a song called "I Need To Know" by a group called R Angels.  This
video features four mid-teenage girls (the singers obviously) having a
slumber party.  The girls ask a Ouija board "I need to know... who to
do, who to do, who to do" as the song begins.  They then sneak out of
their house, and along the way they strike a pose and their slumber
party pajamas are magically transformed into middle class streetwalker
outfits.  Then they head to a party and dance suggestively with the guys
while singing lyrics like "I'll be your pleasure all the time... just
say the words that you'll be mine".  Um... what the hell?  What does
this have to do with Stuart Little?  How is this in any way a song
suitable for a kids movie, let alone a video suitable for a kids movie
on DVD?  When the video concludes, the words "to be continued" appear. 
Oh I can't wait to see who they've slept with when the Toy Story 2 DVD
comes out. 
Kids won't care about most of the special features on this DVD, but
those of us who can sometimes be turned into a "kid at heart" thanks to
a winning family film sure appreciate them.  This is the way to do DVD,
a good movie LOADED with great features at a reasonable cost.  The
Di$ney people could learn a lot from Columbia Tristar. 
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Desperate Measures (1998)
DESPERATE MEASURES (1998)
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling
Copyright 1998 - The Jacksonville Film Journal
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
"Desperate Measures" was something I was excited about seeing back when it
was originally scheduled to be released: Summer '97. For some reason, it was
delayed until Hollywood's traditional dumping ground: January. Now that it's
out, I see no real reason for that delay, as it's a simple yet highly
entertaining film.
Michael Keaton stars as a maniacial murderer who's bone marrow can save the
life of the dying son of a San Francisco police detective (Garcia). Keaton
agrees to the transplant, only so he can attempt escape. He succeeds, in a
plan that of course could only work in the movies. The police force is now
trying to kill Keaton, while Garcia is working against them trying to keep
Keaton alive in order to save his son.
The film definately has it's flaws. The plot is strictly TV Movie of the
Week fare, but the acting and direction certainly boost it far above that
status. Also, after Keaton's escape, Garcia's captain barks at him "How many
men have to die to save your kid's life?" which the film treats as such an
evil and insignificant remark. The thing is, it's a vaild point. How many
people have to be needlessly crippled, burned, and killed just to save this
one child? What's the greater good here? Many lives or one life? If movies
really had guts nowadays, I would have loved to have seen this movie come
down to a final choice for Garcia's character. Place him in a situation
where he knows that he has to kill Keaton because Keaton is about to kill
someone else. Alas, movies these days generally have no such ambition to
pull the audience's strings in ways which might make the uncomfortable.
Despite a few silly moments (and one or two really stupid ones), the good
things about "Desperate Measures" outnumber the bad. The main highlight
would be Keaton's performance. The character could have easily been an
overacting, scene chewing freak, but Keaton underplays it nicely. He's not
as menacing as he was in "Pacific Heights" or even as menacing as he was in
"Batman" (yes kids, Batman used to be a dark character), but you certainly
get the idea that he's evil. Even the final scene of the film, which
normally I would just hate, seems strangely appropriate for this film. So
much so that I didn't mind it in the slightest. And another bonus: the film
takes place in San Francisco, which usually means a car chase on those hills
that you've seen a billion times before. And for a moment, it looked as
though it was about to happen. But it doesn't, and THAT'S creative. [R]

Title
Review for U.S. Marshals (1998)
Cast: Tommy Lee Jones, Wesley Snipes, Robert Downey Jr., Joe Pantoliano,
Kate Nelligan, Irene Jacob
Written by: John Pogue
Directed by: Stuart Baird
Running Time: 133 minutes
Stuart Baird, director of the vastly underrated Executive Decision,
directs the sequel to 1993's The Fugitive. Tommy Lee Jones returns as
Lt. Sam Gerard (and his entire supporting cast returns as well) to
chase another innocent fugitive, played by Wesley Snipes. Snipes plays
an ex-government agent who has been set-up for murder by corrupt
government agents (ooo, shocking) and once again Gerard must chase
after him.
U.S. Marshals is nowhere near as good as The Fugitive thanks to it's
overused and predictable story. I mean, a government conspiracy? You
mean there may be some corruption in government?? Also, all attempts
to outdo the first film fall completely flat. For example, the train
wreck and waterfall jump from the first film are superior in every way
to the plane crash and building jump in this one. And despite the fact
that we're told that Snipes is innocent, his character just isn't very
compelling. Several times he is attempting to kill members of Gerard's
team, including Gerard himself. Harrison Ford's character was never
shooting at anyone. We're supposed to like this guy, and he's trying
to kill the other people we're supposed to like as well.
The film certainly isn't dull, but you've seen all of it before. The
direction is good and the acting is fine, it's just the story that
fails.  Also, the dialogue between Gerard and his team, which seemed
so credible in the first film, seems so forced and phony here. If
anything, U.S. Marshals will remain memorable to me thanks to Tommy
Lee Jones' initial appearance, dressed as a giant chicken. It's
definitely a sight to see, and the whole scene is just about worth the
price of admission. [PG-13]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL: http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email: chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1995-1998 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be
reprinted without permission.

Title
Review for Taking of Pelham One Two Three, The (1974)
The Taking of Pelham One Two Three (1974)
Rating: 5.0 stars out of 5.0 stars
Cast: Walter Matthau, Robert Shaw, Martin Balsam, Hector Elizondo, Earl
Hindeman, James Broderick, Dick O'Neill, Jerry Stiller, Kenneth
McMillan, Tony Roberts 
Written by: Peter Stone 
Based on the novel by: John Godey 
Directed by: Joseph Sargent 
Running Time: 104 minutes 
This early precursor to Die Hard stars Walter Matthau (that's right,
he's the Bruce Willis character) as the transit chief of security for
the New York subway system,  who must contend with a group of terrorists
(led by Robert Shaw, in a ruthless performance) who have hijacked a
subway train.  The hijacking essentially shuts down the entire subway
system, and Shaw demands one million dollars to release the train and
his hostages.  If his demands are not met, one hostage will be killed
every minute. 
Filled with tense situations and some very funny dialogue, The Taking of
Pelham One Two Three is one of the best films of the 70s.  The thing
is... you ask anyone about this movie and no one has ever heard of it! 
Matthau gets the best lines as the frumpy, worn down transit chief...
although everyone in the film has a darkly comedic foul attitude that
makes for some great dialogue conversations (much like how all the
characters in Conspiracy Theory were on edge about something or other). 
In addition to Matthau and Shaw, the rest of the superb cast is filled
out with familiar faces from the 70s.  Also the film has one of those
ridiculously catchy 70s scores, making the soundtrack album a must own. 
The Taking of Pelham One Two Three is available on DVD from MGM Home
Entertainment.  The disc contains the film in its original theatrical
aspect ratio of 2.35:1 and features the original theatrical trailer. 
Also included with the disc itself is a color booklet featuring
materials from the original press kit.  Only fault I have with this DVD
package: the running time listed on the disc and on the case says 124
minutes... why are studios always getting this wrong?  Other than that I
have no REAL complaints, as this is a great DVD release of a great
forgotten movie. [R]
Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
AOL Instant Messenger: FilmJax
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for From Dusk Till Dawn (1996)
>From Dusk Till Dawn (1996) ****1/2 out of ***** - Cast: Harvey Keitel,
George Clooney, Quentin Tarantino, Juliette Lewis, Fred Williamson, Cheech
Marin, Salma Hayek, Michael Parks, John Saxon, Kelly Preston, Tom Savini.
Written by Quentin Tarantino. Directed by: Robert Rodriguez. Running Time:
110 minutes.
Screenwriter/co-star Tarantino and director Robert Rodriguez instantly
rebound from the overall pathetic "Four Rooms" to bring us an extremely
entertaining horror film. This is exactly what movies should be, fun from
start to finish.
Clooney and Tarantino are the Gecko brothers, who happen to be bank robbers
and murderers. They head down to Mexico after a heist and along the way
kidnap Keitel and his kids. They end up in a bar in Mexico which just so
happens to be populated by vampires and from there, Evil Dead/Dawn of the
Dead-ish mayhem begins. The film opens with one of the coolest scenes in
recent years and stays constant throughout. The character Michael Parks
plays in that opening scene is so interesting, you'll wish he was in the
film more. Great dialog, fun action sequences, and excellent acting from a
great cast, including Tarantino, who is often taking hits on his acting
ability (sometimes justifiable hits). This is his best performance on film.
Williamson spoofs his characters from just about every movie he's ever been
in as the tough ex-Vietnam vet, and make-up artist Savini seems to be
playing the exact same character he portrayed in "Dawn of the Dead". [R]
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related
links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Gone in Sixty Seconds (2000)
Cast: Nicolas Cage, Giovanni Ribisi, Angelina Jolie, Robert Duvall, T.J.
Cross, William Lee Scott, Scott Caan, James Duval, Will Patton, Delroy
Lindo, Timothy Olyphant, Chi McBride, Christopher Eccleston, Vinnie
Jones, Grace Zabriskie, Arye Gross 
Written by: Scott Rosenberg 
Directed by: Dominic Sena 
Running Time: 117 minutes 
Screening Theater: Starnet Pablo 9 Theaters - Jacksonville Beach, FL 
Director Dominic Sena (who made the highly underrated Kalifornia) and
producer Jerry Bruckheimer (The Rock, Armageddon) bring us a slick and
entertaining remake of the 1974 film of the same name that absolutely no
one has ever seen.  
Nicolas Cage plays Memphis, a retired car thief who's "pulled back in"
to the business by an evil car thief overlord (Christopher Eccleston)
determined to kill Memphis' kid brother (Giovanni Ribisi).  Memphis is
ordered to steal 50 cars in four days time or his brother will meet an
unfortunate demise, all while having to elude the detectives hot on his
trail and a rival car thief who feels the job should have been given to
him and his gang.  Memphis sets out to put his old crew back together,
but discovers that most of them have retired as well. 
Gone in Sixty Seconds does things right from the opening credits.  In
that sequence, we get a rockin' little tune from Moby, along with some
simple back story told only with photographs and assorted objects. 
Filmmakers can sometimes make or break a film just from its opening
title sequence, and this one easily gets you in the mindset for an
entertaining ride.  And what follows doesn't disappoint... 
Cage turns in one of his good performances here (he can easily go either
way... good or bad... I don't know how he does that), and his mannerisms
and dialogue delivery carry the film along nicely.  Of the supporting
cast members, Angelina Jolie as Memphis' former love is in the film just
to provide eye candy (she's definitely the hottest looking grease monkey
I've ever seen) and Robert Duvall as Memphis' former mentor is just
around to lend the film some class.  Also, I'm a big fan of Will Patton
(Armageddon, The Postman) and would love to see him get a huge role
someday.  None of these three performers are given much to do
unfortunately. 
Some underrated performers however are given meaty supporting roles. 
Delroy Lindo (Get Shorty) shines as the exasperated detective in pursuit
of Memphis, as does Timothy Olyphant (Go) as Lindo's partner.  I just
wish some of the other characters could have been as important. 
The only real gripe I have about the film though is its conclusion...
mainly because you know how it will end before the opening credits even
roll.  There's no doubt in anyone's mind that the 50 cars will be
successfully stolen, and the filmmakers blew a perfectly good
opportunity to add some suspense to the picture by using the "rival car
thief" plot line.  As it stands, that story line is wrapped up about
halfway through the film in a tidy little package.  But if I was making
this film, I'd have had the rival gang trying to get to the cars before
Memphis and his crew, thereby making Memphis have to improvise...
thereby adding some meat to the plot. 
The finale is essentially just a big car chase, and there just aren't
ways to make car chases interesting anymore.  It's all been done.  The
chase is also shot and edited in that "Jerry Bruckheimer Action
Sequence" kind of way that leaves the audience wondering what
specifically is going on in the scene.  Sure it's a car chase, but what
exactly are the particulars of it?  It's very hard to tell.  Finally,
there's a stunt during this scene that comes close to challenging the
"bus jumping the ramp" sequence from Speed in the "Oh, I don't think
so..." department. 
Despite those minor complaints, Gone in Sixty Seconds is pure summer
movie entertainment.  It's not thought provoking, but it's shiny, loud
and fun... just what a summer flick should be.  [PG-13]
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
AOL Instant Messenger: FilmJax
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Nightmare on Elm Street, A (1984)
Cast: John Saxon, Ronee Blakley, Heather Langenkamp, Robert Englund,
Amanda Wyss, Nick Corri, Johnny Depp,
Charles Fleischer, Lin Shaye, Mimi Craven
Written and Directed by: Wes Craven
Running Time: 91 minutes
My first exposure to the Nightmare on Elm Street series of films was
not this one, but in fact the third installment (it was the first to
gain a national theatrical release).  I didn't see the first film
until much later.  So looking back, the original didn't hold a lot of
great memories for me, since I didn't think too much of it when I
initially saw it.  Watching it now for a second time confirmed that
it's an overrated horror film that ultimately makes no sense
whatsoever.
You all know the story by now: child murderer Freddy Krueger (Robert
Englund) returns from the grave by haunting the dreams of the children
of those who burned him alive years before.  This first installment
does an adequate job with it's low budget, but there's some absurd
dialogue and conceptual problems with the story.  Plus the movie's
ending (understandably the result of the studio wanting the end of the
film to have a "hook" for a sequel) renders the rest of the film
pointless.  And does anyone understand what happens to Nancy's mother
at the end of this film?
Don't get me wrong though... it's not as if a new generation of horror
films have spurned me away from the classics.  Most horror movies
released today are just as inane as this film is.  Horror is a
difficult genre to pull off credibly, and A Nightmare on Elm Street
just doesn't cut it.
A Nightmare on Elm Street is available on DVD from New Line Home
Video.  It is available both as a single disc and as part of the
Nightmare on Elm Street Collection box set.  The film is presented in
both pan and scan and it's original theatrical aspect ratio of 1.78:1
(although on the disc that comes in the box set, only a widescreen
transfer is provided).  The film has been digitally remastered and
includes two options for audio: a mono mix and a new Dolby Digital 5.1
mix.  Also included on the DVD is a full-length audio commentary track
with writer/director Wes Craven, stars John Saxon and Heather
Langenkamp, and the film's director of photography.  Other extras
include the "Jump to a Nightmare" feature (I'm sure you can figure
that one out), the usual cast and crew bios (which are from the film's
original press release kit, and notably leave out Robert Englund and
Johnny Depp!), and the film's original theatrical trailer.  Some
DVD-ROM features are also included, but since I don't have DVD-ROM
capabilities I can't really get into that.
The commentary track is entertaining and informative, but nothing
spectacular.  The first thing of note is that it's the same commentary
track that was on the special edition laserdisc from a few years ago.
I'm not saying that's a negative thing, just pointing it out.
Everyone seems enthusiastic about being there, with the possible
exception of John Saxon, who just doesn't say much at all.  Most of
the time you'll forget he's even there.  Everyone else talks really
quietly though for some reason, as if because they're commenting on a
scary movie that they need to stay as quiet as possible.
The bonus disc with the boxed set called The Nightmare Series
Encyclopedia features about 45 minutes worth of interviews relating to
the first film of the series.  Also included is the original
theatrical trailer and two alternate endings to the film... however
you can only access one easily.  The other is hidden in what's called
"the labyrinth", which might possibly be the most annoying feature of
a DVD ever created.  Basically, it's an interactive game of sorts
where you wander through different Nightmare locations looking at
objects which give you access to extra little snippets of footage,
interviews, etc.  Somewhere in the labyrinth is the second alternate
ending to the film.  Finding it though is both a chore and a bore.
[R]
The Jacksonville Film Journal
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email:chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted
without permission.

Title
Review for What Planet Are You From? (2000)
See this review the way it was meant to be seen at:
http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/
Cast: Garry Shandling, Annette Bening, Greg Kinnear, Ben Kingsley, Linda
Fiorentino, John Goodman, Judy Greer, Nora Dunn, Camryn Manheim, Ann
Cusack 
Written by: Garry Shandling, Michael Leeson, Ed Solomon and Peter Tolan 
Directed by: Mike Nichols 
Running Time: 104 minutes 
Garry Shandling makes his long overdue starring film debut as an alien
from a planet populated only by genetically created men, who are looking
to take over the Earth by propagating their own species there. 
Shandling is chosen for the mission, is given the name Harold Anderson,
and is set up as a banker in Seattle.  After a few disastrous "mating"
attempts, he figures his best bet will be Susan (Annette Bening), a
former alcoholic who eventually tells Harold that she won't have sex
again until she gets married.  The leader of Harold's planet (Ben
Kingsley) tells him to marry her, and Harold is soon exposed to all the
"joys" of married life. 
Despite its title and premise which seem to imply that this is some
Jerry Lewis vehicle from the late 1960s, What Planet Are You From? is a
very funny movie.  The plot (which the film wisely doesn't linger on the
specifics of for too long) is of course nothing more than framework for
the jokes, most of which work very well.  The material may be considered
crude and tasteless by many, and I might have thought so as well had
Shandling not been the lead.  But he brings a sort of pathetic charm to
the role, and it's his performance that makes the film truly funny
instead of just offensive. 
Plus if you think about it, What Planet Are You From? could have VERY
easily gone the gross-out route (considering that Shandling's character
is given a detachable penis that vibrates and hums when he gets
excited).  We never SEE anything though, it's all implied, which gives
the film a touch of class amidst its crudeness.  I'm glad to see that
someone in Hollywood still understands the concept of "less is more". 
The talented supporting cast certainly adds to one's enjoyment of this
film.  Annette Bening (oddly playing a merged version of her real estate
salesman character from American Beauty and her ditzy spiritualist
character from Mars Attacks!) does a fine job keeping up with Shandling
and makes a good catalyst for his brand of humor.  She even manages to
pull off a potentially disastrous scene where she has to perform a
rather goofy rendition of "High Hopes" for a lengthy period of time. 
Ben Kingsley, John Goodman and Greg Kinnear all fare well in their
performances as well, and Linda Fiorentino... good lord, there should be
some sort of law stating that no woman can be THAT sexy.  Everything
about her character in this film oozes raw sexuality. 
What Planet Are You From? is available on DVD from Columbia TriStar Home
Video.  The disc gives you the choice of either watching the film full
frame or in its original theatrical aspect ratio of 1.85:1 (and enhanced
for 16x9 televisions.  Also included on the disc as extras: a decent
making-of featurette, an isolated score track, talent files for the cast
and crew, and the film's original theatrical trailer (as well as
trailers for Wolf, Men In Black, Bugsy and As Good As It Gets). 
When I first saw that the disc featured an isolated score track, I
actually laughed.  How great could the music for a silly little comedy
be for it to get it's own isolated track?  Well as it turns out, it's a
mighty fine score from Carter Burwell (Fargo, The Hudsucker Proxy) that
I enjoyed listening to again while I typed up this review.  Kudos to
Columbia TriStar for adding that feature to the disc. 
What Planet Are Your From? was unjustly ignored in theaters, and I hope
it finds its deserved audience on home video.  This fine DVD is
certainly a great way to see it. [R]
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
AOL Instant Messenger: FilmJax
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Bronx Tale, A (1993)
A Bronx Tale (1993) ***** out of ***** - C:Robert De Niro, Chazz
Palminteri, Francis Capra, Lillo Brancato.
"A Bronx Tale" marks the directorial debut of Robert De Niro, who is in my
opinion, the finest actor working today. And if his next directing effort is
as good as this one, he'll be one of the finest directors as well.
The story involves a impressionable young man, Calogero, who grows up during
the 60s in the Bronx, under two different influences. One is the
neighborhood gangster, Sonny (Palminteri), and the other is his bus driver
father, Lorenzo (De Niro). De Niro was very wise to play the role of Lorenzo
instead of playing Sonny, as most would have expected him to do.
Lorenzo tries to protect his family and teaches his son how to stay safe in
the outside world. It is a difficult task, however, as Calogero learns that
just being seen with the most popular guy in town brings respect and gifts.
Lorenzo tells his son that the only reason Sonny is in the position that
he's in is because he is feared by the neighborhood, not loved.
On the other hand, Sonny steers Calogero away from the life and dangers of
organized crime, and warns him to avoid the immature behavior of other boys
in the neighborhood who think that they soon will be gangsters too.
To complicate matters further, Calogero falls for a very respectable black
girl in a world where the Italian and black cultures do not interact. Both
Sonny and Lorenzo have mixed feelings about the subject, making Calogero's
life choices even more difficult.
Palminteri's script is on a completely different level from most gangster
films, offering much, much more than just crime and bloodshed. The
characters are very human, very believable, and therefore, very compelling
to watch. The actors, most of whom are complete unknowns, do an outstanding
job. De Niro's direction is excellent, proving that he has learned much from
the great talent he's worked with over the years. He fills the film with
details, and a minute into it, the world he has recreated seems perfectly
real. Unbelieveably, the film didn't receive a single Oscar nomination, and
it should have had many.
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office
reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for Man Who Haunted Himself, The (1970)
The Man Who Haunted Himself (1970) *1/2 out of ***** - C: Roger Moore.
A conservative British businessman (Moore) while driving home from work
suddenly starts to drive recklessly and moments later crashes his car in a
near fatal accident. While in the emergency room, he dies, but then is
quickly brought back to life. After he becomes well again, he returns to his
normal life. However, he slowly starts to discover that he sometimes seems
to be in two places at once, as people greet him and mention recent events
to him which he cannot recall taking part in. Is there a double of himself
running around London? Or is he going insane?
Well, it's never very clear, and that's the film's major flaw. For 70
minutes of the film, Moore's character just keeps wandering around hearing
about how he is supposedly doing all these wild things, and he never does
anything to investigate. He could very easily have changed his daily routine
just slightly, in order to prove that he wasn't at a certain place at a
certain time. He even has witnesses who can back him up and explain where he
was at times in question. But he just keeps wandering around.
Maybe the American version of this film has been cut, which would certainly
explain the ending, or lack of one. Moore finally confronts his double,
which is explained that the double is reflective of his wild side, the side
of his personality which he has repressed all his life and now it wants to
party. Or something like that. So, for some reason, the two Roger Moore's
jump into their cars and chase each other. During the chase, the "good"
Roger Moore starts to hallucinate some really weird stuff, and then drives
his car into a lake. The "evil" Roger Moore stops to watch, and as the
"good" Roger Moore dies, the "evil" Roger Moore doubles over in pain. Then
the end credits roll. What?! I don't get it.
The film has a good story, but its executed with such stupidity and bad
logic that it quickly grows tiresome. It could be decently remade today,
perhaps as a TV movie or even possibly as an "X-Files" episode. With a smart
writer, this could have been one creepy, entertaining flick. But as it
stands, it's just ridiculous.
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office
reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for No Contest (1994)
No Contest (1994) ** out of ***** - Cast: Shannon Tweed, Robert Davi, Andrew
Clay, Roddy Piper. Directed By: Paul Lynch. Running Time: 98 minutes.
"No Contest" is a VERY blatent rip-off of "Die Hard", just on a much lower
level of intelligence, credibility, and creativity.
The film opens as Sharon (Shannon Tweed) is hosting some sort of silly
beauty pagent. Ms. Galaxy, or something like that. We are told that Sharon
is a famous action film star, and immediately all common sense is thrown out
the window. A group of terrorists, led by the "Diceman" himself Andrew Clay,
then takes over the hotel where the beauty pagent is being held. If there
was any residual common sense left over, throw it out the window too, cause
it's "Die Hard at a beauty pagent!!!" They apparently are trying to kidnap a
congressman's daughter who is participating in the pagent.
Robert Davi, who was actually in "Die Hard", plays a private security agent
assigned to the congressman's daughter. It's an odd bit of casting, making
Davi a hero. But Tweed is supposed to be a kickboxing champ, so nothing
matters at this point. Wrestler Roddy Piper has a brief, but menacing role
as one of the terrorists. Basically, he's the Alexander Godunov character.
In a strange way, "No Contest" is almost fun. ALMOST. It's just so silly,
you might just be entertained. Clay is subdued in his role, but he does a
good job with it. Davi is interesting to see as the good guy, and Piper is
always fun to watch no matter how bad his movies are. And Tweed? Well, she
doesn't even get naked in this one, and really, 99% of the people who rent
Shannon Tweed movies are only after that one thing. I seriously doubt anyone
will care that Tweed (well, actually a horrible body double filmed as far
away from the camera as possible) is kicking the bad guys in the groin.  [R]
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related
links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Kalifornia (1993)
See this review as it was intended at: http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/
Cast: Brad Pitt, Juliette Lewis, David Duchovny, Michelle Forbes 
Written by: Stephan Levy and Tim Metcalfe 
Directed by: Dominic Sena 
Running Time: 115 minutes (R-rated) / 118 minutes (unrated) 
Kalifornia stars David Duchovny and Michelle Forbes as Brian and Carrie,
an artistic middle class couple with dreams of making it big in
California.  Brian is a writer trying his hand at a novel about serial
killers and Carrie is a photographer waiting for her break.  The two
plan on driving out to the Pacific coast, stopping at different serial
killer locations where Brian will gather info for his book and Carrie
will take the pictures.  However to get to California, Brian and Carrie
need another couple to split the costs with them.  Brian posts a message
on a local bulletin board, and it's responded to by Early Grayce (Brad
Pitt, about as far away from "Sexiest Man Alive" you can get) and his
girlfriend Adele (Juliette Lewis), two folks definitely from the other
side of the tracks.  Aside from their obvious class differences, a major
problem develops... Early tends to explode into murderous rages from
time to time. 
What I liked most about Kalifornia is that there's no "fluff" involved. 
Every scene serves to either advance the story or (most importantly)
develop the characters.  As a result, the people are all human beings
and every situation is 100% believable.  Also along those lines, while
the film is brutally violent, the violence is all a part of Pitt's
character and not there just to be gratuitous.  Some of the most
shocking acts of violence are merely implied, and they are the most
disturbing of all. 
The four leads in the film are perfectly cast, although special notice
must be given to Juliette Lewis.  Lewis, while able to play white trash
in her sleep, manages to add an extra layer of depth to her character. 
She ultimately becomes the film's most important character and her
performance is truly and sincerely heartbreaking. 
Kalifornia is available on DVD from MGM Home Entertainment (this DVD is
simply a reissue of the early Polygram edition, no longer in print).  It
contains the film in its original theatrical aspect ratio of 2.35:1 and
includes a fullframe option as well on the other side of the disc.  The
theatrical R-rated cut and an unrated cut of the film (running 3 minutes
longer) are available on both sides.  Extras include the original
theatrical trailer, a behind the scenes featurette, and a booklet with
notes from the film's promotional materials. 
The film is called Kalifornia because that's the way Brian spells
California on the note he posts to the bulletin board.  No explanation
is given as to why he spells it that way, and some other plot points are
equally as vague.  However, none of these ambiguities hinder the film in
the slightest.  Kalifornia is well acted, smartly written, expertly
directed, and definitely a film you need to see. 
(Note: The booklet which comes with the DVD offers an explanation as to
why the title is spelled with a K... it was simply to distinguish it
from a 1948 film called California.  However, I bet no one would ever
confuse the two.) 

Title
Review for Notting Hill (1999)
*** This Review Contains Spoilers ***
Whenever a new romantic comedy or drama is released, there is always
one question that has to be asked.  I mean sure, you know how the
movie is going to end even before you get to the theater, so the
question is not "will they or won't they?".  No, the question is "Will
the journey to this film's obvious conclusion be entertaining?".  In
the case of Notting Hill, the answer is definitely not.
One day, superstar actress Anna Scott (Julia Roberts) wanders into a
British travel book store, causing an almost interested reaction from
the shop's owner William Thacker (Hugh Grant, giving that same
stammering idiot performance that I just hate).  Later, Thacker spills
orange juice all over Anna when they accidentally collide on the
sidewalk.  Thacker then invites Anna up to his flat to change clothes,
and upon arriving there, Anna kisses him.  From that point on William
falls madly in love, while Anna repeatedly makes it her mission to
tear out his heart, stomp on it, throw it under a speeding bus, light
it on fire, extinguish it in a toilet, and then hand it back to him.
Forgive me for sounding so harsh here, but I can't figure out for the
life of me the appeal of this film.  It might be one of those "gender
specific" movies where women see it one way and men see it another.  I
mean from a guy's perspective though, Julia Roberts' character is a
total bitch to this guy (who obviously loves her) not once, not twice,
but THREE MAJOR TIMES over the course of the film, and HE'S the one
who ends up apologizing to her in the end?  WHAT?!
The first time comes when, after seemingly having a great date, Anna
brings William back to her hotel room.  Well surprise!  Guess who's
there?  It's her hunky actor boyfriend that she neglected to mention
(played by Alec Baldwin, who causes a distraction for a while because
you're not sure if he's playing himself or a fictional hunky actor).
Anna allows her boyfriend to completely humiliate William (if he
hadn't already been humiliated enough), and he leaves.
Jump to sometime later.  Nude pictures and a video of Anna surface so
she comes to William's to hide out.  He forgives her for her earlier
bitchness and they proceed to have a grand time.  Well thanks to
William's idiot flatmate (a character which may be the most disgusting
man ever put to film, British or not), the paparazzi swarm to
William's place to get the scoop.  (On a side note: I love how this
entire swarm of paparazzi all show up together, make their plan to all
be really, really quiet, elect one person to causally ring the
doorbell, remain quiet as mice, and then commence to go completely
nuts as a unit when William opens the door.)  Anna blames William for
answering his own door, saying that these pictures of them together
will haunt her for her entire life (photos of a couple in love are
worse than the nudie ones?  Come on!).  Again she basically tells
William to screw off, and she leaves.
Jump to sometime later.  Anna is filming a movie and William stupidly
forgives her bitchness AGAIN and goes to see her.  He is welcomed onto
the set and, in a moment that I don't think has ever happened on a
major movie shoot, is invited to hang out and listen to all of the
dialogue via headphones.  Through this ridiculous plot contrivance,
William overhears Anna talking to her co-star before a take.  Her
co-star asks about William, and she proceeds to tell him that he's "no
one".  Again distraught, William leaves.
A short time later, Anna shows up at William's shop to find out why he
left the set and to give her "I'm just a girl... standing in front of
a boy... asking him to love me" speech.  Instead of letting her have
it (as he should), William remains a gentleman and politely tells her
to go away because she's hurt him for the last time.  She does...  but
William's idiotic friends then convince him that he's made a terrible
mistake.  So there's a wacky car chase (involving one car) to get
William to see Anna before she leaves.  He makes it, apologizes for
all his wrong doings (which don't exist in any realm of reality), she
forgives him, and they live happily ever after on a bench in the park
where he reads and she smiles.
Notting Hill really did nothing for it's two hour plus running time
except infuritate me.  And I don't go to the movies to be infuriated.
Someone might respond to all this with that saying "You have to go
through the thorns to get to the rose".  Ok fine, if you want to rake
your hand up the stem through the thorns just to have the rose then go
right ahead.  But if you ask me, why not just start at the top?  No
head games, no pain, no blood spilled... just touch the stinkin' rose!
Sigh.  People in this world (obviously including the filmmakers) just
don't realize that life is too short for all this nonsense.  [PG-13]
The Jacksonville Film Journal
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email:chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted
without permission.

Title
Review for Love, Honor & Obey: The Last Mafia Marriage (1993) (TV)
Love, Honor and Obey: The Last Mafia Marriage (TV-1993) ** - C:Eric Roberts,
Nancy McKeon, Ben Gazarra, Alex Rocco.
The head of a 50s mafia family (Gazarra) decides that he doesn't want his
organization involved with narcotics, which angers the heads of the five
families. As a result, a bloody mafia war breaks out. Say, does this sound
familiar? Oh yeah, it was called THE GODFATHER!!! Come on!! If you're going
to blatently rip-off a mob film, try to steal from one that no one has seen!
Gee whiz.
The filmmakers try to hide their stolen ideas in many ways. One way is that
we're told that this was based on a true story. That may be so, but still,
The Godfather did it first. Also, the main plot of the film is nothing but
arguments and fights between Gazarra's son (Roberts) and his new bride
(McKeon). They argue and cry and fight and make-up for the entire three
hours of this TV miniseries which spans the course of several decades. They
have all of the usual marital problems: not able to have children, not able
to pay the bills, men with shotguns hanging out in the family room, etc. Oh,
and the fact that Roberts is a mobster causes problems, but it seems to take
McKeon five years to figure that part out.
Love, Honor and Obey is standard TV fare with nothing special going for it
in terms of story, direction or acting. You would think that a rip off of a
great movie could at least just duplicate "The Godfather" as far as interest
goes, but no such luck.
Have A Question Or Comment? Email Me At chuckd21@southeast.net
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,500 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office
reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for Gladiator (2000)
Cast: Russell Crowe, Joaquin Phoenix, Connie Nielsen, Oliver Reed, Derek
Jacobi, Djimon Hounsou, Richard Harris, Spencer Treat Clark 
Written by: David H. Franzoni, John Logan and William Nicholson 
Directed by: Ridley Scott 
Running Time: 157 minutes 
Roman emperor Marcus Aurelius (Richard Harris) chooses his trusted
general Maximus (Russell Crowe) as his successor.  However the emperor's
evil son Commodus (Joaquin Phoenix) murders his father before the
announcement can be made, and Maximus (as well as his family) is
sentenced to be executed.  Maximus is able to escape his executioners,
but is later captured and sold as a slave to Proximo (Oliver Reed). 
Proximo is looking for gladiators to earn himself money (he being a
former gladiator himself), and Maximus reluctantly uses his skills to
prove himself a powerful gladiator.  When emperor Commodus announces
that new games will be held in the Colisseum, Proximo takes his
gladiators there to do battle.  Maximus sees this as his chance to exact
revenge on Commodus. 
Gladiator begins with a great battle sequence between the Roman army and
Germania, and actually is able to maintain interest during the now
required "40 minutes of exposition after a kick ass opening sequence"
style of moviemaking.  The only downfall of the opening sequence is the
editing style used... it's choppy slow-motion which is unsettling and
distracting.  It's similar to the opening sequence in Saving Private
Ryan, but nowhere near as effective. 
The actual gladiator battles are thrilling, but also a bit disjointed. 
Many times it's unclear as to exactly what's going on... all the
audience can tell is that blood is being spilled.  We're not sure who's
blood or by who's hand though.  There's an instance of this earlier in
the film too that's disappointing.  It's comes when Maximus escapes his
executioners.  Some flashes and a few quick cuts later and Maximus is
free... but I still don't know exactly how he did it. 
Russell Crowe should have become a major star after his gleefully over
the top role as a computer generated serial killer in 1995's
Virtuosity.  For whatever reason his stardom never arrived... but he
should have it now.  From here on moviegoers should now be able to say,
"Let's go see the new Russell Crowe movie".  He gets the best scene in
the film (and one of the best moments of all recent movies) when he
reveals his identity to Commodus in the Colisseum.  It's both rousing
and chilling. 
Joaquin Phoenix does a very effective job of making Commodus a person
and not just a cartoon character (which could have easily happened). 
Commodus is conniving, sneaky and whiny, but Phoenix never lets the
character get silly.  It's a very good (and very creepy) performance. 
Oliver Reed died during the filming of Gladiator, and it's a huge loss
to the acting world.  I've always been fascinated with Reed... he's one
of those very talented performers who once had a fine career but ended
up in direct to video junk during his twilight years.  It's ironic that
this film probably would have gotten him back into real movies again, as
he gives a fun and sincere performance.  The film is dedicated to him,
and he will surely be missed. 
Reed's death presented the filmmakers with an obvious problem, as he
still had scenes to be completed.  Rather than recast the role (and end
up reshooting a great deal of footage), a digital version of Oliver Reed
was created at a reported cost of 2 million dollars.  Ironically, that
was probably more money than Reed ever earned for a single film. 
Anyway, this digital effect is only used in one scene that I am aware of
(for about twenty seconds) and if you aren't looking for it you won't
even be able to tell.  
Some of the other digital effects are less convincing however... and
like I always say, noticable digital effects take me out of a movie
immediately.  It's sad that such a good film has these distractions. 
Movies like The Fall of the Roman Empire and Spartacus seemed to do okay
without the use of computer effects. 
Keep in mind that Gladiator is based on real people and real events, but
is entirely a work of fiction.  However it's a work of fiction that's
great entertainment, and another film to add to the list of damn fine
flicks released in 2000 A.D. 
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
AOL Instant Messenger: FilmJax
The Jacksonville Film Journal
http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Bulworth (1998)
Cast: Warren Beatty, Halle Berry, Oliver Platt, Don Cheadle, Paul
Sorvino, Jack Warden, Sean Astin, Christine Baranski, Laurie Metcalf,
William Baldwin, Paul Mazursky, Larry King, Nora Dunn, John
Witherspoon, Chris Mulkey
Written by: Warren Beatty and Jeremy Pikser
Directed by: Warren Beatty
Running Time: 107 minutes
Bulworth is one of those films with great potential which it never
manages to capitalize on.  It's a brilliant idea that's destroyed by
sloppiness and an awful final 10 minutes.
Beatty plays U.S. Senator Jay Bulworth, seeking re-election in 1996.
As the film opens we see Bulworth in his office over a couple of days,
first watching his own TV commercials over and over again, and then
just flipping around from channel to channel.  We learn that he hasn't
eaten or slept in days.  He's just lost a fortune in investments.
He's just taken out a ten million dollar insurance policy on his life.
And he's just hired a hit man to kill him within the next three days.
He goes to give a speech at a black church.  Instead of giving his
normal speech, he decides to start talking the truth.  For example,
when asked why he hasn't made good on campaign promises, he tells the
crowd that it's because they haven't given any money to his campaign.
This continues for the rest of the film, as Beatty goes around rapping
about the "truths" of politics.  Yes, you read that right, most of his
dialogue from that point on is in rhyme.
Now all this would normally be fine and dandy.  The plot seems to me
to be a can't miss situation for comedy.  And it does have it's share
of laughs (a particularly funny moment has Bulworth stealing a
hoodlum's car and then the car's hydraulics go berserk).  But first of
all, all of the good moments in the film are in the trailers.  All of
the highlights of Bulworth's truth speeches you've probably already
seen.  Then, the majority of the comedy just boils down to an old
white guy dealing with young black people and suddenly acting just
like them.  There's nothing more to it than that.  It had such
promising potential.
We're supposed to think that Bulworth feels bad about his political
career, that maybe once he entered politics to help people but got
swept up into the system and lost his way.  This is obviously what
Beatty wants us to think about Bulworth.  It's not how it comes across
to me however.  The point just isn't expressed very well.  The way I
see it, Bulworth hasn't eaten or slept in days and just snaps, as
anyone probably would.
I was really looking forward to Bulworth this summer.  Sadly, the truth
about Bulworth is that it just doesn't come together. [R]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL: http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email: chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1995-1998 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be
reprinted without permission.

Title
Review for Normal Life (1996)
Normal Life (1996) 1/2 out of ***** - Cast: Ashley Judd, Luke Perry. Written
by: Peg Haller and Bob Schneider. Directed by: John McNaughton. Running
Time: 104 minutes.
With "Normal Life", Ashley Judd has now joined Debra Eisenstadt of "Oleanna"
and Robin Wright of "Forrest Gump" as playing one of the most evil,
despicable, frustratingly ridiculous and unsympathetic female characters in
movie history. This is not a good accomplishment.
"Normal Life" is loosely based on true events. Hard to believe, but
something vaguely similar to this actually happened somewhere in the history
of mankind. Luke Perry stars as a rookie police officer who meets up with
drug and alcohol addicted Ashley Judd in a bar. Somehow, the two fall in
love and eventually get married. During this time, Perry starts to realize
that the woman he loves is completely out of her mind. How do we know she's
insane? Oh, she hides from her in-laws, argues completely irrational points
with her husband, mutilates her body, plays russian roulette for kicks, and
shows up to her father-in-law's funeral wearing roller skates.
What does Perry do to help the situation? Does he get her some counseling?
Does he leave her? No. She has one day of rehab. That's it. Meanwhile, Perry
is having confrontations with the police force because he won't go along
with certain lies another officer is telling. Because Perry is so moralistic
and ethical, he quits his job rather than betray his principles.
The couple was already experiencing financial difficulties, but now things
get worse. Perry takes on odd jobs to make ends meet, and Judd just keeps
spending more and more money on junk. Perry, completely ethical, ca

Title
Review for Love Kills (1998)
Cast: Mario Van Peebles, Lesley Ann Warren, Daniel Baldwin, Donavan
Leitch, Alexis Arquette, Louise Fletcher, Loretta Devine, Melvin Van
Peebles, Susan Ruttan, Lucy Liu 
Written and Directed by: Mario Van Peebles 
Running Time: 95 minutes 
A couple of criminals (Mario Van Peebles and Loretta Devine) move into a
rich family's house in hopes of conning them out of their jewels. 
However, someone else steals the jewels before they are able to get to
them.  Writer Mario Van Peebles delivers a clever script with several
unexpected plot twists, but director Mario Van Peebles undermines his
own high points with haphazard camera work, editing and pacing.  It felt
as though the film should have been wrapping up at the hour mark, but
alas there was still 35 more minutes to go.  Daniel Baldwin (I can't
believe I'm about to type this) gives the best performance in the film,
outshining the other talented members of the cast.  [R]
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
AOL Instant Messenger: FilmJax
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Paper, The (1994)
(1994) **** - C:Michael Keaton, Glenn Close, Marisa Tomei, Randy Quaid,
Robert Duvall, Catherine O'Hara, Jason Robards, Jason Alexander, Jill
Hennessy, Clint Howard, Rance Howard, Bob Costas.
Henry Hackett (Keaton), editor of a New York City tabloid, is doing
everything he can to gather enough information to print a big story that
could expose a major mafia scandal and free two innocent black youths
charged with murder, all while he's racing to meet his deadline for the
morning edition. With his wife (Tomei) about to give birth, his
argumentative managing editor (Close) always taking the opposing side, and a
rival newspaper trying to bring him into their organization, he's confronted
with more than one problem in just a 24 hour period.
Hackett's wife wants him to take the job with the other paper, which would
pay more money and he would be able to work fewer hours. But Henry isn't so
sure. Deep down, he likes his job. He likes the anxiety, the frustration,
and the utter chaos of it all.
There are plenty of subplots also. Randy Quaid plays a columnist who's
having a war of words with the city's parking supervisor, which later in the
film evolves into a much more drastic situation. Robert Duvall, the senior
editor of the paper, is undergoing health problems and wants to make up with
his daughter, who hasn't spoken to him in years. All of these come together
at the end.
Normally, I can't stand movies about journalists and their profession, but
director Ron Howard (who in my book has almost a perfect filmography), the
excellent script, and the great cast make this one worthwhile. The pacing is
perfect, the acting is right on the mark, and it's funny too. There are
plenty of one-liners, wisecracks, and amusing situations. An uptight
reporter asks Duvall's character to put out his cigar because his doctor
found nicotine in his urine, and Duvall's response is priceless.
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,500 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office
reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for Death Force (2000)
Cast: David Heavener, Jim Issa, Stephanie Snow 
Written and Directed by: David Heavener 
Running Time: 87 minutes 
David Heavener wrote, directed, sings on the soundtrack, and stars in
this Christian action movie about Roy, a crooked Atlanta detective
(Heavener) who has created his own scheme to rob drug dealers.  After he
is abandoned by his partner (Jim Issa) and left for dead, Roy struggles
through amnesia and decides he doesn't want to be bad anymore.  He sets
out to get revenge on those who wronged him. 
Ray recovers from his injuries at a city mission, whose owners decide
NOT to call the police when they find him bleeding to death in their
alley.  Their reason?  They fear the police will shut them down.  Um...
what?  Do the police close places down, especially shelters, because
someone near death is found outside of it?  While Ray recovers, he has a
dream about what happened earlier before he was left for dead.  Thing
is... his flashback consists of events which NEVER HAPPENED.  The
flashback has big explosions and the sequence uses a higher quality film
stock for some reason.  So basically the most expensive portion of the
film is a nonsense dream.  Also, look for the subtle details in
Heavener's character as he changes... for example, when he's bad, he
doesn't wash his hair.  But when he's good again, he gives it a good
scrub. 
Why is this film called Death Force?  Who or what is the "death force"
in this movie?  The end credits reveal that the movie's original title
was Renegade Force.  Oh, I can clearly see why they wouldn't want THAT
title... sheesh!  Death Force is SO much better.  If you're confused,
read those last two sentences again with a heavy dose of sarcasm. 
Death Force sounds like they had one day allotted for post-production,
and whatever they couldn't get done stayed unfinished.  All of the audio
in the film comes from the actual takes used... very little looping is
even attempted (and when it is attempted it is BLATANTLY obvious that
the actors are dubbing in their lines).  In a couple of instances, the
original dialogue can still be heard under the looping, which causes a
bizarre echo effect that just screams "Help us!  We don't know what
we're doing!"  Also, there's a fight scene where no contact sounds are
dubbed in... only the grunts of the person getting hit.  Amazingly, this
is Heavener's TENTH film as a director. 
The cover art for the video release of Death Force is well designed and
should get action fans to pick up the box.  However, someone renting or
buying this based on the front cover artwork will be disappointed. 
There's a girl on the cover who I don't believe is in the actual film
itself, and also some high-tech helicopters flying through city
skyscrapers, which never even comes close to happening in this film. 
Then there's the back of the box, which would immediately make someone
put the tape back on the shelf and move on.  First and foremost... the
first line of text on the box, which is the tagline of the film,
exclaims in big bold letters "It Takes A Dirty Cop To Clean-Up Yhe
City".  That's right... the word "the" is spelled with a "Y".  You can't
misspell one of the most common words in the English language and expect
to be able and play with the big boys.  Also there are three pictures on
the back of the box: one of Heavener with a gun (fine), one of Stephanie
Snow with a gun (also fine), and an old clown holding balloons and
smiling (huh?!).  Boy oh boy, nothing says action movie like some old
guy dressed up as a clown holding balloons.  I believe the original cut
of Die Hard featured a clown in place of Reginald Vel Johnson's
character (damn that studio tampering!).  Finally, the box says the
movie ends with "explosions and a shoot-out".  There's no explosions
folks.  The film does end with a homosexual guy making a bad joke and
everyone laughing at him... you know, cause he's a silly homosexual and
all.  Why not put that on the box? 
Death Force is not rated, but would be equal to an R rating for
violence, nudity, and sex... all fine Christian qualities.  If you want
to know more about uber-filmmaker David Heavener, visit his website at
www.davidheavener.com. 
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
AOL Instant Messenger: FilmJax
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Carried Away (1996)
Carried Away (1996) **** out of ***** - C:Dennis Hopper, Amy Irving, Amy
Locane, Gary Busey, Hal Holbrook. W:Ed Jones. D:Bruno Barreto.
Hopper, in a refreshing change from his recent trend of playing nothing but
psychopaths, is a small town school teacher who was crippled as a child in a
farming accident. He has maintained a simple life in the small town where he
was born. He takes care of his ailing mother and is in a relationship with
his childhood sweetheart and fellow teacher (Irving). His life is shaken up
drastically, however, when a new student, Catherine (Locane) arrives in his
class.
Her father (Busey), an ex-military man, comes to Hopper's farm to ask if
they can board a horse there. Hopper accepts, which means that Catherine
will be spending a great deal of time there. One day he goes to look for
Catherine and finds her up in the hay loft of the barn. She promptly removes
her clothes and the two have sex (although Hopper is hesitant at first, he
quickly gives in). Thus begins an affair between the two.
My only problem with the film was that moment right there. It seemingly
happened for no reason. Nothing prompted it. We never see why this teenaged
girl was immediately drawn to a crippled older man. Towards the end we are
led to believe that Catherine is slightly insane, but by then it really
doesn't matter anymore.
Hopper tries to conceal this affair from his girlfriend, but also uses his
newfound youthfulness to better his relationship with Irving. For a while it
works, that is until the affair becomes public knowledge. Naturally, Irving
is enraged and a rift develops between the two. Holbrook plays the town
doctor and family friend who becomes the first to discover (accidentally)
about the affair. He has some good scenes and some funny lines when he
confronts Hopper.
Movies like this aren't made very often, which is good because when they do
come along, they are much more appreciated. "Carried Away" tells such a
simple story, one you've no doubt seen before. But it still seems fresh,
thanks to exceptional acting from all involved and excellent detail for the
time period. I could have done without the five minutes of full frontal
Hopper late in the film, but it wasn't difficult to just look away until the
scene was over. As just a note of trivia: Amy Irving is the director's wife.
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office
reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for Contact (1997)
Contact (1997) ** out of ***** - Cast: Jodie Foster, Matthew McConaughey,
James Woods, Tom Skerritt, Angela Bassett, John Hurt, Rob Lowe, David Morse.
Written by: James V. Hart and Michael Goldenberg. Based on the novel by:
Carl Sagan. Directed by: Robert Zemeckis. Running Time: 150 minutes.
"Contact" was one of the movies I was looking forward to the most this
summer. I even made arrangements to see it over a week before its release.
At this point I've seen it twice. The first time I saw it, I felt that it
was just about the most painfully slow, dull, and lifeless film I had ever
had the misfortune to sit through in a movie theater. And after the second
time? Well, I still don't feel like I've seen a good movie, and it's still
awfully dull. But for the most part, it's just extremely disappointing.
Now I'm not extremely disappointed because the film's not another
"Independence Day". Most people seem to think that if you don't like
"Contact", then you're just a brainless drooler who's only entertained by
stuff blowed up real good. Yet there's more explosions in "Contact" than
there are in films such as "Sling Blade", "Carried Away", and "Ulee's Gold",
all films I've seen recently which are more entertaining that this one. As a
matter of fact, there's not a split second of action in any of those films.
Fans of this film have been raving about how intelligent it is. You'd be
surprised how many of these "intelligent" fans have sent such childish
responses to my opinons of the film, even going as far as saying I should be
killed and I should burn in hell because I didn't like it. Is "Contact"
intelligent? Sure it is. The basis of the entire film relies heavily on
science, math and religion. But does intelligence mean that it will
certainly be entertaining? No. Are all the people who dislike the film
therefore unintelligent? Absolutely not.
The opening shot of the film, a very lengthy pullback through the entire
universe, starts out showing us just how far our own radio and television
signals have been able to travel. But it's point is to really give the
audience an idea of how vast the universe is. It's a great special effect,
both from a sound and a visual aspect.
We then meet astronomer Jodie Foster, who works with SETI, Search for
Extra-Terrestial Intelligence. For years and years she works incredibly hard
and endures many setbacks in her job of listening for radio signals from the
heavens, until one day her lifelong dream is realized... a message from
outer space is received.
This discovery sets the world into a frenzy. Well, I suppose it does anyway,
since instead of ever seeing a regular average citizen and how it may effect
his/her life, we see countless montages of someone channel surfing through
what seems like ten different channels of CNN. In their place, I would have
much rather seen what effect this would have had on an everyday family,
instead of just what all the scientists, politicians, and journalists had to
say about it.
Related to that problem by not showing us the reactions of any normal
people, many of the film's actual characters aren't developed well enough
for my liking. For example, Jodie Foster's team consists of a black guy, a
blind guy, a nerdy guy (and they only way you know that is because he always
wears a shirt displaying the periodic table of the elements), a young guy
who smokes a pipe, and a biker looking guy. Surely there's something these
guys could do to give them just a little depth. One of them could have a
family and we could find out how they felt about the film's events.
Then there's the "relationship" which develops between Foster and
McConaughey thanks to a couple of hours of conversation, the sharing of a
Cracker Jack prize, and a quick hop in the sack. That whole thing feels
phony and forced, as if the studio demanded that there had to be a love
interest subplot somewhere in there just to appease a certain demographic.
Then, over four years then go by without either one having contact with the
other, but yet when they do reunite, feelings continue to blossom. I would
have felt much better if these characters had just met, shared some
conversation and debate, then met up again four years later to participate
together in a project, and continued their exploration of each other's
beliefs.
But the main problem I have with "Contact" is it's length, or really the
amount of time spent on the more boring aspects of the story. Now I'm not
one of those people who automatically won't like or won't even see it just
based on it's running time. My problem with it's length is the same problem
I had with the length of 1995's "Heat". That problem is that there's too
much needless footage for a great many scenes which have already established
their point.
For example, while Foster and McConaughey are in bed together, he asks about
her father. She lets him know that he died when she was nine. Fine. But
then, moments later she has a lengthy flashback to that event. David Morse
(who give his usual excellent performance in yet another miniscule part) has
already been well established as her father. What purpose does this serve?
Let's just keep going with the story here.
Also, there's just scene after scene of debating the whole "religion vs.
science" issue, something which isn't resolved in the film because the
argument just can't be resolved in real life either. Obviously scientists
usually don't believe in God (not in the traditional sense anyway), and
religious people can't fully accept science as an explanation for why things
are. It just keeps going on and on, and it's dull.
Then, there are many moments which present very intriguing ideas and
situations, but are then immediately dismissed. Or I just feel that certain
ideas could have been executed much better. When the signal is received from
outer space, it's incredibly frustrating to the viewer. The three characters
who discover it all keep talking at the same time, making it impossible to
know what anyone is saying. Yes, I understand they're excited, but I want to
hear what they are saying, I was interested to find out the details, and
disappointed when I couldn't make out what any one character was saying.
After decoding the signal it is discovered that a video signal was also
sent. It too is decoded, and revealed to be footage of Adolf Hitler. The
scene is played great, the music swells and the characters react to it as
the most bizarre and intriguing thing yet, which it most certainly is. Then,
two seconds later, it's immediately brushed off. Don't play an idea that
interesting up like that if you don't plan on using it for anything. After
that brush off we are then treated to a "Forrest Gump"-ish type scene
involving Bill Clinton, a horrible concept which not only grinds the film to
a screeching halt (it was almost there anyway) but unfortunately dates the
movie. Using Clinton, who couldn't be more vague on whatever topic he's
really discussing in the clips used, is just unimportant to the film's
events. It's not a personal bias on my part mind you, but it's another
needless waste of film, which is then repeated several times later.
But the biggest disappointment is the film's final scenes (and no, not
because bug eyed monsters don't show up). After the main events of the final
scenes, it's thankfully revealed that this whole thing could have been
nothing more than an elaborate hoax played on the world by an eccentric
billionaire (John Hurt) who had nothing to lose and seemingly plenty of
motive and opportunity. When this is exposed, so much now made sense. There
were clues to this for the whole movie, and I really felt satisfied now that
most of what had just happened twenty minutes earlier may not have happened
at all. Unfortunately, a scene then follows which indicates that those
events really did occur. The other explanation was much more interesting. I
would have rather explored the ramifications of the hoax angle.
Is "Contact" awful? No, but it's not anything special. It's story just
doesn't go in directions that are the slightest bit interesting to me.
Conceptually it's a good idea, and it's technically well made, the effects
are good and the score is nice. But nothing can substitute for a good solid
story, and that's where "Contact" is sorely lacking. [PG]
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Strapped (1993) (TV)
(TV-1993) *1/2 - C:Bokeem Woodbine, Michael Biehn, Craig Wasson.
Yet another in a long line of "hood" movies, and this one is just as bad as
the rest. "Strapped" tells us the story of Diquan, a teenaged ex-con with a
heart made of gold and a mind made of cheese. Diquan has a pregnant
girlfriend and a steady job as a delivery boy. Then, his girlfriend is
arrested for selling crack (for the third time) and she's facing a long
stretch in jail. So, you know, he's got to do whatever it takes to get the
bail money for her. This means he's got to sell guns to ten year old kids.
Any sympathy I might have had for this character was gone after that. Then
there's "the man", a white police officer (Biehn) who wants to help Diquan
get his girl out of jail if he'll give him information as to who's selling
guns on the streets to ten year old kids. Of course "whitey" is the bad guy
here, wanting to get those guns off the streets and all, sheesh. So anyway,
by the end of the film Diquan is facing with his toughest decision, should
he save his crack dealing girl or should he save his gun selling buddy.
Instead he cops out and comes up with the most ridiculous solution, which
then renders the entire film as being completely pointless.
First-time director Forest Whitaker does an impressive job with the film.
It's a very well made movie, except that every ten minutes or so the action
is interrupted by a few seconds of the main character jumping up and down
while listening to rap music. The problem here is with the script. First,
you've got no one to like here. You keep trying to like Biehn's character
but the film keeps telling you not to, cause he's "whitey". And Diquan keeps
an attitude about him like "Yeah? So what if she was selling crack? She's
pregnant! Let her out!" Also, the whole entire movie is basically slang, and
it's very difficult to understand. For example, Diquan's heartfelt comments
to a friend of his that he sees shoot another kid: "Yo man you WHACKED!"
Touching. But, there is an appearance by the fat kid from "Lean on Me", so
you make up your own minds. "Strapped" was made for HBO.
Have A Question Or Comment? Email Me At chuckd21@southeast.net
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,500 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office
reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for Caccia alla volpe (1966)
After The Fox (1966) **1/2 out of ***** - Cast: Peter Sellers, Victor
Mature, Britt Ekland, Martin Balsam. Written by: Neil Simon. Directed by:
Vittorio De Sica. Running Time: 103 minutes.
"After the Fox" stars Peter Sellers as italian criminal mastermind Aldo
Venucci, also known as "the Fox". After escaping from prison, he plots to
obtain a large shipment of gold which had been stolen a few weeks earlier.
He devises a plan where he and his goons pose as a film crew making a movie
about some crooks who are stealing a large shipment of gold.
The film is a disappointment considering the talent involved. Neil Simon's
script is very funny UNTIL the plot actually starts. Sellers is brilliant as
always, pulling off an italian accent with ease. Victor Mature, who plays
the aging Hollywood film star Venucci cons into starring in his "movie",
seems to have a lot of fun with his egotistical character. Just overall, as
comedies go, it doesn't have enough laughs. And the final scene, no matter
how you look at it, makes absolutely no sense whatsoever.
Peter Sellers was set to have potentially been the biggest star in Hollywood
in 1964, following the success of "The Pink Panther" and "Dr. Strangelove".
It's said that the commercial and critical failure of "After the Fox"
(combined with Sellers' erratic behavior on the set of "Casino Royale")
destroyed his career for the next eight years.
--Chuck Dowling  
--Chuck's Movie Reviews -- http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/

Title
Review for Ground Control (1998)
Cast: Kiefer Sutherland, Robert Sean Leonard, Kelly McGillis, Michael
Gross, Margaret Cho, Charles Fleischer,
Farrah Forke, Henry Winkler, Bruce McGill, Kristy Swanson
Directed by: Richard Howard
Running Time: 93 minutes
On one of the busiest travel days of the year with a dangerous storm
front moving across the western part of the United States, two Phoenix
air traffic controllers square off against one another at their job
while battling equpiment malfunctions and power outages.
Keifer Sutherland stars as Jack Harris, a former air traffic controller
who is unable to do his job any longer after a flight he was controlling
crashes, killing everyone onboard.  A few years later a former collegue
asks him to help out at the control center, as they are severely
understaffed.  There he clashes with another controller (Robert Sean
Leonard) who thinks that Harris has no business controlling any longer.
Ground Control has a good cast, particularly Henry Winkler as the
engineer trying to keep the control center together.  It has an
extremely low budget, as it looks like the main set is just a darkened
warehouse with a couple of rows of computer monitors in the center of
it.  So if watch the film don't expect a lot and you just might like
what you see.  It's a simple tale of air traffic controllers on a busy
day, almost like a reverse Airport.  Nothing fancy, but entertaining
nonetheless.
Ground Control is available on DVD from Trimark.  It contains the film
in it's standard format, the usual cast and crew info, and includes
the film's trailer.  [PG-13]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email:chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted
without permission.

Title
Review for Last Stop, The (2000)
Cast: Adam Beach, Jurgen Prochnow, Rose McGowan, Callum Keith Rennie,
Winston Rekert, P. Lynn Johnson, William S. Taylor, Amy Adamson, Damon
Johnson 
Written by: Bart Sumner 
Directed by: Mark Malone 
Running Time: 94 minutes 
Silly performances and some huge gaps in logic mar an otherwise
interesting tale of an eclectic group of people stranded at "The Last
Stop Cafe and Motel" due to heavy snowfall.  One of the stranded is a
Colorado State Highway Patrolman (Adam Beach) who discovers a murder
scene and a bag full of cash from a recent bank robbery.  Someone
amongst the group of strangers is a bank robber and a murderer, but is
it the same person or are there multiple criminals? 
Adam Beach unfortunately was the wrong choice for the lead in this
film.  He doesn't play the role with enough seriousness to be believable
or enough goofiness for it to be funny.  His performance is stuck
somewhere in the middle, and this film really needed it to be on one
side or the other.  Rose McGowan is cold and unpleasant to the eye as
always, and Jurgen Prochnow... what on earth is he doing in this?  Best
performance comes from William S. Taylor as a cheesy (yet still somehow
cool and confident) Wayne Newton drifter type. 
The Last Stop is available on DVD from Sterling Home Entertainment.  As
usual with Sterling, they've filled out this DVD with extra features. 
The disc contains the film in its original aspect ratio of 1.85:1, a
choice of 2.0 Dolby Surround Sound or 5.1 Dolby Digital Surround Sound,
a full length audio commentary track with director Mark Malone,
interviews with the cast and crew, the original trailer, and the usual
cast and crew biographies. 
The film itself might not be the greatest, but Sterling's effort of
adding decent extra features while keeping the price affordable
(suggested retail of $19.95) makes this DVD worth the money.  [R]
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
AOL Instant Messenger: FilmJax
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Supergirl (1984)
See this review as it was intended at: http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/
Cast: Faye Dunaway, Helen Slater, Hart Bochner, Peter Cook, Mia Farrow,
Marc McClure, Brenda Vaccaro, Peter O'Toole, Matt Frewer 
Written by: David Odell 
Directed by: Jeannot Szwarc 
Running Time: 124 minutes / 138 minutes
***The following review contains spoilers***
"It's just... the way... we are." 
 --- A rapist (Matt Frewer) responds to Supergirl's (Helen Slater) query
as to why she's being attacked, an example of the mind-numbingly bad
dialogue in Supergirl. 
I'll admit it... I love Superman III.  I know it's hated amongst the
Superman faithful who dismiss it as nothing more than a vehicle for
Richard Pryor, but I still think it's a worthy addition to the Man of
Steel franchise. Supergirl, a spin-off film of sorts from the series'
same producers (Alexander and Ilya Salkind), doesn't even rival Superman
III in terms of quality, let alone Superman or Superman II. 
Supergirl lost me from the opening scenes and went steadily downhill for
the rest of its two hour plus running time.  As the film begins we see
the residents of Argo City, a commune like place consisting of refugees
from Krypton which resides in "inner space", go about their daily
lives.  Ok... what?  So these are exiles from Krypton, which blew up
right?  Were they living there before Krypton exploded?  How do you get
to "inner space"?  This whole "inner space" notion is never explained,
particularly in terms of how these people get information from the
outside world.  How do they know where Superman went?  How do they know
he took the name Clark Kent and now works at the Daily Planet?  These
kinds of things frustrate the hell out of me. 
Argo City is kept running by a power source called the Omegahedron.  One
day the founder of Argo City, Zaltar (Peter O' Toole), gives the
Omegahedron to Superman's cousin, Kara (Helen Slater), for use as
inspiration in her art.  Kara uses it to create a bug-like thing which
immediately crashes through the layer of "whatever" that protects the
city.  In the chaos, the Omegahedron sails out through the opening,
dooming the Argonians to death... in three days time, or something. 
Kara then climbs into a pod which Zaltar had designed for
interdimensional travel and chases after the Omegahedron to save her
world. 
The power source travels directly to Earth and lands in the bowl of dip
belonging to a minor-league witch named Selena (Faye Dunaway) who,
immediately before her dip was ruined, announced her desires to rule the
world to her sometimes warlock boyfriend Nigel (Peter Cook).  Selena
somehow knows that this ball from the sky will help her with her evil
plans, and she sets out to achieve world domination. 
Selena is unaware of course that Kara has also arrived on Earth, and
that she's arrived as Supergirl (complete with appropriate costume). 
Supergirl emerges from the bottom of a lake when she arrives.  Ok...
huh?  Why does the Omegahedron fall from the sky but Supergirl shoots
out of the bottom of a lake?  Attention movie: explain yourself!  I'm
sorry, I can only suspend disbelief so much.  I can't buy into any of
this nonsense just because the movie wants me to. 
Knowing that she needs a secret identity, Supergirl basically "wills"
herself into a school girl outfit (complete with a different hairstyle),
picks the alias Linda Lee and enrolls into school.  She's given her dorm
assignment, and who happens to be her roommate?  Lois Lane's sister,
Lucy.  Ok, coincidence is one thing folks, but we're getting really
contrived now.  What follows are some generic all-girls school
hijinks... complete with evil bully girls (mean for no reason, of
course) and even a shower scene (!).  Best moment though comes when
Supergirl decides to put a bra on over her school uniform and starts
stuffing it with socks.  At this point I'm rapidly wondering why I'm
bothering with this nonsense. 
There is some credit to give to the film however.  One lengthy and
elaborate sequence featuring an "evil" bulldozer destroying a small town
in search of its "prey" is very well done.  Also, its commendable to see
genders reversed in the film, whereas the women have all the power and
the men are merely objects and tools.  Hart Bochner (Die Hard) is
particularly fun as Kara's love interest, a lovesick landscaper who is
under a spell cast by Selena (although he is unfortunately part of one
of the film's more ridiculous moments, when he has to be rescued from
being tapped by some "menacing" bumper cars). 
Then there were numerous little things that bothered me.  The flying
effects are never convincing for a moment... it's all too obvious that
Helen Slater is hooked to wires.  Instead of having her look like she's
flying, the filmmakers wanted her to be "graceful", so she poses a lot
and does ballet-type maneuvers.  Also, who are the first two humans to
meet Supergirl when she arrives on Earth?  A pair of truck
drivers/rapists who immediately attack her and then meet a "wacky"
demise.  There is also some rampant product placement in the film, most
notably for Popeye's, Tylenol, and A&W Root Beer, with the latter
actually putting its logo on the T-shirt of one of the rapists (?!). 
Finally, just one word: monsters. 
Faye Dunaway and Peter O'Toole ham it up unmercifully, however when
O'Toole overacts he's entertaining and when Dunaway does it she's
annoying (her character actually says the line "Seize them!" at one
point).  Dunaway's henchmen (played by Peter Cook and Brenda Vaccaro)
fare much better, with Vaccaro coming off best as the equivalent of Ned
Beatty's Otis character from the first two Superman movies.  Helen
Slater effectively portrays Supergirl as the innocent, naive character
she's written to be, as she's able to gaze at flowers and bunnies with
the right amount of genuine wonder to make it believable.  Believability
aside though, it's still annoying. 
Now despite all this negativity (and I'm not alone here... Supergirl is
not a well liked nor a well respected movie in many circles), leave it
to the good people at Anchor Bay Entertainment to actually make people
not only interested, but excited about its release on DVD!  They have
released TWO separate editions of the film on DVD, to the delight of
many people (including myself... yet I'm still unclear as to why, since
this movie is so awful). 
The first and most widely available DVD release features the
International version of the film which runs 10 minutes longer than the
print which ran in U.S. theaters.  The movie is presented in its
original theatrical aspect ratio of 2.35:1, is enhanced for 16x9
televisions, and has been remastered in full THX glory.  Extras on the
disc include: a full length audio commentary track with director Jeannot
Szwarc and "special project consultant" Scott Michael Bosco, the
excellent 50-minute documentary from 1984 called Supergirl-The Making of
a Feature (dig that workout montage!), 5 trailers, 3 TV spots, talent
bios, in-depth storyboards (accompanied by score from the movie), and
assorted still galleries.  
The transfer on this International version is incredible... you'd think
you were watching a new release.  Images are sharp, colors jump off the
screen, and the picture is free of scratches or artifacts.  Only some
special effects sequences show the wear of time, and there just isn't
much that can be done about that (unless you're obsessive like George
Lucas).  The new THX approved audio is loud and clear in all the right
places, however you'll be hearing absurd dialogue and a mediocre Jerry
Goldsmith score (which is completely unrelated to John Williams' classic
Superman theme and sounds better suited for a Cannon Films' Golan-Globus
production). 
The commentary track featuring director Szwarc and project consultant
Bosco is a step in the right direction in the evolution of audio
commentaries.  Bosco seems to be an expert in all things Supergirl and
is there with Szwarc to ensure that there's no dead air on the track. 
Bosco probes Szwarc for information on virtually everyone and everything
that comes onscreen, and we learn a great deal more about the film as a
result of his participation.  Although, at times you can tell that Bosco
is looking for a specific response from Szwarc, and is surprised when he
doesn't get that response. 
We learn some fascinating tidbits on the track, most notably the
"almost" appearance in the film by Christopher Reeve.  Great detail is
given about Superman's proposed role in the original script before Reeve
(wisely) dropped out.  As it stands, Superman is written off early on in
the film when we hear a radio broadcast mention that he is billions of
light years away on some sort of peace mission.  For the sake of
brevity, I won't even get into that one. 
Szwarc also reveals that is was the conscious decision of the Salkinds
(and everyone else agreed) that Supergirl needed to stand on its own,
replacing the science fiction of the Superman films with cutsy
"whimsical fantasy" nonsense.  Bosco also points out scenes not in the
American release as they come along, claiming that had they been in the
original release it would have been a hit at the box office.  Again, for
the sake of brevity, I won't even get into that one. 
Anchor Bay has also released a limited edition (only 50,000 copies
pressed) two-disc set.  Disc one contains everything mentioned for the
regular release.  Disc two features the never before seen director's cut
of the film, which runs 138 minutes long.  The additions mainly consist
of scene extensions which don't add much of note, except for a few
moments which lengthen Peter O'Toole's screen time (particularly during
his latter appearances).  The print is rough in spots and the sound is
only in mono, but fans of the film won't care.  One question though...
shouldn't the director's commentary be on the director's cut of the
film? 
I'd never seen Supergirl before I sat down to watch this DVD.  I was
nine when it was released to theaters, and even then I was smart enough
to inform my parents not to take me to see it.  So when I popped the DVD
into my player and sat down in my easy chair I had no idea what to
expect.  I knew the film wasn't beloved and I never had any interest in
it before, but I was willing to give it a shot because of the impressive
amount of work put into the disc.  As the disc began to spin I was
rather impressed with the opening sequence, which made me sit up and
wonder if my assumptions all this time could have been wrong.  Come to
find out however it was just the Chase Digital Stereo logo... so I slunk
back into my seat as the nightmare started. 
At the end of the film, Supergirl flies back into the lake with the
Omegahedron, and FLIES back to Argo City.  Ugh, I give up.  I'm
surprised I even made it to the end of the film not once, not twice, but
THREE times to review these discs.  Supergirl is definitely a terrific
DVD package, but a very lousy movie. [PG]

Title
Review for Jerky Boys, The (1995)
     I went to see THE JERKY BOYS in the theater on the first day it
came out.  Yes, The Jerky Boys are very juvenile and extremely profane,
but there's just something about what they do.  It's so simplistic,
it's funny.  If you are unsure about exactly what it is they do,
basically these two guys from New York call various people and act
rudely through a myriad of colorful characters.  They have two albums
out (with a third on the way) and someone got the bright idea to put
these two guys into a major motion picture.
     So anyway, I went to see the film on it's first day of release.
Not so much because it was The Jerky Boys, but because my favorite
actor, Alan Arkin, was playing the bad guy in the film.  Well, after it
was over, I remembered laughing a few times (mostly at Arkin).
     Anyway, THE JERKY BOYS is about to be released on video, and so I
decided to watch it again.  For some reason, at no fault of Mr.
Arkin's, the film was much worse than I remembered.  For those of you
who have seen it, I'll describe why.
     The film's core audience has to be the people who have listened to
the albums.  So how come the entire movie is nothing but the routines
from those albums?  THE JERKY BOYS is a *very* poorly written film with
many idiotic plot points and sadly, very few laughs.
     Example, for some reason our heroes (?) are tied up to chairs in a
meat locker.  When the bad guys leave them, The Jerky Boys move their
chairs back to back.  The camera then cuts to something else, and when
we come back, they are free.  Ridiculous.
     I can not recommend this film, not even to fans.  I will say that
Alan Arkin is truly funny in the film and almost makes it worth seeing
if only he had been on screen more.

Title
Review for Meet Wally Sparks (1997)
Meet Wally Sparks (1997) NO STARS out of ***** - Cast: Rodney Dangerfield,
Debi Mazar, Cindy Williams, Burt Reynolds, David Ogden Stiers, Alan Rachins.
Written by: Harry Basil and Rodney Dangerfield. Directed by: Peter Baldwin.
Running Time: 105 minutes.
With pointless cameos by: Tim Allen, Richard Bey, Michael Bolton, Tony
Danza, Lesley-Anne Down, Morton Downey Jr., Karen Duffy, Gilbert Gottfried,
John Henson, Ron Jeremy, Rikki Lake, Jay Leno, "Stuttering" John Melendez,
Sally Jesse Raphael, Michael Rooker, Bob Saget, Julia Sweeney.
You know that pain you get in your throat when you eat ice cream too fast?
There's nothing you can do, you just have to sit there and wait for it to go
away? Well take that pain, multiply it by 100, and you still wouldn't know
the agony that is "Meet Wally Sparks".
Rodney Dangerfield is talk show host Wally Sparks, although he's basically
just Rodney Dangerfield. After the network threatens to cancel his show, he
sets out to keep it on the air, and somehow ends up living in the house of
the governor of Georgia (Stiers). Countless penis jokes and other crude
sexual humor follows.
The film is remotely interesting for the first 30 minutes or so, only
because of the numerous cameos. But those soon stop and nightmarish agony
begins. Of all the players, only Burt Reynolds (as a network executive)
fares well. Unfortunately, his role is brief. I'm almost convinced now that
Dangerfield's entertaining 1986 film "Back to School" was a complete fluke.  [R]
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related
links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Defending Your Life (1991)
Defending Your Life (1991) ***** out of ***** - C:Albert Brooks, Meryl
Streep, Rip Torn, Lee Grant, Buck Henry.
Albert Brooks is probably the smartest comedic talent working in films
today. He wrote and directed "Defending Your Life" which is one of the
brightest and funniest films of all time.
Brooks plays Daniel Miller, a business executive who is killed in a traffic
accident. He wakes up in Judgment City, a waiting grounds of sorts where you
have to "defend" your life on Earth. A trial is held for every person who
dies to see if they have evolved enough to pass on to the next step in the
universe. If they don't pass they are sent back to Earth to start all over
again and eventually if that person never evolves enough, they are "thrown
away". The trial is like a trial here on Earth with prosecutors, defenders,
and judges. During the trial, moments from the person's life are shown on a
big screen in the courtroom, while the two lawyers battle to prove if the
person has led a good life and overcome his or her fears.
This is a brilliant idea for a film and Brooks pulls it off perfectly. He
takes what people could consider a controversial subject (life after death)
and makes a film which I don't see how it could be offensive to anyone. It's
sweet, charming, romantic (during his stay, Brooks meets Meryl Streep and
they fall in love), it's clean (Rated PG), and most importantly, it's funny.
This is one of those rare films where every joke is a winner. The music by
Michael Gore is excellent. And the supporting cast does an outstanding job,
especially Rip Torn as Daniel's defender.
"Defending Your Life" is Albert Brooks' best film to date and those who
enjoy this film should also enjoy "Real Life", "Lost in America", "The
Scout", and "Mother".  All are written and/or directed by Brooks.
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office
reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for Kentucky Fried Movie, The (1977)
Cast: Evan Kim, Master Bong Soo Han, Jim Abrahams, David Zucker, Jerry
Zucker, Donald Sutherland, Bill Bixby, Henry Gibson, George Lazenby,
Rick Baker, Stephen Stucker, Tony Dow, Charlotte Zucker, Forrest J.
Ackerman, John Landis 
Written by: Jerry Zucker, Jim Abrahams and David Zucker 
Directed by: John Landis 
Running Time: 83 minutes 
The Kentucky Fried Movie is the writing debut of comic masterminds Jerry
Zucker, Jim Abrahams and David Zucker (who went on to give us zany gems
like Airplane!, Top Secret!, and The Naked Gun trilogy).  The film is a
raunchy sketch comedy movie (a popular comedic format in the 1970s, with
The Groove Tube and Loose Shoes as other examples) and most have
described it as an R-rated "Saturday Night Live". 
The Kentucky Fried Movie is horribly dated by today's comedic standards,
but the attempts at humor come so often that there are enough good jokes
throughout to make it work.  Although, I wonder what someone's reaction
to this film would be watching it for the first time today, since a
great deal of the humor is based on the commercials and fads of the
70s.  I mean, when was the last time you heard "Detroit" as the
punchline of a joke? 
Best bits include: the educational film "Zinc Oxide and You", the 1950s
lawyer spoof "Courtroom", and the final skit of the film where a TV news
anchorman and his crew watch a young couple having sex through the
couple's television.  Other segments fall flat or run too long, with the
Bruce Lee parody "A Fistful of Yen" definitely falling into the latter
category. 
The Kentucky Fried Movie is available on DVD from Anchor Bay
Entertainment.  It contains the film in its original theatrical aspect
ratio of 1.85:1 (and enhanced for 16x9 televisions), as well as a full
frame version.  The disc also features a full length audio commentary
track (featuring director John Landis, producer Robert K. Weiss, and
writers Jerry Zucker, Jim Abrahams and David Zucker), the original
theatrical trailer (featuring footage shot specifically for the
trailer... and advertising the film as G-rated!), behind the scenes
footage, a photo gallery, and crew biographies. 
The commentary track is a blast, just as you'd expect it to be with
these five men in one room.  The jokes come as quickly as they do in the
film, although many times someone ends up getting talked over (as is
common with commentary tracks featuring numerous participants). 
Director John Landis is quick to point out all the moments that would
never make it through the motion picture rating board today, and how the
film, if resubmitted, would instantly get an NC-17 rating.  Landis also
pulls off the amazing feat of seemingly knowing what every single member
of the cast is doing today. 
The behind the scenes footage, which was shot by the Zuckers to prove to
their parents that they were actually making a movie, is interesting
whenever there's sound to go with it.  However, that isn't often.  The
remaining silent footage would be of the most interest to the cast and
crew of the film, as watching them all sit and enjoy a meal isn't too
entertaining for me (despite those silly 70s haircuts). 
Anchor Bay has done the fans of this film a great service with this
special edition DVD, and I'm very happy to support a company dedicated
to giving its customers exactly what they want.  [R]
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
AOL Instant Messenger: FilmJax
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Everyone Says I Love You (1996)
Everyone Says I Love You (1996) ** out of ***** - Cast: Alan Alda, Woody
Allen, Drew Barrymore, Lukas Haas, Goldie Hawn, Gaby Hoffman, Edward Norton,
Natalie Portman, Julia Roberts, Tim Roth, David Ogden Stiers, Billy Crudup.
Written and Directed by: Woody Allen. Running Time: 101 minutes.
You know, there's a reason musicals aren't made anymore. They don't work.
Anyone remember "Newsies"? Why Woody Allen has tried one is beyond me, as
"Everyone Says I Love You" doesn't work either.
There really is no plot to the film. Edward Norton (playing a younger Woody
Allen, which gets annoying since Allen himself is also in the film) wants to
get married to Drew Barrymore to the delight of her parents (Alda and Hawn).
That's it. To fill time, just about everyone gets to sing. And I believe
everyone except Barrymore (who was overdubbed) has their own song to sing.
Usually I prefer Woody's films which he actually appears in over the ones
where he doesn't. Not in this case however, because Allen's character is so
unnecessary to the film. His character's subplot is absurd. How's this
sound: Allen lives in Paris, and his daughter lives in New York. One day,
his daughter happens to overhear Julia Roberts talking to her therapist. For
no reason, she takes detailed mental notes. Now, cut to Venice. Allen has
taken his daughter on vacation. They are having dinner and who happens to
walk by but... Julia Roberts! Allen's daughter then tells him everything
that Roberts likes, so he can be her perfect man. Allen then tries to woo
her (and succeeds? What the...?) The thing is, the daughter giving him
information that she heard Roberts tell her therapist. She was telling her
therapist about stuff like her favorite flower. Is that what you'd talk to
your therapist about? Your turn-ons and turn-offs, getting so specific as
your favorite flower? Between this contrived subplot and the dozens of
musical numbers, none of the characters can be developed and therefore
there's no story.
I just don't like the concept of the musical. Wouldn't it perplex you if you
were having dinner with someone and all of a sudden a musical number broke
out? At one point it seems like one of the characters is about to
acknowledge this singing oddness, but it doesn't pay off. But just because
it's a musical isn't why I dislike it. There's no story to the film, and
only a few laughs. Although, a dance number at the end of the film with Hawn
and Allen is incredibly well staged.
You will get to see some things you've never seen in a Woody Allen film
before, aside from the musical numbers. There's a few seconds of some black
people! There's almost a car chase/action sequence! There's computerized
special effects! But there's no story!
And not to be crude, but I have to mention something. Watch for the scene
where Tim Roth and Drew Barrymore talk out on a balcony or something. It
won't be hard to miss Barrymore, because either it was 30 degrees on the set
that day or she's auditioning to be the model for Schumacher's next Batsuit.
(The password is: massive nipple protrusions). [R]
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Good Burger (1997)
Good Burger (1997) **** out of ***** - Cast: Kel Mitchell, Kenan Thompson,
Sinbad, Abe Vigoda, Dan Schneider. Written by: Dan Schneider, Kevin Kopelow
and Heath Seifert. Directed by: Brian Robbins. Running Time: 95 minutes.
Before seeing this, I was probably the most anti-"Good Burger" person
around. The previews seemed to be all I needed to see to judge that this
just wasn't worth my time. Well, for once the previews worked AGAINST the
film, as "Good Burger" is surprisingly very funny.
"Good Burger" is smart to point out it's ridiculousness very early on. It
immediately lets you know how silly it's going to be, and it stays constant
throughout. Not much of a plot to really speak of (It's all about a war
between two rival hamburger stands, one a small town mainstay, the other a
massive corporate monster), but the huge amount of comedy that actually
works kept me entertained. And aside for a little bit of minor league
profanity, it's a fine film for the family.
The cast is extremely likable, with only the main character as an exception.
He's doing a sort of James Brown impression for the whole film, and it's
awfully annoying. Thankfully, he does get some good jokes, so his character
isn't a total loss. Abe Vigoda was an odd casting choice, but even that pays
off well. And there are numerous cameos (no one earth-shattering though).
"Head of the Class" fans take note, the film co-stars and was co-written by
Dan Schneider who played Dennis on the show, and director Brian Robbins
played Eric. [PG]
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Heaven & Earth (1993)
(1993) *** - C:Tommy Lee Jones, Hiep Thi Le, Joan Chen, Haing S. Ngor,
Debbie Reynolds, Dustin Nguyen, Jeffrey Jones.
To enjoy the work of director Oliver Stone you must put aside any personal
opinions about him. It's true that he takes himself and his work much too
seriously. However, if you are able to just concentrate on his films and
treat them as works of fiction based on actual events, then you'll see that
he's a great filmmaker. Not counting the awful "Natural Born Killers", he
has given us some great films such as "Platoon", "Talk Radio" and one of my
favorite films of all time, "JFK". I had huge expectations for this film,
some of which were met, but for the most part they were not.
"Heaven and Earth" is based on the writings of Le Ly Hayslip, who grew up in
a small village in Vietnam only to see it ripped apart by the ravages of
war. In the film's first act, we see her life in the village before the war.
The people there are peaceful and content with life. When the war begins we
see the horrors brought about by both the Viet Cong and the South
Vietnamese. Both groups try to coerce the villagers to join their side. Many
of the villagers are accused by each side of being traitors and are punished
and tortured for information. This part of the film, showing the
heartwrenching anguish of what these people went through, especially Le Ly,
packs quite an emotional punch and ranks among Stone's best work. To my
knowledge, this is the first mainstream American film to show this side of
the war.
Having said that, it's hard to understand why the film becomes such a
simplistic, easily predictable soap opera. Le Ly and her mother leave the
village and head to Saigon where the two of them become housekeepers for a
wealthy couple. The husband seduces Le Ly and she becomes pregnant. The wife
then finds out about the affair and banishes Le Ly and her mother from the
house. Her mother then returns to the village while Le Ly finds work selling
cigarettes, liquor, and eventually herself to American GI's. There's nothing
interesting as far as plot here, and this part of the film could have easily
been done without.
Just as the film reaches it's lowest point, Sgt. Steve Butler (Jones) shows
up. At first he appears to be a nice guy just looking for someone to talk
to. It's obvious to the audience, however, that he's too good to be true. He
marries Le Ly and takes her back with him to America. It's back in the
states when we start to learn that the war has destroyed Steve's soul as his
character becomes a cliched, drunken maniac who staggers around, beats up on
Le Ly, and spouts out theories about Black Ops and the Special Forces
(typical Stone dialogue). She eventually gets away from him and she returns
to her homeland to visit her family. At this point, the film tries to end on
more highly charged emotional scenes. However, the first act was so powerful
and moving that by this point you have nothing left to give to these
characters.
So is "Heaven and Earth" a good movie? Yes and no. It's a very well acted
and directed film. The story however, started out original and then sank
into easy predictability. Also, it's not the kind of film that is made for
entertainment or enjoyment. You can't leave the film saying to yourself,
"Wow, I enjoyed the things that happened in that movie." Would I ever watch
the film again or recommend it to anyone? Probably not. Although, the first
act was good enough to give the film a better than average rating.
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,500 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office
reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for Alferd Packer: The Musical (1996)
Note to moderator: Please credit this review to Brian Matherly at
bmath2000@hotmail.com.  Thanks!
Cast: Trey Parker (billed as "Juan Schwartz"), Matt Stone, Dian Bachar,
Jason McHugh, Ian Hardin, Jon Hegel, Toddy Walters, Andy Kemler  
Written and Directed by: Trey Parker (billed as "Trey Parker") 
Running Time: 90 minutes 
Insane (but inspired) musical about Alferd Packer, the first man ever
tried for cannibalism in America.  As the story unfolds we learn what
events led to Packer (Trey Parker) supposedly killing and eating the
five men who got lost while accompanying him through the mountains of
Colorado in search of gold.  Throughout, Packer must contend with evil
trappers bent on stealing his prized horse, a tribe of `Ute' Indians
that doesn't seem quite on the mark, and a terrible winter storm that
leads to the eventual cannibalism.  Parker obviously knows his musicals
very well, because the viewer is also treated to some of the most
maddeningly catchy songs to appear in a film (he would accomplish this
again in his post-Cannibal! musical motion picture, South Park: Bigger,
Longer, and Uncut). 
Apart from the inherent interest of seeing a pre-"South Park" Parker and
Stone in their first effort, Cannibal! also offers up some pretty decent
laughs.  The aforementioned `Ute' Indian tribe that Packer's group
encounters is a definite highlight, as are two rousing musical numbers
about snowmen (one of which ends on a comedically deadly note).  Stone's
Humphrey character steals the show, especially when complaining about
the prospect of having to `eat butt' or revealing what's underneath his
muff cap.  Jason McHugh's character of Mr. Miller is the stand out
performance though, as he offers a hilarious dissenting voice to the
proceedings. 
As I mentioned before, Parker's songs are very catchy.  You'll be hard
pressed to get `It's a Shpadoinkle Day' out of your head once you've
heard it (incidentally, the Braniff logo that appears at the end of
every "South Park" episode is scored with a few notes from this song). 
Other songs you'll find yourself humming include `When I Was On Top of
You' (a love ballad), `The Trapper's Song' (the villains leit motif),
and `Hang the Bastard' (the rousing finale).  Thankfully, none of these
songs are quite as embarrassing to find yourself singing in public as
South Park:Bigger, Longer & Uncut's songs are. 
Released as a pick-up through Troma Studios, the film is available on
videocassette and DVD.  The videocassette includes an intro by the
beautiful Jane Jensen and an interview segment with Lloyd Kaufman,
discussing his admiration for Parker and Stone and the fact that they
had been hired for a Zucker brothers film (which turned out to be the
hilarious BASEketball).  There are also multiple trailers for upcoming
Troma films. 
As for the DVD... well, that's a different story.  Probably one of the
best DVD packages of the year (and potentially of all time), Cannibal!
The Musical! the DVD is a massive achievement.  Presented in 1.33:1
(full frame) only, the disc has the usual Troma inclusions: the Tour of
Troma, the Troma Intelligence Test 2, trailers for upcoming releases,
but where the disc truly shines is in its Cannibal! specific extras. 
The first thing I must note is, the transfer is about as beautiful as
any I've ever seen on any disc.  The picture is crisp, clear, and free
from any noticeable artifacts.  Add to that one of the funniest
commentary tracks I have ever heard, featuring Trey Parker, Matt Stone,
Jason McHugh, Dian Bachar, and Andy Kemler getting drunker and drunker
as the track continues and you still haven't scratched the surface of
the extras.  There's also behind the scenes footage of the shooting of
the film, a clip with Trey, Matt, and Lemmy (of the band Motorhead) from
the film Terror Firmer, an index for easy location of all of the songs
in the film, and finally, an index of all the songs as performed by the
cast of a stage production of Cannibal!. 
It's good to see this film finally get the treatment it deserves.  Kudos
to the entire production staff at Troma and AIX for making one of the
most entertaining DVDs I have seen in a very long time. 
Reviewed by Brian Matherly - bmath2000@hotmail.com
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Dinosaur (2000)
Cast: D.B. Sweeney, Julianna Margulies, Joan Plowright, Ossie Davis, Max
Casella, Alfre Woodard, Samuel E. Wright, Della Reese 
Written by: John Harrison and Robert Nelson Jacobs 
Directed by: Eric Leighton and Ralph Zondag 
Running Time: 82 minutes 
Screening Theater: Starnet Pablo 9 Theaters - Jacksonville Beach, FL 
Di$ney's latest mega-blockbuster Dinosaur is set in the age of the
dinosaurs (duh, obviously), around the time of their proposed demise at
the hands of a comet or meteor smashing into the Earth.  The film's main
dinosaur Aladar (voiced by D.B. Sweeney) attempts to lead a group of
other dinosaurs (as well as the monkeys who raised him... long story) to
safe haven away from the destruction. 
My rating for Dinosaur is actually a composite of two separate ratings. 
The first is for the technical aspect of the film.  In terms of
execution, Dinosaur is a five star movie.  The computer generated
animation (with digitally enhanced real life backgrounds) are simply
gorgeous.  Granted the real world shots are limited, but when they are
used it's some of the most flawless integration of real film and
computer animation I've ever seen. 
Secondly, there are three fantastic sequences in the film.  The first is
the opening of the film... the "Egg Travels" sequence that was seen in
the initial trailers for the film.  The next one (and the best of the
three) is the meteor shower.  And last is the climactic battle between
Aladar and a T. Rex. 
Finally, there's the rousing score by James Newton Howard, his best (and
most memorable) since 1994's Wyatt Earp.  His score here should be
rewarded at year's end with numerous awards. 
The other aspect of the film's rating is the creative side, and it
unfortunately receives only one star.  Dinosaur is about as creative as
a pile of mud, and only slightly more entertaining.  Amazingly, SEVEN
people are credited with writing Dinosaur (two with the story, three
with the actual screenplay itself, and two with "additional story
material").  I'd love to have sat in on those brainstorming sessions... 
"Good one!  Hey... what if we have one dinosaur who can't keep up and
our hero dinosaur has to keep nudging it and giving words of
encouragement!" 
Hey folks, give me one dollar... that's roughly 1/7th of what you'll pay
to get in to Dinosaur and I'll let you watch me walk.  I'll even bring a
friend along to poke me whenever I can't keep up and to tell me to
"never give up". 
The biggest creative pitfall of Dinosaur is the fact that the dinosaurs
talk.  Now I know there was no chance in hell Di$ney would make a movie
like this without dialogue (no talking plush dolls to sell for $30.00
each), but the film would have been much more effective if it had done
without the talking.  The aforementioned "The Egg Travels" sequence was
so effective without one word of dialogue in it.  You understood all the
action and emotions in the scene without the need for one spoken word. 
So let's talk about talking dinosaurs for a moment then.  I know
Dinosaur is a kid's movie and I know you're not really supposed to argue
logic with kid's movies, but I just can't turn off that part of my brain
like Di$ney wants me to.  My main problem is that the dinosaurs are
using modern day terms and expressions.  Now fine, I'll buy the fact
that the dinosaurs are speaking English even though no such language
existed.  For argument's sake I'll buy that what we're hearing is just
an English translation of dinosaur speak.  But why do they have to use
modern day terminology and catch phrases?  I mean... school? 
Professor?  Love monkey?! 
And how do the characters even know what they are?  Characters are aware
if they are a monkey or a T. Rex or whatever... but these are terms
humans came up with to describe animals.  Dinosaurs didn't tell us what
they wanted to be called.  Then there's a BRITISH dinosaur.  If all the
dinosaurs had one accent (American, Russian, Norwegian, whatever...) I'd
have been fine.  But having different accents in there just throws
everything out of whack.  (Yes, I realize that the entire language
itself was made up by humans so technically the dinosaurs shouldn't know
any of the words at all, but when they speak they... oh dear I've gone
cross-eyed.) 
The dinosaur hierarchy also doesn't make any sense.  One dinosaur has a
pet dinosaur, and the pet dinosaur behaves like a dog and is unable to
speak.  Why?  And the "villain" of the film, the T. Rex, doesn't talk
either.  If you're going to aim for every cliché in the book (and the
writers clearly were), then why not make the T. Rex all creepy and
menacing by casting Jeremy Irons or Dennis Hopper to do its voice? 
If you want to see a kid cry, go up to one leaving the theater. 
Dinosaur actually has a happy ending, with surviving dinosaurs
frolicking in the promised land without a care in the world.  Go up to
that kid and tell him or her that about a week after the movie is over,
all the cute little dinosaurs they just fell in love with will be dead. 
It's fun, and historically accurate. 
Dinosaur is rated PG for some intense scenes, and deservedly so.  But
the audience I saw the film with didn't seem to care.  Kids are
fascinated with dinosaurs... they're the only monsters we tell kids
about that actually exist.  They'll laugh at the monkeys and at the
stupid dialogue and make their parents take them to see it over and over
again, earning Di$ney billions of dollars.  And at Di$ney, that's all
they care about.  [PG]
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
AOL Instant Messenger: FilmJax
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Zero Effect (1998)
Cast: Bill Pullman, Ben Stiller, Kim Dickens, Ryan O'Neal, Angela
Featherstone
Written and Directed by: Jake Kasdan
Running Time: 115 minutes
Zero Effect is a modern day, 1990s style Sherlock Holmes story.  Every
element of a Holmes tale is here, from the eccentric detective to the
loyal assistant to the drug use... its all blatently there.  I'm not a
big Holmes fan, but this update isn't so bad.
Bill Pullman plays the brilliant yet socially disturbed detective
Darryl Zero. He can solve cases merely by sitting and thinking about
them, with the help of course of tuna fish, tomato soup, Tab, and lots
of drugs. He accepts his cases through his faithful assistant, played
by Ben Stiller. In the film, he works a case for businessman Ryan
O'Neal, investigating just who is blackmailing him. And despite the
fact that Zero seems to solve the case right away (the first 15
minutes of the film actually), he keeps investigating. Obviously, Zero
believes there's more to it that what he's uncovered.
Zero Effect is unbelievably slow going, yet somehow remains compelling
enough to make it watchable until the very end. The performances are
all good, particularly Pullman. Also, the film feels like it's a black
comedy, but instead it comes across as merely quirky. A laugh or two
would have been nice.
Zero Effect is the debut from Kasdan, who just so happens to be the son
of writer-director Lawrence Kasdan. [R]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL: http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email: chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1995-1998 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be
reprinted without permission.

Title
Review for Star Trek: First Contact (1996)
[Note that followups are directed to rec.arts.movies.current-films and
rec.arts.movies.startrek.current only, not to rec.arts.sf.movies.  -Moderator]
Star Trek:First Contact (1996) ** out of ***** - C:Patrick Stewart,
Jonathan Frakes, Brent Spiner, LeVar Burton, Michael Dorn, Gates McFadden,
Marina Sirtis, James Cromwell, Alfre Woodard, Dwight Schultz, Robert
Picardo.
***This review does contain spoilers***
I was completely unprepared for how bad this movie is. After seeing about a
thousand commercials for the newest Star Trek adventure, I was sold.
Finally, Starfleet battles their dreaded enemy from the series, the Borg.
Finally, an action packed Star Trek movie which many had called "Die Hard on
the Enterprise". I was one of the first in line. Once it began, I couldn't
keep from wanting to leave.
If you are a casual Star Trek fan, you'll be lost from the first minute. If
you are a serious Star Trek fan, I think you'll feel cheated. First of all,
nothing is really explained in the film. As soon as the film starts, the
Borg attack. You aren't even given a second to settle into the film. And
after that it's just "kill the Borg". How are they doing it? Don't ask. Just
watch. Will it make sense? No. Just watch.
When we first see Geordi (Burton), he is no longer wearing his visor. He
apparently no longer needs it. Well when did that happen? In the last film,
the Enterprise was completely destroyed. So are we introduced to the new
ship as we were in the original Star Trek film? Nope, not even for a second.
When the Enterprise was destroyed in "The Search for Spock" and in
"Generations", you cared because the characters cared. Here, when the ship
is facing destruction, who cares? Blow it up. Starfleet has changed their
uniforms AGAIN, now they look like jumpsuits from the 1970s. Would you feel
safe being protected by an organization in charge of defending the universe
that can't even make up their minds about how to dress?
Also, none of the characters in the film even seem familiar anymore. Data
has emotions now, so he's just like anyone else. The rest of the crew is
given little or nothing to do. Captain Picard (Stewart) turns into a madman
upon encountering the Borg, because of events which took place during the
series' third and fourth seasons. Forget the fact that the Enterprise crew
encountered the Borg two more times after that in the series. They act as if
those seemingly important events never happened. I don't like that. It's
like I'm being lied to.
The Borg as an enemy seemed vicious in the series, but now they seem pretty
ridiculous. As smart and advanced as these things are, they still only
attack when provoked. This is how they always lose, because the crew just
stops fighting them and figures some other way to destroy them. The Borg
will just walk right by members of the crew as long as they aren't a direct
threat. Meanwhile those crew members keep on walking and eventually devise a
way to destroy them. This is a movie folks! You writers could have raised
the stakes just a little!
A Borg leader is introduced here, something which also seems to be a
contridiction from the series. Picard confronts her and tells her that he
destroyed her years ago. She admits that is true, but that humans need to
look beyond thinking 3 dimensionally, perhaps meaning that the Borg cannot
be killed by conventional means. But then, later in the film, she and the
other Borg are killed by some sort of gas that was contained in the engine
room, which had become their hive. (That poses the Wizard of Oz question: If
water killed you, why would you keep a bucket of it near you?) So what was
the point of all that discussion?
Also, in the TV series, the writers made a point to explain EVERYTHING, even
if it was just a technobabble explanation. Never once can I recall did I
question the logic of any episode of "The Next Generation". Here, they don't
bother to explain anything. The Borg have developed time travel
capabilities. They send only one ship to Earth (just as they did before, way
to learn from previous mistakes borgies) and then send a smaller ship back
in time upon reaching Earth. Well, the Enterprise is prepared for this
because they see it happening. Wouldn't it make sense to go back in time
BEFORE reaching Earth so no one knows you're doing it? Again, these "fierce"
enemies seem stupid.
There's a pointless time travel subplot which doesn't make any sense either.
Throughout the history of Star Trek, everyone always made a big deal about
time travel, about how not to interfere with events in the past. Well not
only does the crew interfere with MAJOR events, they actually participate in
them too! Ridiculous.
For a series which prided itself in continuity and details, it's shocking to
see that this film throws all of that out of the window. There's a Star Trek
novel called "Vendetta" which deals with the Borg, and that would have been
far superior to this. Maybe when making the next film, the filmmakers can
pretend that this one didn't happen. Why not? They got plenty of practice
ignoring their own history in this one.
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Reply to: chuckd21@southeast.net
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office

Title
Review for Twin Peaks: Fire Walk with Me (1992)
NO STARS - C:Sheryl Lee, Ray Wise, Kiefer Sutherland, Kyle MacLachlin,
Madchen Amick, Dana Ashbrook, David Bowie, Eric DaRe, Miguel Ferrer,
Heather Graham, Chris Issac, Moira Kelly, Peggy Lipton, James Marshall,
Jurgen Prochnow, Harry Dean Stanton, Lenny von Dohlen, Grace Zabriskie,
Frank Silva, Walter Olkewicz, Al Strobel.
I was a big fan of the ABC television series, and most likely the only one
according to the ratings. (Well, my mom watched it too but we both watched
it on the same TV so that really doesn't count now does it?) I was also one
of the first in line the day the film opened. After watching it, I can
safely say that I have never come out of a theater angry, as I did that day.
Not disappointed, but angry. The first twenty minutes of the film were quite
promising, but after that it's one of the worst films of all time,
regardless if you are a fan of the TV show or not.
The TV show was really all about a murder in a small town and the
investigation which followed. The show lasted a year and a half, and the
final episode ended with a cliffhanger. So when It was announced that a
feature film was being made, I was more than overjoyed. Well guess what, the
film turns out to be a prequel to the TV show and just shows in detail (and
I do mean detail) the events that happened the week before the murder. These
are events that we already knew about and were satisfied with the way they
were presented. There was no reason to make this film about those events.
What writer/ director /creator David Lynch should have done is to continue
on with the show from the final episode instead of retreading on familiar
material.
Halfway through this mess, the film seems to jump forward in time, but then
again not really. Anyway, a reference is made to the cliffhanger ending and
you would think that would mean that eventually, before the film is over,
that plot line will be resolved. It's not. It's not even really mentioned
again. I think Lynch slipped that scene into the film so that the audience
wouldn't walk out, that bastard.
Twin Peaks:Fire Walk With Me is loaded with contradictions from the TV show,
and unnecessary language, violence, nudity, and sex. The hero of the TV
series, cool FBI agent Dale Cooper (MacLachlin) is reduced to a mere cameo.
The only good thing about the film is the score. This was easily the worst
film from all of 1992. It was even booed when it was shown at the Cannes
Film Festival, and deservedly so.
There are many other problems I had with the film, but thay are all plot
specific and only people who watched both the show and the film would
understand them. If your interested, email me at chuckd21@southeast.net and
I'll discuss them with you in detail.
Please visit my movie reviews web site at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
You'll be glad you did.

Title
Review for Battlefield Earth (2000)
Cast: John Travolta, Barry Pepper, Forest Whitaker, Kim Coates, Richard
Tyson, Kelly Preston 
Written by: Corey Mandell 
Directed by: Roger Christian 
Running Time: 117 minutes 
Battlefield Earth is the worst film of 2000, and I guarantee you that
nothing else this year will even come close.  In fact, I'll be surprised
if I see anything this bad in the next TEN years. 
Based on the novel by Scientology guru L. Ron Hubbard, Battlefield Earth
begins and we immediately find out two pieces of key information.  It's
the year 3000, and an alien race called the Psychlos (which sounds like
a tag team of Mexican wrestlers) conquered our planet in nine minutes. 
Ok, we are all of 10 seconds in and I have a zillion questions racing
through my mind.  When were we conquered?  The audience is led to
believe that this happened about 1,000 years earlier, and if that is the
case then we're going to get into a whole BUNCH of problems later (trust
me... keep reading).  Also, why don't we get to see Earth get
conquered?  How the hell do you make a popcorn sci-fi flick and not
deliver the goods on the one event that sets up the film? 
Humans now live as cavemen or slave labor, and for the film's first act
we focus on one particular cavemen group outside of Denver, Colorado. 
They grunt and groan and babble about monsters.  So, when the Psychlos
conquered Earth, were the only humans not captured a herd of newborn
babies that crawled their way to safety in the hills?  None of these
characters have any knowledge of the planet being conquered (whenever
that was).  This is definitely NOT the way to start an action/sci-fi
film. 
One of the humans wanders out into the wilderness and stumbles across
what he thinks is a monster, and he begins to fight it.  The "monster"
turns out to be a dinosaur from an old miniature golf course.  He turns
around and sees all sorts of other characters from the golf course, with
some shrubs growing over them.  So, in 1,000 years this stupid little
golf course has stood the test of time, with only a few weeds growing
over it? 
Anyway, some of the humans are captured by the Psychlos led by Terl
(John Travolta) a smarmy and opportunistic alien planning on stealing a
recently discovered gold deposit.  The cavemen (led by Barry Pepper) are
forced to do their bidding or whatever, but eventually they gain the
upper hand and reclaim the planet, or something.  So these cavemen are
able to do what Earth failed to do 1,000 years earlier?  And, we're
supposed to believe that Earth was conquered in nine minutes by a group
of buffoonish aliens who can't even handle a few cavemen? 
One of the ways the humans reclaim the planet is by taking control of
abandoned Air Force jets and using them to fight the Psychlos.  So jets
left unattended for 1,000 years are still able to fly?  Please, if I
leave my car unattended for two weeks I have to replace every fluid and
hose under the hood.  Why did the Psychlos leave jets around anyway? 
Shouldn't they have destroyed military installations during their
massive nine minute campaign against us? 
The Psychlos refer to humans as "man animals" but yet dogs are still
"dogs".  Why aren't they "dog animals"?  The Psychlos are after mining
Earth's precious resources, but for 1,000 years are unaware of Fort
Knox?  Why do I even care at this point? 
I'm a fan of Travolta's and I'm glad to see he's back on the A-List in
Hollywood (despite the fact that he occasionally puts out crowd pleasing
dreck like Michael and Phenomenon).  But how did he possibly think this
was a good movie?  And how did he think he was giving a good performance
here?  He's more than capable of making a menacing villain (see Broken
Arrow and Face/Off) but whenever his character came on screen I couldn't
hold back my laughter.  Now despite the different facial features
members of this alien race seem to have, Travolta just looks like
Travolta.  All of the other aliens have weird foreheads or other pointy
bones on their face, but Travolta just has a goatee.  Also, Travolta's
acts with a sort of phony upper-class snooty accent and constantly
whines about bureaucratic nonsense back on his home world.  Ooooo, scary
villain.  As a producer he should know better and as an actor he should
DEFINITELY know better. 
You can make a dumb but good sci-fi film (I love Independence Day for
example), but there is absolutely NOTHING entertaining about Battlefield
Earth.  I did everything I possibly could to stay awake during the
screening... I cleaned my glasses, walked around the theater, made a
grocery list, chose my lottery numbers for the week, replayed Super Bowl
XXV in my head (with commercials)... and still was compelled to
scrutinize the insides of my eyelids. 
By the time we actually reach the year 3000, people should still be
avoiding this film.  Folks, save your cash.. don't go see it, don't rent
it, and don't buy it.  You'd be more entertained by taking the money
you'd use for this movie and just throwing it into the wind, watching it
sail away (hell, send it to us here at The Jacksonville Film Journal...
we'll entertain you plenty with that kind of money).  Unless of course
you're just captivated by countless slow motion shots of Barry Pepper
running, which is just about all you'll come away with from this movie. 
That, and a headache. 
[Editor's Note: For some reason though, the day after my screening I
converted to Scientology.  I'm not sure why... something just made me
feel compelled make the choice.] 
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
AOL Instant Messenger: FilmJax
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Species II (1998)
Cast: Michael Madsen, Marg Helgenberger, Mykelti Williamson, George
Dzundza, James Cromwell, Natasha
Henstridge, Justin Lazard, Peter Boyle, Richard Belzer
Written by: Chris Brancato
Directed by: Peter Medak
Running Time: 92 minutes
Well well well, the sequel I never wanted has arrived. Before I review
Species II however, let me recap how the first film ended. As you'll
no doubt recall, Sil (Natasha Henstridge) turned into a computer
graphic, gave birth to a son who also turned into a computer graphic,
but were both destroyed by government hitman Michael Madsen. BUT, a
piece of one of the alien creatures was eaten by a rat, and now the
alien was alive and well inside the little rat critter. Obviously rats
breed quickly, and so mankind was surely doomed.
Well forget all that! In true horror movie style, the ending of the
previous film just didn't happen. Instead, our story starts with a
manned mission to Mars. Astronaut Justin Lazard lands on Mars,
collects soil samples, and reboards the ship. Unfortunately for the
crew of the ship, those soil samples just happen to contain the same
alien DNA that Sil was created from (don't ask why it's on Mars, when
in the first film we're told it came from an advanced alien species
via outer space radio communications). Soon, two-thirds of the ship's
crew is infected with the alien DNA. Upon their return to earth, the
alien DNA inside them wants them to breed, which Lazard then tries to
do with every woman he meets.
Let's talk about bad writing. For example, the astronauts are greeted
in space with a video message from the president of the United States
(Richard Belzer, doing his awful Ronald Reagan impression). Later, in
the office of a US Senator (James Cromwell) a picture of president
Bill Clinton is blatantly visible on the wall, as it would be in any
government office. Then, upon returning home the astronauts are put
into "quarantine" which for some reason only means sexual
quarantine... they can go out and socialize with the world... just no
sex. Really? Is that the only NASA protocol after being on Mars? Also,
Madsen and Helgenberger were starting to be romantically involved by
the end of the first film. Now, they hardly even speak to each other,
with no explanation as to what's happened between them. There's plenty
more too... but I just don't feel like wasting any more of my life
writing about it.
As with almost all bad sci-fi/horror films, the filmmakers try to hide
the fact that the script is awful by piling on the blood and
gore. Species II is no exception. Lots of stomachs bursting open
(Alien anyone?) and mutililation for you fans of that sort of thing,
along with blood, blood, and more blood.
Natasha Henstridge has an extended cameo as another hybrid alien named
Eve that we've created for whatever reason the writer was able to
concoct to get Natasha Henstridge in the film. Oh and yes for you fans
of naked Natasha, she gets naked again. Also, James Cromwell and
George Dzundza have absolutely no business in this film
whatsoever. Both of them overact for no reason at all, and their
characters contribute nothing to the story being told. What a waste.
There were only three brief moments in the film that made it
worthwhile.  The first is a quick moment at the beginning when we see
that the space program is now funded by big corporations like Pepsi,
which have advertisements on the spacecraft heading to Mars. The other
two involve Michael Madsen (who, like in the first film, gives an
entertaining performance but yet never seems to take any of the events
going on around him seriously). One moment has to do with a
confrontation between Madsen and a pimp in a wheelchair. The second
involves Madsen in a grocery store, where after colliding with a
clerk, he pulls his gun on him and violently asks where the cereal
aisle is. I seriously doubt either of those two moments could have
been scripted.
At the end of Species II after about the most uninvolving "battle with
aliens" scene you'll ever see, we're given not just one, not two, but
THREE different possibilites for a third film. Each of them is equally
absurd, but how much would you care to bet that if a third film is
made (god forbid) that all three will be completely brushed aside? [R]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL: http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email: chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1995-1998 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be
reprinted without permission.

Title
Review for Deep Rising (1998)
DEEP RISING (1998)
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling
Copyright 1998 - The Jacksonville Film Journal
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Say, who thought combining "Speed 2:Cruise Control" and "Deep Star Six" was
a good idea? Why it's none other than writer-director Stephan Sommers,
that's who. He's the one to blame. He's the one to hurl your stones at.
Let's do that now shall we?
Treat Williams stars as a complete and total rip-off of Han Solo, a sea
pirate of sorts taking on missions for lots of cash (at one point he
actually says "I've got a bad feeling about this..." straight from the mouth
of Solo). Anyway, as the film opens we learn that he's been hired by the
most racially balanced group of terrorists you'll ever meet. I believe every
nationality aside from maybe the eskimos and people from Atlantis are
represented by this group. Their plan (from what I can understand, since
it's never discussed in any real detail) is to hijack a super-expensive
cruise ship on it's maiden voyage and sink it, so it's owner can collect the
insurance money. When they arrive onboard though, they have a surprise
waiting for them: slimy sea monsters!
First of all, I know previews are misleading sometimes, but this is the
first time I can ever remember a trailer just downright LYING to the
audience. In the trailers, when we see footage of the terrorists walking
around the ship, the omnious voice over tells us that "They answered a
distress call". THAT'S NOT WHAT THEY WE'RE DOING AT ALL!!! They actually had
to lie to the audience, because they must have realized that NO ONE WILL
CARE about seeing terrorists eaten one by one by sea monsters.
I can give the film credit in two areas. One being the stunts and visual
effects. Granted yes, the effects are computer graphics, but these are
pretty good ones. Most of the time they seem fairly realistic, for monsters
anyway. The other would be the film's ending. Now normally I loathe it when
films (especially horror films) end the way "Deep Rising" does, but in this
case I don't mind at all. These people deserve this ending.
"Deep Rising" is one of those movies that's so bad, it's almost a fun
experience. For example: At the heart of the plot we have the fact that the
ship's owner, who worked all his life to build the ship, wants the boat
destroyed because he just realized that the cost to keep the boat up and
running far exceeds the money he'll make. WHAT??? You devote your life to
something and yet don't bother working out such an important detail like
that? It's that level of stupidity that sinks "Deep Rising". That, and the
fact that you've seen this done, oh, a million times before, and a million
times better. [R]
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed at The Jacksonville Film Journal.
Web address: http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/

Title
Review for Bug's Life, A (1998)
Cast: Dave Foley, Kevin Spacey, Julia Louis-Dreyfus, Phyllis Diller,
Richard Kind, David Hyde Pierce, Denis Leary,
Madeline Kahn, Bonnie Hunt, John Ratzenberger, Roddy McDowall, Edie
McClurg, Alex Rocco, David L. Lander
Written by: John Lassiter, Andrew Stanton, Joe Ranft, Don McEnery and
Bob Shaw
Directed by: John Lassiter and Andrew Stanton
Running Time: 95 minutes
A Bug's Life is the second of 1998's cartoon bug movies, this one from
Disney and Pixar (who made 1995's Toy Story).  It's 180 degrees
different from the year's previous bug film, Dreamworks' Antz.  Where
Antz was more adult in it's tone and more realistic in it's appearance,
A Bug's Life is strictly for the kids.  It's Disney... what did you
expect?
A Bug's Life is about a colony of ants who are terrorized by a group of
grasshoppers, led by the oh-so-cleverly named Hopper (voice of Kevin
Spacey).  Flik (voice of Dave Foley) is an accident prone misfit in the
ant colony who is sent off to find "tough bugs" to help the ants fight
the evil grasshoppers.  He stumbles across a group of bugs in an "insect
bar" who he believes are the answer to his problems, but as it turns out
they are just a group of circus performing bugs.  Flik leads these bugs
back to his colony where comic misadventures occur, as you'd expect.  I
never thought I'd see anyone remake Three Amigos... but Disney has done
it.
The DVD release of A Bug's Life contains both the original widescreen
2.35:1 version of the film, and "a specially
rendered full-screen version which bypassed the usual film-to-video
transfer by going direct from the digital source
to DVD master".  Those of you who care about such technical details
should understand what I just said (and those
of you that don't won't care).  Both sets of "bloopers" from the film's
end credits are also on the disc.
The computer animation is simply fantastic in A Bug's Life.  Yes granted
the bugs have been "Disney-ed up" a great
deal, as the ants are cute blue creatures with more human-like features
than insect ones.  The colors are bright and
vibrant, and the picture is crystal clear.  A visual delight, if you
will.
Also included on the disc is the Pixar short film "Geri's Game," which
won an Oscar.  Other than that there are no
extras whatsoever... certainly nothing to justify the DVD's $35 retail
cost.  The Signature Selection release of
Antz on DVD absolutely destroys this disc in terms of extras.  Fans of
special editions on DVD (myself being one)
deserve more.
Kids should enjoy this one much more than Antz, but parents could go for
either one.  To me, A Bug's Life was
equally as entertaining as Antz... it's rarely laugh out loud funny but
it's never boring either.  It's nice to look at,
and the cast and their voice acting is excellent.  A pleasant way to
spend an hour and a half.  [G]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email:chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted
without permission.

Title
Review for H.O.T.S. (1979)
Cast: Susan Kiger, Lisa London, Pamela Jean Bryant, Kimberly Cameron,
Angela Aames, Lindsey Bloom, K.C. Winkler, Donald Petrie, Danny
Bonaduce, Ken Olfson, Richard Bakalyan, Louis Guss 
Written by: Joan Buchanan and Cheri Caffaro 
Directed by: Gerald Seth Sindell 
Running Time: 98 minutes 
"No more shenanigans!!!" 
--- An exasperated Dean Chase (Ken Olfson), trying to shut down the
H.O.T.S. sorority in H.O.T.S. 
H.O.T.S. features a group of shall we say "top heavy" college girls who,
after being rejected for membership in the prestigious Pi sorority at
Fairenville University, decide to get even by starting their own
sorority and stealing away every man on campus.  A heartwarming tale
indeed. 
Quite surprisingly though, H.O.T.S. is a good natured, entertaining
little romp of a movie.  Sure there's nothing original here, as it
follows the 70's college T&A genre to the letter and then some
(concentrating heavily on the "T" portion of said genre), but so what? 
Now normally, the right-minded movie critic in me should be trashing
this film, calling it degrading to women and whatnot.  However, let me
point out that the movie was written by two women. 
Let me also point out that this movie is just entertainingly goofy from
start to finish.  The girls in the cast, many of whom were Playboy
Playmates, are attractive in that 70s kind of way, and the performances
are so far over the top that you can't help but be entertained by them. 
And how could you not like a movie that features a topless skydiver
named Boom-Boom Bangs? 
In addition to the main "plot" of seducing all the men on campus (which
while discussed, really doesn't happen that much in the film), there are
dozens of subplots, each one as charmingly absurd as the next.  For
example, the girls have to contend with two bumbling crooks who've
recently escaped from jail and are attempting to infiltrate the H.O.T.S.
house.  The crooks are trying to recover the stolen loot they stashed
there before they were incarcerated, and they make several "wacky"
attempts to enter the house. 
In an odd plotline that ultimately ties into the previously mentioned
one, some of the guys from Fairenville University steal a rival school's
mascot, a huge black bear (animals are a running theme in H.O.T.S. by
the way, as the girls keep a live seal in their sorority house as a
mascot).  The bear manages to escape from the van it's in and ends up
taking a swim in the H.O.T.S. girls' swimming pool.  While swimming, the
bear gets a whiff of something and proceeds to climb a ladder to the top
of the H.O.T.S. house.  In the attic, the bear finds a bee hive and
enjoys some honey.  The bear then remains in the attic UNDETECTED FOR
DAYS until eventually foiling the bumbling crooks, as the money was
stashed in the attic.  Later, the bear flies a hot air balloon (don't
ask). 
A couple of cast and crew members from H.O.T.S. of note: Donald Petrie
who plays "Doug" is now a successful director, scoring big with Grumpy
Old Men, one of my personal favorites.  Rowdy Herrington, who served as
an electrician, is also a successful director with films like Road House
and Striking Distance under his belt.  And Danny Bonaduce of course went
on to fight Geraldo Rivera (or was it Donny Osmond?  I forget...) on Pay
Per View. 
But you don't care about any of that do you?  Nah, if you're interested
in this movie then you're interested in one thing: boobs.  Well, there
are boobs-a-plenty in H.O.T.S., as was the standard with this genre. 
They come early and often too... showers, wet T-shirt contests, and
there's a grand finale of boobery with a strip football game between the
H.O.T.S. girls and the Pi Sorority.  The members of the M.P.A.A. would
probably have heart attacks today trying to rate this film, as you just
don't see so many naked breasts in today's R-rated flicks.  [Editor's
note: For whatever reason, boobs is just a fun word to write.  Try it
yourself sometime.  Boobs, boobs...] 
H.O.T.S. is available on DVD from Anchor Bay Entertainment.  The disc
contains the film in its original theatrical aspect ratio of 1.85:1 (and
is enhanced for 16x9 televisions), and includes the original theatrical
trailer.  The transfer for this film is better than you'd expect... the
images are crisp and clear and free of artifacts.  Give Anchor Bay a lot
of credit for continually restoring and releasing the smaller films out
there.  If you enjoy this type of campy fun, then this is a good disc to
add to your library.  [R]
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
AOL Instant Messenger: FilmJax
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Thin Line Between Love and Hate, A (1996)
A Thin Line Between Love and Hate (1996) NO STARS out of ***** - C:Martin
Lawrence, Lynn Whitfield, Bobby Brown, Della Reese, Roger E. Mosley.
Martin Lawrence stars in, wrote, produced, directed, and supervised the
music of this absolutely dreadful "movie" about what might be one of the
most unlikable main characters in movie history.
Lawrence plays a "ladies man" who has dedicated his life to the pursuit of
women, just so he can have sex with them once and then dump them.
Immediately, NO ONE should care what happens to this man. He soon meets his
match (Whitfield), who leads him on for days and then decides to take
revenge when she realizes she's been used and lied to. Immediately, EVERYONE
should be rooting for this woman. However, the film is written so that
Lawrence is the good guy in the situation, and Whitfield is just a crazy
psycho.
Pauly Shore is a brilliant comedian compared to Lawrence, and I absolutely
HATE Pauly Shore. Also, like Adam Sandler in "Billy Madison", not once in
the film can Lawrence say a line of dialogue normally. At least one word in
each sentence has to be exaggerated for no reason whatsoever and after about
five minutes it couldn't be more irritating. "A Thin Line Between Love and
Hate" is easily one of the worst films of the year and most definately one
of the worst "comedies" of all time. I think that being murdered would be
funnier than this movie.
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office
reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for Night Moves (1975)
Cast: Gene Hackman, Susan Clark, Jennifer Warren, Harris Yulin, Kenneth
Mars, James Woods, Melanie Griffith, Dennis Dugan 
Written by: Alan Sharp 
Directed by: Arthur Penn 
Running Time: 75 minutes 
Harry Moseby (Gene Hackman) is an ex-football star turned private
detective.  After taking a case to find the daughter of a former
actress, he learns that his wife (Susan Clark) is having an affair, and
the film then tries (slightly unsuccessfully) to juggle both
storylines.  Unfortunately, the film derails midway through and has a
difficult time getting back on track.  Things do come together well at
the end, but becomes taxing getting to that point.  
The title seems to be a reference to chess, as Harry discusses several
"knight moves" while reenacting a famous chess match from years past. 
However, since this film is called "Night Moves" and not "Knight Moves"
then the title seems to denote some sort of double meaning.  Much of the
movie does take place at night however, so maybe that's what it's
referring to.  Aside from all that, the film is most notable for the
debut of Melanie Griffith, who plays the subject of Hackman's
investigation. 
I'd like to include some information directly from the film's original
VHS release box because I doubt it'll ever be seen again.  It's one of
those very old Warner clamshell boxes that has a lot of text on the back
of it pertaining to the film (two or three times that of one of today's
releases would have).  There's a quote from an interview with Gene
Hackman that states "Arthur Penn is a great director because he sees the
special human moment in a scene, outside the dialogue, outside the
scenery; he sees the human animal, he sees the life of the scene.  He's
especially good with people who have never made a picture before.  Both
Melanie Griffith and Jennifer Warren are making their first film with
him and he is really turning them on to the way film works."  The box
later states that "Harry isn't stupid - he's just a little slow". 
That's a odd statement to make, since it's not as if all this
information is presented to Harry and he just doesn't catch on.  He
catches on whenever any information is given to him.  [R]
Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Cube (1997)
Cast: Nicole de Boer, Nicky Guadagni, David Hewlett, Andrew Miller,
Julian Richings, Wayne Robson, Maurice Dean Wint
Written by: Andre Bijelic, Graeme Manson and Vincenzo Natali
Directed by: Vincenzo Natali
Running Time: 90 minutes
You wouldn't think that a Canadian production combining elements of
science fiction, horror, gore, and mathematics
would come together into an entertaining film.  But in Cube, it does.
The premise of Cube is very similar to an episode of "Star Trek:The Next
Generation," but without the predictable
TV series ending.  Six strangers find themselves trapped inside of a
giant cube filled with smaller cube-shaped
rooms.  Certain rooms are trapped however, so it's not so easy to find
an exit.  To counter this, each person
seemingly possesses certain skills to help proceed through the maze and
find their way out.  But then to counter
that, each person also seems to be able to hold the group back.  So why
are they there?  Who's there to help and
who's there to hinder?  Will they be able to escape?
Normally I don't like movies that don't explain themselves, but
sometimes vagueness can be done well (for example,
nothing in the movie Tremors was explained, but it was still
entertaining).  The same goes for Cube.  Nothing is ever
explained.  You won't ever know what's going on, but yet it's still
entertaining to watch.  It's fun to watch the
characters try and figure out the situation that they are in (and you
have to admit, being trapped in a giant cube is
pretty original).  Some of the character's motivations towards the end
started to bug me a little bit (one character
in particular seems to overreact to the situation much more than
expected), but it all ultimately blends together
nicely into a vague yet compelling experience.  [R]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email:chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted
without permission.

Title
Review for Micki + Maude (1984)
Micki and Maude (1984) * out of ***** - Cast: Dudley Moore, Amy Irving, Amy
Reinking, Richard Mulligan, George Gaynes, Wallace Shawn. Directed by: Blake
Edwards. Running Time: 118 minutes.
Absolutely appalling "comedy" about everyone's favorite comedic subject:
bigamy. Moore is married to Reinking, a career woman who's too busy to have
a family at the moment. Moore, who just adores children, immediately has an
affair with Irving. When Irving becomes pregnant, Moore does the proper
thing and marries her... but doesn't bother to divorce his first wife! The
kick is, now she is also pregnant! Let the comedy begin!
This is basically every episode of "Three's Company", as it follows the
guidelines for "farce" right by the book (Moore having to be in two places
at once, etc.). For example, both women go into labor at the same time! What
fun!
People have described "Micki and Maude" as sweet and good-natured. Some
people have a strange idea of entertainment. Just watch the final scene of
the film and think about it for a moment, then decide how "sweet" it really
is. Director Edwards again proves to me that without Peter Sellers, he's
nothing. [PG-13]
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related
links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Screamers (1995)
(1996) ** - C:Peter Weller, Jennifer Rubin.
"Screamers" had so much potential to be a good science fiction film. The
basic story had promise, even though it seems similar to about a dozen
various episodes of "Star Trek". In the year 2078, we have voyaged out into
space and have started to mine other planets for minerals. A dispute erupts
between the miners and the mining corporation and war is declared. The
miners develop a security system of little tiny robots who live under the
sand and attack any living thing that comes near them. Well, soon these
little robots start to evolve and begin to enhance themselves into bigger
mechanisms, ready to attack the people who created them and start their own
race.
Somehow, in one step, these robots evolve from little tiny things into
humanoid robots, able to blend in with other people and fool almost anyone.
That doesn't make sense. There has to be some sort of evolution into
something between the two. The film basically takes place in the desert and
in dirty, lifeless bunkers, two places which are boring locations to tell a
story. And the very last shot of the film is completely ridiculous. Can't a
horror or sci-fi movie just end anymore? Do we always need a little
"surprise" two seconds before the end credits roll? It's getting to the
point that I'm surprised when there ISN'T a little twist in the final
moments. Peter Weller ("RoboCop") does his best with what he's given to do,
but it's just not enough to save this mess.
What had potential to become a fun and tense sci-fi flick, is ruined by poor
writing, a depressingly downbeat tone, and very cheesy special effects. The
lack of good writing can somewhat be blamed on the author of the short story
on which the film is based, Phillip K. Dick, who is also responsible for the
equally bleak and unentertaining "Blade Runner".
Have A Question Or Comment? Email Me At chuckd21@southeast.net
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,500 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for Fall of the Roman Empire, The (1964)
Cast: Sophia Loren, Stephen Boyd, Alec Guinness, James Mason,
Christopher Plummer, Anthony Quayle, Omar Sharif, John Ireland, Mel
Ferrer 
Written by: Ben Barzman, Basilio Franchina and Philip Yordan 
Directed by: Anthony Mann 
Running Time: 188 minutes 
The title says it all, or so you'd think... read on. 
Roman emperor Marcus Aurelius (Alec Guinness) is nearing the end of his
life.  Livius (Stephen Boyd) is his chosen successor and commander of
Rome's Northern Army.  Livius refuses the offer however, for fear of
confusing the Roman people and the historical lineage of power.  This
delights Marcus Aurelius' son Commodus (Christopher Plummer), who feared
he'd lose his chance to be emperor.  Once in power, Commodus sets forth
selfish and maniacal events which lead to the destruction of the mighty
Roman Empire. 
The main problem with The Fall of the Roman Empire is that it too often
chooses to focus on spectacle over story.  There is indeed an epic story
to be told here, but the film would rather us concentrate on the
vastness of the Roman Empire instead of it.  I understand the importance
of establishing how big the Empire was, as it is crucial to the story,
but it takes up too much screen time and ends up holding the story back. 
For example, there comes a moment early in the film where seemingly a
million horses are paraded in front of the camera.  Yes, the Empire was
huge and had millions of horses.  But from a storytelling standpoint, it
does nothing for the audience.  Nothing but horses for ten minutes
straight is boring.  Soon after, a scene comes where Marcus Aurelius and
his advisor Timonides (James Mason) greet representatives from other
areas of the Roman Empire.  This scene lasts forever, without any
noticeable point except to eat up time. 
Another strike against the film is the heavy emphasis on the romantic
clichés of the era.  There are way too many soft focus close ups of
Marcus Aurelius' daughter Lucilla (Sophia Loren) as her eyes are tearing
up, or too many instances where someone (usually Loren) is struggling
with his or her romantic feelings so forcefully that they have no choice
but to clutch a pole or a tree and place their hand against their
forehead in emotional turmoil. 
The only saving graces of The Fall of the Roman Empire are the
production design, some outstanding performances, and some decent action
sequences.  The sets in the film are tremendous and effectively show the
sheer enormity of the Empire at the time.  Nothing about them is cheesy
in the slightest, giving the film a very realistic feel.  Modern day
efforts would certainly use digital effects.  And while their appearance
does tend to make the film drag, the constant parading of horses and
extras in front of the camera for the film is amazing.  If I remember my
trivia correctly, The Fall of the Roman Empire boasted the largest
amount of extras ever for a Hollywood film (a record which still might
stand today). 
Christopher Plummer shines in this early performance of his long
career.  Plummer plays Commodus with just the right mix of subtle
slyness and flat out dementia to make the character believable and not a
cliché.  Surprising me most however, was James Mason in his role of
Timonides.  I've never paid much attention to Mason before, and I've
only seen a couple of his films.  He has two very strong scenes in The
Fall of the Roman Empire... one where he tries to convince a tribe of
Barbarians to join the Empire and is tortured as a result, and another
where he gives a passionate speech about the benefits of ending slavery
to the Roman Senate.  I'll be seeking out some of Mason's films now as a
result of his performance here. 
Two action sequences stand out, both involving battles between Livius
and Commodus.  The first comes early in the film, when the two men have
a difference of opinion on the execution of army deserters.  This leads
to a fight as the two men race each other on chariots along a perilous
road.  The other comes during the film's finale, as Livius and Commodus
fight to the death over control of the Empire.  Neither scene stands up
to the action sequences of today, but both are good when considering the
era which they're from. 
The most disappointing moment of the film comes at the very end, when a
narrator (whose presence would have been a benefit throughout the story,
clueing us in on the passage of time and key events which take place off
camera) announces, "This was the beginning of the fall of the Roman
Empire..."  Really?  Well, I paid to see the FALL of the Roman Empire,
not just the beginning of it.  Maybe audiences in the 1960s just didn't
mind being lied to. 
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
AOL Instant Messenger: FilmJax
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Sixth Sense, The (1999)
Cast: Bruce Willis, Toni Collette, Olivia Williams, Haley Joel Osment,
Donnie Wahlberg 
Written and Directed by: M. Night Shyamalan 
Running Time: 107 minutes 
When I saw The Sixth Sense for the first time during its theatrical run,
I knew ahead of time that there was something amazing coming.  I knew
that there was this fantastic ending that I was told I'd love.  So even
though I was looking for something, when the end twist finally presented
itself it was one of those moments where my jaw actually dropped.  I'm
not saying that as a cliché... my mouth literally fell open in
amazement. 
So now, by watching it again for a second time to review the DVD
release, comes the joy of getting to go back and pick up on all the
little details I missed the first time around (because I wasn't even
looking for them).  As a result, the first hour of the film (which I
originally felt was dull and stretched too thin because we were all
awaiting the inevitable "I see dead people" plot revelation anyway) is
now completely absorbing.  I originally gave the film four stars, but
upon a second viewing, I've bumped it up to five.  The Sixth Sense is
fascinating now, from start to finish.  It's one of the best told
stories I've seen in a long, long time. 
The performances in this film are fantastic.  In particular, young Haley
Joel Osment is the best child actor I think I've seen on film since the
kids from the early scenes of It's A Wonderful Life (scenes that ANY
child actor should be forced to watch by the way).  Forget his Best
Supporting Oscar nod, he's the star of this film... he should have been
up for Best Actor. 
The Sixth Sense:Collector's Edition is available on DVD from Hollywood
Pictures Home Video (a department of Di$ney).  It contains the film in
its original theatrical aspect ratio of 1.85:1 (enhanced for 16x9
televisions) and Dolby Digital 5.1 Surround Sound.  Also included are
several documentary segments covering many aspects of the film's
evolution, deleted scenes, and the usual cast and crew information.  The
original theatrical trailer and two TV spots are also on the disc. 
The making of segments are great, especially considering the fact that
Di$ney never EVER does extras.  Best of all is the "Rules and Clues"
segment where many of the major plot points of the film are presented at
once.  Also, the deleted scenes are all presented with introductions by
writer/director M. Night Shyamalan.  Other discs usually throw deleted
scenes out there and we have no idea where they were supposed to fall in
the grand scheme of the film.  One deleted scene, an extension of the
film's finale, packs quite an emotional wallop and I actually prefer it
to the film's actual ending. 
But just when it seems as though Di$ney does the right thing with their
DVD content, they manage to screw things up even worse.  Apparently
their new policy is to attach a plethora of upcoming Disney trailers at
the beginning of each DVD that you CANNOT SKIP PAST to go directly to
the main menu.  You instead have to watch them or you can fast forward
through them (which means yes, you're still watching them).  Making it
even more absurd is the fact that you are given an option on the menu
screen to watch these trailers AGAIN.  I'm all for extra trailers on a
disc, but I'd like it to be up to me if I decide to watch them or not. 
Hey Di$ney, when will the amount of money you guys have be enough?  When
will it be enough so that you can start acting like the other major
studios? 
Aside from that minor nuisance, The Sixth Sense on DVD is a great
addition to your library.  You get one of the very best movies of the
1990's along with some good extras.  I'll give Di$ney the credit it
deserves here... they're on the right path.  I hope they don't blow it.
[PG-13]
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Zhong an zu (1993)
Crime Story (1993) ***1/2 out of ***** - Cast: Jackie Chan. Directed by:
Kirk Wong. Running Time: 103 minutes.
Being released officially for the first time in the US, "Crime Story" won't
disappoint most fans of Jackie Chan... mainly those of us who first gained
knowledge of him when "Rumble in the Bronx" was released to theaters in
1995.
"Crime Story" isn't as light in its tone as "Rumble in the Bronx" was, but
that's not much of a distraction. The plot involves a wealthy real estate
developer being kidnapped by corrupt police officials, and Detective Jackie
Chan hunts them down. Chan's character's name actually is Jackie Chan in
this one, although I wonder if that was also the character's name in the
film's initial release.
Now fans probably can care less about the plot, as I do, because it's
usually just an excuse to fill time between the action sequences. But the
plot is compelling enough, and easy to follow. And the action sequences and
stuntwork are, as always, incredible. There isn't as much hand-to-hand
fighting as in other Chan films, but there are plenty of excellently staged
shoot-outs and car chases.
There are a couple of drawbacks. The guy who's been taken hostage is just as
crooked in his own way as the men who kidnapped him, so who really cares if
he gets rescued? Also, the main villain is this big fat guy, so you pretty
much know there's not going to be a fantasic fight sequence between these
two at the end. Also, I wish Dimension/Miramax Films could spend just a tiny
bit of money and get some actors to dub the voices convincingly. Sometimes,
ridiculous dubbing works for the film when it's a comedy, like Chan's "My
Lucky Stars". But when the tone of the film is meant to be serious, as
"Crime Story" is, some effort should be made to make the dubbed voices seem
appropriate.
"Crime Story" has nothing tremendously special, but it is still better than
most American action movies these days. I only wish Chan's films could be
re-released a little quicker here in the US.  [R]
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related
links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Mars Attacks! (1996)
Mars Attacks! (1996) ***** out of ***** - C:Jack Nicholson, Glenn Close,
Annette Bening, Martin Short, Danny DeVito, Rod Steiger, Pierce Brosnan,
Sarah Jessica Parker, Michael J. Fox, Jim Brown, Pam Grier, Joe Don Baker,
Natalie Portman, Christina Applegate, Lisa Marie, Tom Jones.
This is director Tim Burton's finest film to date. Many will compare this
tale of Martians who invade Earth to Independence Day, but even though the
stories are similar, they really are two distinctly different films. However
as a whole, Mars Attacks is much more entertaining than ID4, and I loved
ID4.
You really have to be in the right frame of mind to enjoy this film. It is
completely wacked-out and unlike anything you've ever seen. Once the silly
tone of the film is set, it's easy to just sit back and throw logic out the
window because logic and comedy just don't mix.
The plot is simple: Martians invade the Earth. But it's different than any
other invasion film. Usually it's the evil aliens versus the heroic humans.
This time however, it's the goofy aliens versus the equally goofy humans.
The Martians, who are all computer generated, are just about the funniest
things I've seen in a long time. They look funny, they move funny, and their
"language" is hilarious.
And about the special effects. The effects in Mars Attacks! are just about
the most flawless ones I've seen to date. The computer animation of the
martians combined with the goofy personalities they are given makes them
seem 100% real.
There are just a couple of scenes that don't work, mainly those involving
Sarah Jessica Parker and Pierce Brosnan on board an alien ship. Also, Glenn
Close overacts tremendously in her (thankfully) very limited screen time, so
much so that I actually applauded silently when her character meets her
demise. But there are many big laughs in the film, as I said, if you are in
the right mood. Could it have been funnier? Certainly. Was it funny enough?
Yes. Was I entertained? Absolutely.
On a personal note, I'd like to thank whomever cast Rod Steiger (my favorite
actor) in the film as war-crazy General Decker. Finally, after many very
small parts in direct to video garbage and minor TV roles, Steiger is back
on the big screen in a real movie that many people will see. While he's not
given the type of role that you can give a real "performance" in, he does
the job well and has some good lines of dialogue. The preview audience I saw
the film with really seemed to enjoy him.
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office
reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for McBain (1991)
McBain (1991) * out of ***** - Cast: Christopher Walken, Michael Ironside,
Maria Conchita Alonso.  Directed By: James Glickenhaus.  Running Time: 102
minutes.
A quote from the video box: "A macho action fantasy... a provocative
revolutionary epic." -- Kevin Thomas, Los Angeles Times.
First of all, I can't believe anyone could say such things about this film.
Second, I dont even think it makes sense.
Christoper Walken sleeps through his role as a Vietnam POW, who eighteen
years later reteams with the soldiers who rescued him and they try to
liberate Colombia.  Michael Ironside also doesn't seem to try very hard in
his role as one of Walken's comrades.  My main problem here is that these two
actors are best known for being bad guys, and here they are supposed to be
action heroes.  I didn't buy it for a second.  Will they succeed in their
mission?  I wonder...
"McBain" is such a familiar retread on so many movie cliches, I question how
it can be provocative, revolutionary, or an epic.  Provocative means
"stimulating".  I was stimulated enough to fast forward through most of the
film.  Revolutionary means "drastically different".  Come on, this is every
episode of "The A Team".  And epic?  Please.  "The Longest Day" is an epic.
"McBain" is just a waste of time.
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related
links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Beach, The (2000)
See this review as it was intended at: http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/
Cast: Leonardo DiCaprio, Tilda Swinton, Virginie Ledoyen, Guillaume
Canet, Robert Carlyle, Paterson Joseph, Lars Arentz-Hansen 
Based on the novel by: Alex Garland 
Written by: John Hodge 
Directed by: Danny Boyle 
Running Time: 120 minutes 
Based on the novel by Alex Garland, The Beach stars Leonardo DiCaprio as
Richard, an American looking for some adventure in his life.  He finds
it in Bangkok, when his incredibly strange neighbor (Robert Carlyle, who
once again forced me to turn on my television's captions so I could
understand his dialogue) leaves him a map of a "hidden" island where a
handful of others have found paradise (oh, and copious amounts of weed
too).  But as Richard finds out, whenever humanity is involved, can it
ever be paradise? 
DiCaprio's first starring role since his launch into superstardom with
Titanic is a flawed mishmash of ideas that not surprisingly failed to
set the box office on fire.  While I give Leo credit for taking a role
that goes against what people want to see, I have to criticize him for,
well, taking a role that goes against what people want to see.  It may
do good for yourself as an actor to do something different, but when you
have a huge built in audience and alienate them immediately... how smart
is that?  Maybe if you've been typecast for 3 or 4 films is a row,
sure.  But a pre-emptive strike against typecasting?  This just wasn't
the right choice. 
Also, I'm sorry to say that this movie actually SUFFERS by having
DiCaprio in the lead, as he just isn't the right choice to play the lead
character.  Many times I found myself laughing at his performance, as it
seems he's yet to develop a man's voice.  So when he yells, it produces
that same screeching sound I found incredibly annoying in What's Eating
Gilbert Grape and This Boy's Life. 
Since Richard is such an unlikable character from start to finish, the
only really sympathetic person in the film is Étienne (Guillaume Canet),
whose girlfriend (Virginie Ledoyen) is stolen away by Richard.  However,
Étienne is a very minor character, and after the first hour or so you
barely even see him again. 
While for an hour and fifteen minutes or so The Beach is not that bad,
it unfortunately goes completely astray in the third act, becoming an
odd mix of Apocalypse Now, The Deer Hunter and a video game.  We see
Richard's mental state go from point A to point C, skipping point B
entirely.  Now being the educated fellow that I am I'm able to piece
together exactly what was going on, but the third act is so choppy that
most viewers will lose interest based on their disgust and confusion. 
While the changes in his character are somewhat logical given the
situation he's placed in, they are just not presented credibly to the
audience. 
The Beach is available on DVD from Fox Home Entertainment.  The disc
contains the film in its original theatrical aspect ratio of 2.35:1 and
is enhanced for 16x9 televisions.  The plentiful amount of extras on
this disc include: a full length audio commentary track by director
Danny Boyle, nine deleted scenes (with or without commentary from Boyle
as an option), the All Saints music video for "Pure Shores" along with a
commercial for the film's soundtrack, storyboards, many theatrical
trailers and TV spots, a decent promotional featurette, and the usual
cast and crew bios.  And, as with almost all new Fox releases, there are
some great menu screens on the disc. 
Danny Boyle's commentary track is a delight to listen to, as Boyle
discusses every possible aspect of the film's production.  He's a bright
man with good ideas and a fine sense of humor (so it perplexes me as to
why I've yet to like any of his films).  The deleted scenes, which he
also comments on, could have either stayed or gone and they wouldn't
have had much effect on me either way.  None of them are glaringly bad
or out of place, as you see with many deleted scenes on discs these
days, and Boyle points out that the majority of them were cut simply for
time concerns.  The original ending, while very much a downer, didn't
bother me either (especially since the last third of the film lost my
interest anyway). 
As often the case with DVDs, even if the movie itself isn't the
greatest, it can be saved by extras on the disc.  This is definitely
what happens with The Beach.  The film just misses the mark, but now
that this DVD is available its more than worth my time... and yours. 

Title
Review for Batman (1989)
Batman (1989) *** out of ***** - Cast: Michael Keaton, Jack Nicholson, Kim
Basinger, Robert Wuhl, Jack Palance, Pat Hingle, Billy Dee Williams, Michael
Gough, William Hootkins, Jerry Hall. Written by: Sam Hamm and Warren
Skaaren. Directed by: Tim Burton. Running Time: 126 minutes.
About a year before the release of "Batman", the hype began. But by the time
the film was released, you had basically seen the entire movie, in clip
form. Unfortunately, it seemed to work much better as a series of clips.
We are introduced to Gotham City, a strange town which seems to both exist
in reality and not exist in reality at the same time. Everything in the town
is dark, gloomy, and bleak. Gotham's new district attorney Harvey Dent
(Williams) vows to end the stranglehold of the crime boss of the town
(Palance). But also at the same time, a new player enters the game. His name
is Batman.
Batman's normal persona is that of millionaire Bruce Wayne (Keaton). He is
forced to bring Batman into the public eye to confront the Joker
(Nicholson), who once was a henchman of Gotham's crime boss, until Batman
dropped him into a vat of chemicals. Now the Joker is trying to basically
kill people in various ways, with no real rhyme or reason to his plan.
No matter how many times I see the film, one thought always stays with me:
the film has never looked like it was finished. The editing is erratic, the
sound sometimes in non-existant, and the effects look like they needed
serious enhancement in post production. For example, look at the Batmobile.
Sure it's supposed to be cool and speedy, but really look at it when it's on
screen. You'll never see it going faster than about 5 miles per hour. That's
an obvious flaw to me. Also, everything obviously looks like a movie set,
even though the production design won an oscar. I could just imagine the
camera panning back at any moment to reveal the crew standing there. Things
like that spoil the illusion that is supposedly being created. And they
really needed to decide how this city was going to be perceived. Obviously
there is no city in the country resembling Gotham, so they needed to make
Gotham a world of its own. People and places resemble the 1940s, but use
1980s expressions and concepts. It doesn't mix.
And I don't much like having to buy stupid ideas or concepts "because it's a
comic book movie". For example, (and I know I'm nitpicking a little but darn
it all, it bothers me) the Joker really doesn't exist for much longer than a
week or so. But immediately he has a whole gang with "Joker" jackets and
"Joker" cars, all in "Joker" colors with a big "Joker" logo on them. It's
absurd, you're a homicidal maniac alive for about a week, but you take the
time to get a fleet of cars painted purple and green and get specialized
jackets for your gang? I know it's just a movie, but come on, it's too
silly.
Also on the negative side, the soundtrack contains numerous oddly-placed
songs by Prince which were obviously dubbed in after the film was completed.
Prince is awful, as are these songs, and they just don't gel with the look
and feel of the film. Danny Elfman's score is a mixed bag. The actual theme
and anthem are good, but just the normal background music gets annoying. And
there are too many unnecessary characters, namely Robert Wuhl's reporter and
a crooked cop played by William Hootkins. Like I said, some better editing
was needed.
But, even after all that (and it's a lot, I know), I'll admit that the film
is still entertaining. Despite what everyone said before the film opened,
Keaton makes a fine Batman. Nicholson's acting is SO over the top that it
reaches a new level of silliness, but it fits the character perfectly and
therefore is fine with me. And had it not been for the success of this film,
there wouldn't have been 1992's "Batman Returns" which is my favorite of the
series. [PG-13]
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related
links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for House of Yes, The (1997)
The House of Yes (1997) * out of ***** - Cast: Parker Posey, Josh
Hamilton, Tori Spelling, Freddie Prinze Jr., Genevieve Bujold.  Written
and Directed by: Mark Waters.  Running Time: 85 minutes.
Boy, there's nothing like a good dysfunctional family story.  Too bad "The
House of Yes" is a HORRIBLE dysfunctional family story.
"The House of Yes" is set at Thanksgiving in 1983.  Parker Posey plays
Jackie-O, a mentally disturbed woman who believes she's Jackie
Kennedy-Onassis.  Her brother (...) is coming home for the holiday and she
just couldn't be happier.  To her dismay however, he has brought along a
surprise: a fiancee (Tori Spelling, in a surprisingly good performance).
Things immediately turn ugly.  You see, there's a reason Jackie-O has gone
insane.  She and her brother just happened to be lovers for quite some
time.  They liked playing a game where they would re-enact the Kennedy
assassination and then proceed to have sex.  Hard to believe that could
mentally disturb someone isn't it?  I was disturbed enough to break into
sweats and cower in the fetal position just watching it.  Anyway, for some
reason they just can't resist this game once he returns home, much to the
disgust of his fiance and the younger brother in the family.
"The House of Yes" was adapted from a stage play by Wendy MacLeod, and the
fact that it was a stage play is warning sign number one.  There's a
reason some stories are told on stage and some on screen.  And the film
plays exactly as if it was a play, aside for moments of obnoxiously
blaring score music that come out of nowhere, usually announcing the
incest which is about to be happening.  Speaking of incest, I guess that
would have to be warning sign number two.  Need any other warning signs to
save yourself from this film?  [R]
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed at Chuck's Movie Reviews.
Web address: http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/

Title
Review for Carpool (1996)
(1996) *1/2 - C:Tom Arnold, David Paymer, Rod Steiger, Rhea Perlman.
Keep in mind that this film is directed by Arthur Hiller, the man who is the
president of the Motion Picture Academy. The man who theoretically should
have seen every good movie made since his term of office began. The man who
directed the hilarious Alan Arkin/Peter Falk comedy "The In-Laws" and also
such acclaimed films as "Love Story" and "The Hospital". Keep in mind that
the film's producer, Arnon Milchan, has produced some of the best films in
the last fifteen years, such as "The King of Comedy", "JFK", and "Falling
Down". With such experience, these men know exactly what makes a movie
great. Which is why it's so shocking that "Carpool" is a truly horrible
mess.
The plot is extremely simple. As a matter of fact, the plot is beyond
simple. Tom Arnold robs a gourmet pastry shop, kidnaps David Paymer and
takes his minvan, only to discover that Paymer was driving the neighborhood
kids to school. And for the rest of the film they have to not get caught by
the Seattle police, who are portrayed as the most inept police force on the
planet.
What's so troublesome about the film is that it's "PG". It's meant to be a
kids film. But there are things in this film that are completely
inappropriate for kids. There are gay jokes, jokes about breast enlargement,
young teenage boys grabbing and feeling young teenage girls, and other such
things. Also, Tom Arnold is portrayed as a hero and the cops, of course, are
idiots. Good message for the children. And the worst thing about the film,
regardless of what kinds of jokes there are, they just aren't funny, no
matter how old you are. The crowd in the theater when I saw the film laughed
once, and that was when a kid stuck a gummi bear up his nose. Comedy gold to
little kids you know. There were one or two lines in the film which I found
humorous, but certainly not enough to carry the entire film.
There's one ridiculous thing about a scene in the film I'd like to comment
on (there are many actually, but I just don't have that kind of time to
comment on all of them). At one point the "good guys" are at a carnival,
fleeing from the bad guys. One of the kids is riding a ferris wheel and
someone bumps a lever and the ferris wheel starts to spin dangerously fast.
And of course they have to save the kid. Now, why would an amusement park
ride have a setting on it which would never be used and is certain to cause
death? Just a thought.
Now I need to justify why I saw this film. The ONLY reason I watched it was
because my favorite actor, Rod Steiger, was in it. Arthur Hiller was smart
enough to get an actor he's worked with in the past (1976's "W.C. Fields and
Me") and then not smart enough to give him anything to do. He's in the last
five minutes of the film and he does a good job as always with what he's
given, but it's just not enough. And Hiller should be beaten for actually
putting Steiger in a clown outfit at the end and having him sell doughnuts
at a carnival. Booooooooooo Mr. Hiller.
At one point in the film, David Paymer says to someone "This isn't
funny".  Mr. Paymer, you're exactly right.
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,500 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office
reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for Last Man Standing (1996)
(1996) * - C:Bruce Willis, Christopher Walken, Bruce Dern, David Patrick
Kelly, William Sanderson.
"Last Man Standing" is a remake of Akira Kurasawa's classic "Yojimbo" from
1961. It was remade once before in 1964's "A Fistful of Dollars", a fairly
entertaining spaghetti western which boosted Clint Eastwood to stardom. It
should not have been remade again.
Movies have to have some sort of target audience in order to make money. I
have no idea who writer/director Walter Hill was targeting here. "Last Man
Standing" has no drama, no humor, no suspense, no romance, and no action
(unless you consider action to be short bursts of gunfire every 35 minutes).
Willis stars as John Smith, a gunman for hire during Prohibition times who
wanders into the town of Jericho, Texas and is immediately thrown into the
middle of a war between two rival gangs. The gang war has caused almost all
the people in town to pack up and move and now the two gangs are fighting to
control illegal shipments of alcohol from Mexico. That's where all the
clarity of the story ends.
As soon as we are introduced to these gangs, 800 different character names
are immediately thrown at us and the audience is instantly lost. Then, as
you try to catch up with the film, it gets so boring that you just don't
care anymore. Also, these two gangs are fighting for control of a town which
isn't any bigger than a shopping mall. They have their headquarters two
minutes apart from each other. One five-minute gunfight would determine
ownership.
Out of all the characters presented in the film, not one is even remotely
interesting or likable. The main reason I wanted to see the film was for
Christopher Walken, who despite his second billing doesn't show up until
almost an hour into the film. He has maybe ten lines of dialogue and no more
than fifteen minutes of screen time. He does fine with what he has to do,
but it's just not enough. If I had not been there with a friend, I would
have been the "First Man Leaving" the theater that was showing "Last Man
Standing".
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,500 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, box office
reports, film related links, and reader's polls and reviews.

Title
Review for Bachelor, The (1999)
Cast: Chris O'Donnell, Renee Zellweger, Hal Holbrook, James Cromwell,
Artie Lange, Edward Asner, Sarah Silverman, Jennifer Esposito, Peter
Ustinov, Mariah Carey, Brooke Shields 
Written by: Steve Cohen  
Directed by: Gary Sinyor 
Running Time: 101 minutes 
One of the contributors to the destruction of the Batman film franchise
Chris O'Donnell stars in this remake of Buster Keaton's 1925 silent film
Seven Chances.  Now I've never seen Seven Chances, as I'm more of a
Chaplin fan than a Keaton fan, but I seriously doubt that the classic
version could be as insipid as this. 
O'Donnell plays Jimmie Shannon, the manager of a pool table
manufacturing company.  He also fears commitment, and despite dating
Anne (Renee Zellweger) for over three years, he's unwilling to marry
her.  His reasons?  Well he's a guy you see, and well, guys are like
stallions, and they apparently don't like to be roped or something (hey,
that's the movie's explanation... I'd marry Renee Zellweger in a
second). 
Eventually it comes time for Jimmie to propose, and when he does, it's
the most absurd proposal ever uttered by a man EVER.  He essentially
says to her, "You win" and hands her a ring.  The audience should now
hate this character.  I did. 
Then the meat of the plot presents itself.  Jimmie's grandfather (Peter
Ustinov, completely wasted) dies and leaves Jimmie his entire estate of
100 million dollars as well as ownership of the pool table business. 
However, in order to get the money and save the jobs of the factory
workers, Jimmie must be married before his next birthday (which is just
over 24 hours away).  Having blown his chances with Anne, Jimmie
proceeds to track down all his prior girlfriends and suggest a "business
proposition". 
The movie wasn't half bad by this time, surprisingly.  It wasn't boring
me, and even managed to read my thoughts at one point.  Ustinov's
character left a video will, and while he's reading the ridiculous
clause in it, I thought to myself "What is this, Brewster's Millions?". 
As soon as I thought it, Hal Holbrook's character actually says "What is
this, Brewster's Millions?"  It was quite surreal. 
Something happens though during the film's final act that caused me to
sharply drop the rating it was going to receive.  Up to that point, all
of Jimmie's prior girlfriends had turned down his "business proposition"
which I felt was good.  At least the film wasn't painting women to be
cold hearted gold diggers.  When Jimmie has no other options, his goofy
friend (played by Artie Lange, making a career out of playing the goofy
friend) places an ad in the newspaper that somehow becomes a front page
story.  At this point, 100,000 women don wedding gowns and head off to
persuade Jimmie to pick them to be his bride. 
These women arrive at Jimmie's location and IMMEDIATELY start bullying
him about what he's looking for in a woman.  When he's had enough of
their unjustified attacks, he tells the angry mob that there's been a
mistake and he won't be marrying any of them.  As a result, the women
proceed to chase him around the city, in hopes of catching him and
tearing his limbs off.  This goes on FOR THE REST OF THE FILM.  It's
just Chris O'Donnell running from 100,000 obnoxious, greedy, angry and
stupid women.  My groans of disgust could be heard for miles.  The film
finally ended (thankfully), but to this day I'm still groaning. 
The Bachelor is available on DVD from New Line Home Video.  It contains
the film in both full frame and in its original theatrical aspect ratio
of 1.85:1, cast and crew info, and special DVD-ROM features.  The
original theatrical trailer is also on the disc, which contains scenes
not in the film.  Apparently there was even more footage of the gang of
brides chasing O'Donnell around the city, and at one point O'Donnell is
leaping from the tops of buses.  So that was bad enough to be cut, but
the other 30 minutes of bride shenanigans was good?  Ugh. 
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
AOL Instant Messenger: FilmJax
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Evil Dead, The (1982)
Ultra low budget but extremely inventive horror film about a group of
friends vacationing in a cabin who accidentally awaken an evil force
in the woods via the Necronomicon, the Book of The Dead.  Bruce
Campbell stars as Ash, who eventually becomes the sole survivor and
has to battle both the demons from the woods, and his friends who have
become demons (including his own girlfriend).
The results shown on screen are amazing considering the film's tiny
budget, constant location changes, and a filming schedule that was
sporadic over two years.  Followed by two sequels: Evil Dead II (1987)
and Army of Darkness (1993).
The DVD release of this film from Elite Entertainment contains the
film in it's original aspect ratio of 1.33:1.  The disc contains two
versions of the film's audio: a stereo 2.0 track and a newly
remastered Dolby Digital 5.1.  Included are two separate running
commentary tracks: the first features writer/director Sam Raimi and
producer Rob Tapert and the second track features the film's star,
Bruce Campbell.
Campbell's commentary is informative and extremely witty, as he has a
story to tell for virtually every scene in the film.  Such informative
tidbits include: The original title of the film was going to be Book
of the Dead (and in fact when the film premiered in 1981 that was it's
title) and when they were asked to change the title to The Evil Dead,
everyone thought it was the worst title they had ever heard.  Also,
there's a scene early on in the film where the group sits around and
listens to a tape recorder which they've found that's explaining about
the demonic forces in the woods.  For that scene, it was written for
the characters to be smoking marijuana, so being the wacky kids that
they were at the time, they decided to actually smoke marijuana for
the scene.  Almost all of that footage became unusable because many of
the actor's had never smoked before, and as a result they became
"confused" and were unable to perform the scene.
I wish the entertainment factor was as high for the Sam Raimi/Rob
Tapert audio track.  The two people you'd think would be more
enthusiastic in talking about this film instead barely have much to
say at all.  Don't get me wrong here, when they do speak it's
entertaining to hear, but there are many instances where both are
silent for long periods of time.  Sometimes after one of those long
silences Rob will ask "Have anything to say Sam?"  To me, that's not a
good sign.  Also, it seems like Sam Raimi doesn't remember much about
the film and it's production...  well, compared to Rob and Bruce
anyway.
Also included on the disc is a photo gallery (which includes pictures
from the film's "gala" premiere) and about twenty minutes of raw
footage from the film.  This raw footage really shows you how much a
film can be improved upon using simple audio techniques.
Overall, The Evil Dead is a good low budget horror film, superior to
many films in it's genre.  And the collector's edition DVD release is
well worth your time if you're either a fan of the film or just a fan
of the filmmaking process.  All special edition DVDs should be this
thorough and entertaining.
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email:chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted
without permission.

Title
Review for Lost World: Jurassic Park, The (1997)
The Lost World:Jurassic Park (1997) **** out of ***** - Cast: Jeff Goldblum,
Julianne Moore, Arliss Howard, Richard Attenborough. Written by: David
Koepp. Directed by: Steven Spielberg. Running Time: 130 minutes.
"The Lost World" perfectly embodies the qualities of a "summer movie". It's
immensely entertaining, yet it's hardly intelligent in a creative sense. It
is one great ride of a movie though.
"The Lost World" (and really guys, either call it "The Lost World: Jurassic
Park 2" or lose the subtitle altogether) is the sequel to the biggest movie
of all time, "Jurassic Park". Taking place four years after the events of
the first film, Dr. Ian Malcolm (Jeff Goldblum) finds himself to be an
outcast both publically and professionally for trying to expose the events
which occurred four years earlier. One day he is called to the home of John
Hammond (Richard Attenborough, briefly reprising his role from the first
film) who informs him that Jurassic Park was not the only place where the
dinosaurs existed. The dinosaurs were created and allowed to thrive on a
seperate island before being shipped to the park. Now he wants to send a
team of researchers and photographers to the lost world (get it?) in order
to document the life which lives there. And he wants Malcolm to go along as
well.
Malcolm of course wants no part of it, until he learns that his current
girlfriend (Moore) is one of the scientists on the expedition. He
reluctantly agrees to go, but only to convince the team to return with him
as soon as possible. Once arriving on the island, they are soon joined by
"the bad guys", a group from Hammond's company who still believe that the
Jurassic Park concept is a good one. Of course, the two groups clash.
"The Lost World" is a hit and miss effort. It had much more potential than
it capitalized on, but luckily when it does hit, it hits big. It takes
forever to get the film going, and the biggest flaw against the film is the
introduction of Ian Malcolm's daughter, who sneaks her way onto the island.
"The Lost World" could have succeeded where "Jurassic Park" almost went
astray by leaving out the kids. Her character being in the film produces a
scene late in the film which, for lack of a better phrase, is nothing short
of being retarded. When you see it you'll know exactly which scene I mean.
Also, I didn't buy that there was a relationship between Goldblum and
Moore's characters. I don't believe they ever touched each other
romantically. Knowing how Spielberg really likes to develop his characters
makes that even more puzzling.
Now once the film gets going, it REALLY goes. About an hour into the film is
when it starts. At that point there's a 20 minute sequence where the T. Rex
makes it's first appearance, which is just about one of the greatest
action/suspense sequences ever put to film. Those 20 minutes alone rank
right up there with the best work Speilberg has ever done.
After the sequence was over, I felt that it was so good that I seriously
doubted that whatever could be dreamt up for the finale could be better. And
for the most part, I was wrong about that. Now I'm not going to reveal what
happens in the film's final scenes, even though I'm sure a week or so after
the film's release there will be clips of it in every commercial for the
film. But going into the theater, I had absolutely no idea that it was going
to go in the direction it did. It's not as well-crafted as the sequence I
mentioned earlier, but just in it's concept it's brilliant "summer movie"
hijinks.
So how does this one compare to the original? In actuality, I enjoyed them
each about the same. While "The Lost World" does have its moments which I
enjoyed much more than any scene in the original, "Jurassic Park" was paced
better. "Jurassic Park" seemed to flow along, evenly paced, while "The Lost
World" takes a while to flow, then crashes, then starts again, etc. Also,
"The Lost World" doesn't seem like a big commercial for itself. We don't
have to see the Jurassic Park logo every ten seconds as we did in the
original. We hardly see it at all.
"The Lost World" is just a great time at the movies. It sometimes slips too
far into silliness, but makes up for it with fantastic special effects, a
good score by John Williams, an entertaining performance from Goldblum, a
couple of moments which will genuinely make you jump, and two outstanding
sequences of action and suspense. Suspend all your critical thinking and
just enjoy the perfect example of a no-brainer summer movie. The master
storyteller Spielberg has done it again. [PG-13]
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related
links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for If Lucy Fell (1996)
If Lucy Fell (1996) 1/2 out of ***** - Cast: Sarah Jessica Parker, Eric
Schaeffer, Ben Stiller, Elle Macpherson, James Rebhorn.  Written and
Directed by: Eric Schaeffer.  Running Time: 94 minutes.
I want to know who in their right mind though that this film would appeal to
anyone on the planet.  Two whiny, pathetic losers (Parker and Schaeffer) make
a death pact to jump off a bridge if neither of them find true love by age
30.  JUMP!  PLEASE!
Star-writer-director Schaeffer should not have been allowed to even come
close to a movie set, let alone be allowed to make this totally predictable,
unfunny, waste of an hour and a half of anyone's life.  The characters in
this film are so ridiculously fake and pathetic that you, along with me,
will be praying that they die in the end.  JUMP!  Schaeffer's character is
such a complete dork, and Elle Macpherson actually finds him attractive,
especially after he keeps making himself look like a complete dork.  His
first words to her are "I have herpes."  Ah, I can hear her heart melting.  I
can't even write the "romantic" things that he says to her as they are about
to make love (just the fact that he's about to make love to her is utterly
ridiculous), all I can say is that even if Brad Pitt was saying those things
to a woman he'd have his privates kicked up into his stomach.  Only Stiller
manages to get a laugh or two.  He's just as much of a freak and a loser as
the rest of the characters, but at least he's a slightly amusing freak.
Well you see Parker and Schaeffer are roommates.  Get it?  Boy-girl?
Roommates?  Gee, I wonder if they realize with 5 minutes left in the film
that they actually love EACH OTHER and end up together in the end?  I really,
really wonder.  I desperately wanted them to jump.  Needless to say, it was
not a happy ending to me.
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related
links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Deuce Bigalow: Male Gigolo (1999)
Cast: Rob Schneider, Arija Bareikis, Eddie Griffin, William Forsythe,
Oded Fehr, Gail O'Grady, Richard Riehle, Amy Poehler, Chi Chi LaRue,
Norm Macdonald 
Written by: Harris Goldberg and Rob Schneider 
Directed by: Mike Mitchell 
Running Time: 88 minutes 
The first film produced by Adam Sandler's Happy Madison production
company (clever title eh?) is essentially a one joke movie, much like
the movies Sandler stars in himself.  However the difference here is
that this one joke just isn't very funny.  
Rob Schneider stars as the title character, a scruffy fish tank cleaner
who ends up becoming a "man-whore" to raise enough money to replace a
wealthy client's custom made fish tank, which Deuce destroyed while
staying in his home.  Deuce goes on numerous "dates", and each woman he
goes out with has a "humorous" quirk about herself.  One has narcolepsy,
one has Tourette's Syndrome, one is a man... etc. etc.  My problem is
that we see all of these women in the film's trailer, so why do I need
to watch the movie?  Seen the trailer... seen the film.  Only a quick
cameo from Norm Macdonald (and a follow up joke during the closing
credits) generates any chuckles. 
Deuce Bigalow:Male Gigolo is available on DVD from Touchstone Home Video
(a division of Di$ney).  The disc includes the film in its original
theatrical aspect ratio of 1.85:1, and features the original theatrical
trailer (as well as trailers for Mystery Alaska, Happy Texas, and
Outside Providence), an extremely brief production featurette (which
contains footage not used in the film), and storyboard-to-scene
comparisons. 
Yep, you read that right... there are STORYBOARD comparisons on this
DVD.  Two scenes are storyboarded... neither of which are particularly
exciting.  There are fight scenes in this movie, so why aren't we seeing
storyboards of those segments (especially the parody moments from The
Matrix)?  I wonder what's funnier: the fact that any moment in this film
required storyboards or that Di$ney thought fans of this film would want
to see them?  Deleted scenes?  Sure.  Audio commentary?  You betcha. 
But storyboards?  Come on. [R]
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
AOL Instant Messenger: FilmJax
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Tromeo and Juliet (1996)
Tromeo and Juliet (1995) *1/2 out of ***** - Written by: James Gunn and
Lloyd Kaufman. Directed by: Lloyd Kaufman. Running Time: 102 minutes
How can I review a film which is supposed to be bad? Troma Films' "Tromeo
and Juliet" is a twisted spin (and twisted really isn't a strong enough
word) on the classic Shakespeare story (guess which one). One thing I
usually grade a film on is: Does the film succeed in doing what it is trying
to do? Technically yes, it tries to be bad and succeeds. By that, "Tromeo
and Juliet" should get a perfect rating. But I just can't do that. So I use
another of my grading criteria: Does the film entertain? No, for the most
part it does not.
I assume fans of Troma films will delight in the film's use of nudity,
cartoonish gore, lesbianism, bondage, incest, toe-sucking, nipple-piercing
(on camera no less), animal mutilation, profanity, drug use, and vomiting.
Call me crazy, but most of those things just don't appeal to me.
I will give the film credit in a couple areas. There are three characters in
the film who have such a high level of energy that they are fairly
entertaining, and the actor's portraying them are decent. They provide a few
laughs. Also, I must admit that I've never seen anything like someone's
stomach swelling up, and then bursting open to reveal fresh yummy popcorn to
the delight of others who are in the scene at the time. Bizarre? Of course,
but that's Troma.
On the down side, there's constant Troma product placements which
immediately get irritating. Also, the actor playing the lead role of Tromeo
is borderline repulsive to watch. And mainly, I'm all for campy fun, but
countless scenes involve incestuous relations between Juliet and her father,
not exactly what I'd consider fun to watch. The scenes aren't even played
campy. But again, I guess that's Troma. The best part of the film is the
closing credits, and no, not just because the film is over. They're done in
the "Airplane" style, and a couple of them are worth a chuckle or two. [R]
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Woo (1998)
What do you get when you rip-off good movies like Woody Allen's
Bananas and Martin Scorsese's After Hours? You'd think you'd get the
best of both films. Instead you get Woo. Falling in somewhere between
Def Jam's How To Be A Player (which was awful) and Booty Call (which
was ok), Woo is yet another in the embarassing genre of showing
African-Americans to be nothing more than sexual buffoons.
The whole film plays out as a black version of After Hours, as wild
woman Woo (Jada Pinkett Smith) goes out on a blind date with
straight-laced Tim (Tommy Davidson). Mayhem follows them. For some
unknown reason (read: contrived screenplay) Davidson puts up with all
of Woo's antics for the entire night, which include her destroying his
bathroom mirror, stealing things from his house, violently questioning
him (accusing and belittling him actually) about previous girlfriends,
causing a riot in an elegant restaurant, and other various infuriating
things that any normal person wouldn't tolerate. But for the sake of
this bad movie? Sure, why not?
There are a few chuckles in the film, the best being the scene swiped
directly from Bananas. In this case, Davidson is running from thugs,
gets into a subway car as the doors are closing, starts to taunt the
thugs, then the doors open back up again. A good joke, but a stolen
one. Another chuckle is provided by Billy Dee Williams' cameo as
himself.
Movies like Woo are seemingly released every three months or so, and
not one of them has ever been a hit. Woo won't be one either. So why
was it made? And more importantly, isn't there anyone else besides me
who thinks these films are offensive?  Everyone involved should really
reconsider their careers at this point.  [R]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL: http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email: chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1995-1998 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be
reprinted without permission.

Title
Review for 8MM (1999)
Cast: Nicolas Cage, Joaquin Phoenix, James Gandolfini, Peter Stormare,
Anthony Heald
Written by: Andrew Kevin Walker
Directed by: Joel Schumacher
Running Time: 124 minutes
**The following review contains spoilers**
"Please someone stop Joel Schumacher before he vomits into a film
canister again and tries to pass it off as a movie."
-- Chuck Dowling, The Jacksonville Film Journal
I wrote the above sentence in my review for 1997's Batman and Robin.
Apparently, no one heard my words.  Oh, how I wish you had heard them.
Oh how I wish someone had stopped him...  because he's done it again.
The plot of 8MM is similar to the 1977 Paul Schrader film Hardcore, a
surprisingly decent and engrossing tale.  In fact, it was everything
that 8MM is not.  In the opening minutes of 8MM, we see private
detective Tom Welles (Nicolas Cage) working on a case for a
prestigious member of the U.S.  Government.  Keep this fact in mind,
Cage is trusted with an important case, which he solves.  He returns
home to his wife and new daughter, and even finds time to rake his
yard (keep that in mind too, it's important as well).
He's hired by a rich elderly woman to solve a mystery.  After her
husband's death she comes across a film in his private safe.  It
appears to be snuff film, a sort of urban legend of the pornography
industry in which someone is actually brutally murdered for the
camera.  The woman wants Welles to locate the young girl in the film,
hopefully to disprove that it is in fact a snuff film.  So he sets off
on a journey into the sordid underworld of sleaze to discover the
truth about the film.
The main problem with 8MM is that the whole film is completely
pointless.  Welles is actually selected for the case by the old
woman's lawyer (Anthony Heald, an actor who always plays the same type
of character, that being a bad guy).  When you first see him, your
first instinct is that he's behind the whole thing.  The choice of
casting does the film in.  Then, as Welles begins his investigation,
at times we will see a shadowy figure following him.  The only person
it could possibly be is the lawyer (or someone sent by the lawyer)
because no one knows Welles is even investigating anything yet.  So
your first instinct has now been confirmed.  Then, when it is in fact
revealed that the lawyer is a part of the whole thing, he tells Welles
that he was chosen for the case because he was young and inexperienced
(in one of those ridiculous "since we're going to kill you anyway, why
not tell you the whole thing" moments).  But earlier when we see
Welles being hired for the case he's told that he was hired because he
comes highly recommended.  Huh?  Also, when the lawyer reveals himself
to be a part of the whole thing, his main goal is to get the film
back.  SO WHY DID HE GIVE IT UP IN THE FIRST PLACE?!  The lawyer had
the film the whole time, then gave it away to the private detective
thinking that he would just give up on the case and return the film?!
It's totally absurd... and this is the screenwriter of Seven?
Late in the film there's a confrontation between all the main
characters, and after a struggle one of the character's guns ends up
underneath a car.  Cage, who has been handcuffed to a bed, is rapidly
trying to get to his gun, which is on a table.  James Gandolfini's
character goes for the gun under the car in what is supposed to be a
scene of "suspense".  You see, the gun is just slightly out of reach
from the side of the car he's trying to reach it from, and so instead
of going around the car to the other side (where he can easily reach
it) he just keeps stretching.  GO AROUND TO THE OTHER SIDE OF THE
CAR!!  This goes on for minutes.  Then, after Cage gets his gun,
Gandolfini then decides it would be best to go around to the other
side of the car.  Boy, Schumacher is really really getting on my
nerves.  I think the final straw would be when Cage returns home,
devastated by everything that he's seen on this case, and then IS NO
LONGER ABLE TO RAKE HIS LAWN!  We actually see a shot of him
pathetically poking at leaves in his yard.
Other things that bugged me about 8MM: One would be the music, if you
can call it that.  Whenever the score starts up, it sounds like techno
music, and then this awful Indian or middle eastern type music will
accompany it.  Awful decision there Joel.  Another is Cage's
performance.  At this point he's capable of a wide range of
performances, either good or bad.  For 8MM, he delivers a very wooden
one, and only shines when he's interacting with Joaquin Phoenix (who
gives a great performance as a porn shop clerk with a heart of gold
who helps Cage with his case).  You're capable of much better
Mr. Cage.  Now as for you Mr.  Schumacher... I'm starting to doubt if
you're capable of anything else besides urinating onto the institution
of American cinema.  [R]
The Jacksonville Film Journal -- Film Reviews by Chuck Dowling
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email:chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted
without permission.

Title
Review for Which Way to the Front? (1970)
Which Way to the Front? (1970) ** out of ***** - Cast: Jerry Lewis, John
Wood, George Takei. Written by: Dick Miller. Directed by: Jerry Lewis.
Running time: 96 minutes.
Very "hit and miss" comedy from Lewis, as with most of his films. This time
Jerry plays the richest man in the world, and one day decides to try and
enlist in the army to help fight in World War II. He is denied. Not
accepting that, he and a small group of others who also were denied entrance
into the army create their own army to fight the Nazis. From that point on
the plot is absolutely all over the place, from training the men to trying
to assassinate Hitler.
The film does have some laughs, mainly whenever Jerry breaks into his
trademark "Lewis-speak" language of babble and doubletalk. Other moments
seem uncomfortable. For example, is Hitler really a great comedic character?
I didn't think so. The opening credits (which don't begin until at least 20
minutes into the film) begin with "Jerry Lewis as Which Way to the Front?".
Jerry Lewis "as"? Hmmmm, at this point I don't know if Jerry meant that as a
joke or not.
Lewis didn't act in another film which was actually released until 1981's
"Hardly Working". [PG]
-- 
Chuck Dowling Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at
http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/ Over 1,600 movies rated and/or
reviewed!  Movie news, film related links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Keeping the Faith (2000)
It's always seemed to me that Edward Norton chooses his projects very
carefully since storming into the acting scene in 1996 with his Oscar
nominated performance in Primal Fear.  With every film after that
(Everyone Says I Love You, The People vs. Larry Flynt, Rounders,
American History X, and Fight Club) he's come away with a major award
nomination or win of some kind.  All of those films have had something
about them that stood out... something that made them unique.  So I'm
perplexed as to why Norton would chose Keeping the Faith, a predictable
romantic comedy for the masses, as not only his next acting project but
also his first film as a director. 
Norton and Ben Stiller play a priest and a rabbi respectively, and the
two were best friends growing up.  They were also childhood friends with
Anna (Jenna Elfman).  When Anna comes to New York on business she
reunites with her two friends, who both are now obviously very attracted
to her.  What to do? 
As I sat and watched Keeping the Faith I was reminded constantly of Nora
Ephron's mediocre body of work and was surprised this was not a film
written or directed by her (although by film's end I understood why, as
Ephron is given "Special Thanks" during the film's closing credits). 
Most of the jokes in the film are clearly enhanced by the talents of the
people performing them, but there are several clichéd moments that even
the greatest comedic actors couldn't elevate past their "seen that
already" status.  Many moments in the first 30 minutes of the film
basically just involve Edward Norton falling down.  Also, later in the
film comes a scene seemingly inspired by Sister Act... a movie I do not
want to ever think about again. 
As I said, there are some funny moments in the film (some of which are
downright inspired), but there needed to be some major trimming done in
the editing room.  A romantic comedy does not need to run over two hours
unless there's some sort of amazing, twisty plot going on that needs as
much time as possible to completely play out.  "Priest wants girl but
can't have her because of his chosen profession and rabbi gets girl but
can't keep her for fear of alienating his congregation" isn't an epic
tale by any means. 
Besides Ephron, Norton also gives special thanks to director David
Fincher (there's one scene, a brief dream sequence, that I could see was
influenced by Fincher's work... and Seven is referenced early on as
well.)  I was surprised though not to see Michael Mann thanked, as
Norton seemed to take the Heat route with Keeping the Faith.  Scenes
will just linger on long after they have served their purpose, usually
to pan off to an establishing shot of a landmark of some sort.  Trim
that stuff down! 
Keeping the Faith is by no means a bad film or a failure for Norton as
either an actor or director.  Perhaps Norton chose this project because
it was a safe bet, as it's likely it will be moderately successful. 
Perhaps he will then use the film's success to make a movie that he
REALLY wants to make.  Time will tell.  [PG-13]
Reviewed by Chuck Dowling - chuckd21@fdn.com
The Jacksonville Film Journal - http://www.jaxfilmjournal.com/

Title
Review for Dick (1999)
Cast: Kirsten Dunst, Michelle Williams, Dan Hedaya, Will Ferrell,
Bruce McCulloch, Teri Garr, Dave Foley, Jim Breuer, Ana Gasteyer,
Harry Shearer, Saul Rubinek, Devon Gummersall, Ted McGinley, Ryan
Reynolds, G.D. Spradlin, French Stewart
Written by: Andrew Fleming and Sheryl Longin
Directed by: Andrew Fleming
Running Time: 100 minutes
Date Reviewed: August 8, 1999
While staying in the Watergate Hotel in Washington DC, two dim-witted
15 year olds (Kirsten Dunst and Michelle Williams) inadvertently
expose the Watergate break in.  The next day, after wandering off from
a White House tour, they end up meeting Richard Nixon, becoming
official White House dog walkers and secret youth advisors, and
unknowingly involving themselves in almost every aspect of the
downfall of a President.
Let me first give some credit to writer/director Andrew Fleming.  His
previous two films (Threesome, The Craft) are two of my least favorite
movies ever, and I was quite harsh on Fleming in my reviews.  So going
into this film I was not expecting much at all in terms of
entertainment.  Surprisingly, Dick turns out to be really funny.
There are the obvious double meaning jokes pertaining to the film's
titular character, but not as many as you'd think... three or four at
the most, I believe.  The rest of the film's comedy is fairly
intelligent, and hardly any of it misses it's mark.  Even the drug
humor is good-natured.
Let me now give credit to the cast.  Mostly comprised of "Saturday
Night Live" and "The Kids in the Hall" alumni, everyone is dead on
target.  Dan Hedaya plays Nixon, and he's great without making the
character too much of a cartoon (on a slightly interesting side note,
Hedaya was also in the cast of Oliver Stone's Nixon).  The lead
actresses are good at conveying their character's rampant stupidity
while managing to be quite sexy as well.  Best of all though are Will
Ferrell and Bruce McCulloch as a bickering Woodward and Bernstein (the
Washington Post reporters who broke the Watergate story).  They appear
in the film's opening scene, and then reappear in the film's final act
basically dominating the rest of the film.  These scenes are a highly
amusing parody of those two journalists, especially if you've seen
movies like All the President's Men.
What makes this film work given it's subject matter is it's
presentation.  Of course saying that two teens were directly involved
in the biggest political scandal this nation has even seen is absurd,
but the movie knows this and doesn't try to be anything else BUT
absurd.  The jokes are humorous and manage to succeed to two different
levels.  Those of you who don't know anything about the Watergate
scandal will enjoy it on the comedic level of a silly movie, and those
of you with knowledge of the events will enjoy it as a sly political
satire.  For example, knowing that there was an 18 and a half minute
gap in one of Nixon's secret recordings will help you to enjoy a
certain scene even more, but the scene is also funny standing alone.
Of course you know Fleming must be delighted at the use of the film's
title in the vocabulary of moviegoers around the country.  I now have
to refer to the film as "that comedy about Nixon with the two girls in
it" to avoid making the buffoonish statements I've been making like
"Call the theater and confirm three for Dick, please".  John Waters
tried to do this with last year's Pecker... but since no one sees John
Waters' movies or even talks about them, it failed.  [PG-13]
The Jacksonville Film Journal
URL:http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Email:chuckd21@leading.net
Š 1999 of The Jacksonville Film Journal.  No reviews may be reprinted
without permission.

Title
Review for Volcano (1997)
Volcano (1997) *** out of ***** - Cast: Tommy Lee Jones, Anne Heche, Don
Cheadle, Gaby Hoffmann, David Keith. Written by Jerome Armstrong and Billy
Ray. Directed by: Mick Jackson. Running Time: 105 minutes.
When I reviewed "Dante's Peak", I made the comment that "Volcano" would
easily be the best of this year's two volcano flicks. The problem with
"Dante's Peak" is that it basically boiled down to this:
 Volcano Expert: "See that huge volcano looming behind your town? Well, It's
 going to erupt. I should know, I'm an expert."
 Townsfolk: "Expert-schmexpert. We don't buy it and we ain't leaving."
 Townsfolk: "Aaaaaaaaaah! The volcano's erupting! He was right! We're idiots!
 Ow, I'm on fire!"
While in "Volcano", just the premise alone is more intelligent than anything
in "Dante's Peak". An earthquake in Los Angeles causes a volcano to form
from the La Brae Tar Pits, which sends ash, fireballs, and rivers of lava
out to threaten the fine citizens of L.A. And anything about the destruction
of Los Angeles is okay in my book.
Tommy Lee Jones stars as Mike Roark, the chief of operations at Los Angeles'
Office of Emergency Management (OEM). While investigating some minor
earthquake activity, he becomes suspicious of some strange happenings in the
tunnels beneath the city. Seems as though intense heat has killed some
workers there.
Enter geologist Amy Barnes (Heche), a pretty blonde whom you know is going
to end up with Tommy Lee Jones in the end. She warns of the possibilites of
volcanic activity beneath the city caused by the friction of the earth's
plates. People hearing this, as in "Dante's Peak" dismiss it, but unlike
"Dante's Peak", the film wastes no time in proving her right. Soon the city
is in flames and a river of lava is flowing down Wilshire Blvd.
Now, I fully admit that "Volcano" is pure fluff, and cliches are thrown into
our faces every few seconds. For example, you've got the racist cop who puts
aside his feelings to help the same people he has contempt for. You've got
the "dog in peril" scene. Countless people have the line "Get out of here!
Save yourself!" And there's plenty of scenes where the characters get to run
in slow motion, racing to save a person in danger. Even at the end of the
film, a black police officer (Keith) holds a small boy and asks if he can
see his mother. Since everyone is covered in gray volcanic ash, the boy
innocently relpies "Everyone looks the same." Awww....
Despite it's ridiculousness though, I cannot deny that "Volcano" is
entertaining. The initial eruption scene especially. And while I do admit
that just about everything is a cliche, what else can you really do? I mean,
sure a river of lava threatening the very hospital where all the injured are
staying is a cliche, but what else are you going to do? If this were
actually to happen and you were fighting to save the hospital, who you hold
back because what's happening is a cliche? In the days after, would you
criticize the volcano for behaving in a cliched manner? That's how you make
the story compelling enough for us, the audience, to care about the people
trying to prevent the disaster. If the river of lava was flowing towards
gangland or a prison, would we care? Nope. Go lava!
Tommy Lee Jones adds class to the film, even though his character is just a
slight variation of his character from "The Fugitive". The surprise of the
film is the special effects, which to me were entirely convincing, and
surprisingly were more believable than anything any of the characters said
or did.
I found it pretty funny that after the lava has finally been diverted, that
an ironic act of nature occurs as heavy rain starts to fall. "Mother Nature,
could you help us out with some rain to stop the lava?" "No, but I'll make
it rain as soon as you're successful, which will wash all that gray ash off
you so your races will be clear again and so you can return to raping,
mugging, and murdering one another in your homes, streets, and freeways."
And even though, in the end, the threat of an active volcano is just another
in a long list of potential disasters threatening the people in California,
I guarantee you that NO ONE would get the message and move away!
When "Volcano" was all over, I was amazed that the whole movie went by and
no one thought to use Randy Newman's "I Love L.A." as a joke, however an
obvious and pathetic one. But then the end credits rolled... [PG-13]
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related
links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Lost Highway (1997)
Lost Highway (1996) *1/2 out of ***** - Cast: Bill Pullman, Patricia
Arquette, Balthazar Getty, Robert Blake, Gary Busey, Robert Loggia, Jack
Nance, Henry Rollins. Written by: David Lynch and Barry Gifford. Directed
by: David Lynch. Running Time: 135 minutes.
In just about every review I've read for director David Lynch's latest
self-indulgent nonsense, no matter if the review is positive or negative,
the main point is clear. The reviewer cannot explain what the movie is
about. Well, neither can I. I won't even try to give any sort of synopsis of
this film. It just can't be done. And I'm sorry, if I watch something that
makes absolutely no sense whatsoever (and ultimately isn't MEANT to make any
sense), I do not enjoy it and therefore cannot give it a favorable review.
Surprisingly, despite my dislike of Lynch, the first part of the film is
greatly entertaining. First off, the opening credit sequence, as simple as
it is, gets me in the mood for a good movie. I can't explain why, I just
really like everything about the film's opening credits. Then "Lost Highway"
is almost a normal film (for Lynch anyway), becoming very intriguing as it
proceeds along. I was extremely interested in the situations being presented
and the direction of the story.
But unfortunately, I know how Lynch's mind works. And so the story
progresses along for about an hour to a plot twist, which then ruins the
entire movie. It must have killed the man to do anything during his
outstanding TV series "Twin Peaks" which satisfied the audience. Now, as it
seems, he takes great pleasure in telling the audience to screw off, because
he's going to make a movie for himself and no one else. So when the closing
credits roll and we realize that we understand even less of what's going on
than we did ten minutes earlier, I can just hear Lynch squealing with
delight at the joke he's just played on the audience. Hey, I've got a joke
for you David, it's called pathetic box office returns and another five
years before someone finances another one of your "films". Enjoy that one.
The cast is fine with what they have, but Lynch has no ear for dialogue. As
with most of his work, conversations take forever, as characters pause
forever before responding. Entertainment Weekly said that Arquette "acts
with her breasts" in the film, and it's true. That's all Lynch gives her to
do. I'm not saying that's bad, I'm just saying...
On a "Twin Peaks" sidenote: Eric DaRe, who played Leo Johnson (a major
character) on the show, is listed in the closing credits as a member of the
crew. A grip or a best boy or something like that. And Jack Nance, who
played Pete on "Twin Peaks" and who passed away recently plays a mechanic in
the film. I believe this was his last role. [R]
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Friday the 13th (1980)
Friday the 13th (1980) * out of ***** - Cast: Betsy Palmer, Adrienne King,
Kevin Bacon. Directed by: Sean S. Cunningham. Running Time: 95 minutes.
The first film in a ridiculously long movie series about a crazed (almost
supernatural) killer in a hockey mask named Jason. Jason stalks Camp Crystal
Lake, killing naughty teens. Many people don't remember that in this, the
first installment, Jason wasn't the killer. He was merely a young camper who
had supposedly drowned while the camp's counselors were off having sex, and
now his mother was killing all the counselors at Camp Crystal Lake for
revenge. Dull, even by cheesy slasher-movie standards. Those who criticize
horror films as being sexist towards women should note that the lone
survivor of the film is a woman. Kevin Bacon, in one of his earliest roles
which I assume he'd like to forget, plays one of the counselors. [R]
Friday the 13th Part 2 (1981) * out of ***** - Cast: Betsy Palmer, Adrienne
King. Directed by: Steve Miner. Running Time: 87 minutes.
The second film isn't as ridiculous as most probably think, but it's just as
dull and padded as the first one. Five years after the events of part 1
(although only one year in real time... so technically it's 1985), Jason
(who isn't superhuman yet, just a demented man living in the woods) journeys
to the suburbs to kill the only survivor of part 1. Then, a group of kids go
through counselor training (translation: have sex) at a camp right next door
to Camp Crystal Lake. Soon, they are getting picked off one by one. Again,
the lone survivor is a woman, but the ending doesn't make any sense. The
heroine thinks she's safe with her boyfriend, until Jason explodes through
her window and takes her. A flash of white, and then we see paramedics
taking her away. She asks what happened to her boyfriend, and the film ends.
Hmmm. Jason has not acquired his hockey mask yet, so he wears a cloth sack
on his head. [R]
-- 
Chuck Dowling
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related
links, and reader's reviews.

Title
Review for Air Force One (1997)
Air Force One (1997) **1/2 out of ***** - Cast: Harrison Ford, Gary Oldman,
Wendy Crewson, Glenn Close, Dean Stockwell, William H. Macy, Xander
Berkeley, Jurgen Prochnow. Written by: Andrew W. Marlowe. Directed by:
Wolfgang Petersen. Running Time: 118 minutes.
Have you seen a film from 1988 called "Die Hard"? If you did, then you've
seen "Air Force One". Surely first time screenwriter Andrew W. Marlowe saw
it, as this movie seems to follow that film's formula to the letter, sadly
without adding anything really new to the concept.
In "Air Force One", career good guy Harrison Ford is President James
Marshall. After giving a passionate speech in Russia about how terrorism
will no longer be tolerated (a speech which oddly causes his staff to
cringe, as they actually believe it can be used AGAINST him in the next
election), he boards Air Force One and heads for home. Unfortunately, a
small group of Russian terrorists "disguised" as journalists (led by career
bad guy Gary Oldman) hijacks the plane and threatens to kill a hostage every
half hour unless a communist General (a cameo by Jurgen Prochnow of
Petersen's "Das Boot") is released from captivity.
I've yet to understand Hollywood's fascination with the President of the
United States as a main movie character. Furthermore, I've yet to understand
the paradox in which Hollywood presents such a character to us. In films
where the audience is required to love the character of the president, the
filmmakers go above and beyond to make him someone who we will all like. For
example, look at movies like "The American President", "Independence Day",
and now "Air Force One", in which the president is played by an actor almost
beloved by all, Harrison Ford. His character of the president makes
passionate speeches which actually say something, he clearly loves his
family, likes to relax by watching football, he's a decorated Vietnam
veteran, and most importantly, he fights and kills numerous terrorists when
they take over his airplane. What I don't understand is why movie presidents
have such strong character, yet whenever there's an election all we hear is
how character doesn't matter, many times coming from those in Hollywood. Now
this observation is not intended as any sort of political opinion (as I have
no interest in politics or in any political party), just as a curious
observation into why things are.
Ford again is in fine form, but do you think he's got this role down pat
yet? Also, I don't believe I've ever seen the man cry on film before, as he
does here. It's a very convincing performance sadly lost in a bunch of
cliches. William H. Macy is absolutely wasted in his role as one of the
staff members aboard Air Force One. This is the kind of role I'd see him in
years ago and think, "Wow, he's interesting. I can't wait to see him in
larger roles." Come on Hollywood, stop wasting this man.
Numerous logic problems plague the script. For example, in order for the
terrorists plans to work, they are dependent on one of the president's own
staff to initiate the takeover. This person's connection with the terrorists
is never revealed, why is he helping them? Also, to pull this off, you'd
think these terrorists need to be pretty sharp. Yet when the attack is about
to begin, moments after takeoff, Oldman has to wake them up! They were
napping! Later, when the pilots are killed (never seen that before), the
terrorists seem completely unprepared for that possibility. Even though
Oldman himself is blowing the pilots away, he's then shocked that they're
dead and has no idea what to do next.
A note to filmmakers using computers for special effects: Please, until you
can make a computer effect not look like a computer effect, stick with using
models. The computer created effect showing the final fate of Air Force One
is bad, bad, 1000 times bad. Look at movies from ten to fifteen years ago
which used models. They STILL look better than most of today's computer
generated effects.
"Air Force One" certainly isn't awful like most recent airplane disaster
flicks ("Con Air", "Turbulence"), but I certainly expected something better
considering the cast and director. As an action film using a hopelessly
overused theme, "Air Force One" is simply a standard entry into the genre
and doesn't improve on the "Die Hard" formula as it should have. [R]
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related links, and reader's reviews.
